S.  HRG.  109–100

PRESIDENT’S  FY  2006  BUDGET  REQUEST  FOR 
THE  DEPARTMENT  OF  HOMELAND  SECURITY’S 
TRANSPORTATION  SECURITY  ADMINISTRATION 
(TSA)  AND  RELATED  PROGRAMS

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

FEBRUARY  15,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

22–942 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on February 15, 2005 .......................................................................
Statement of Senator Boxer ....................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Burns ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg ..........................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lott ......................................................................................
Statement of Senator McCain .................................................................................
Statement of Senator E. Benjamin Nelson ............................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Berrick,  Cathleen  A.,  Director,  Homeland  Security  and  Justice,  Government 
Accountability Office ............................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Stone, Hon. David M., Assistant Secretary, Transportation Security Adminis-
tration ...................................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Godwin, Jean, Executive Vice President and General Counsel, American Asso-
ciation of Port Authorities, prepared statement ................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Hon. David M. Stone by: 

Hon. Daniel K. Inouye ......................................................................................
Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg ...............................................................................
Hon. John D. Rockefeller IV ............................................................................
Hon. David Vitter .............................................................................................

Page 
1
5
5
56
5
2
2
58
60
61
4
6
6
1

17
18

7
9

67

68
73
72
75

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

DEPARTMENT 

PRESIDENT’S  FY  2006  BUDGET  REQUEST  FOR 
THE 
HOMELAND
SECURITY’S  TRANSPORTATION  SECURITY 
ADMINISTRATION 
(TSA)  AND  RELATED
PROGRAMS 

OF 

TUESDAY,  FEBRUARY  15,  2005

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room  SR–
253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,  Chairman 
of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. The Committee will come to order. 
Let me welcome the witnesses who are here to discuss the Presi-
dent’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget for the Transportation Security Ad-
ministration. Since September 11, we’ve made major improvements 
in securing all modes of transportation in this country. Still, much 
remains  to  be  done.  I  believe  Congress  will  carefully  consider  the 
120  percent  fee  increase  proposed  on  travelers.  The  fee  increase, 
we’re  told,  could  result  in  lost  revenue  for  an  industry  that’s  al-
ready  on  the  financial  ropes.  Last  year  alone,  the  industry  lost 
about $10 billion. And the question that has to be asked is, is this 
the right time to add another 11⁄2 billion dollars in fees to an indus-
try  that  already  pays  $15  billion  in  taxes  and  fees,  to  a  variety  of 
government agencies? 

I’m not going to make a long statement. I do hope that Members 
will keep their statements short. I do believe that TSA remains be-
hind  on  procurement  and  installation  of  explosive-detection  ma-
chines  in  airports  around  the  country.  And  the  Known  Traveler 
Program  is  also  behind.  And  the  background  checks  on  airport 
workers  remain  an  issue.  We’ll  have  questions  about  all  of  those. 
I thank you, Admiral Stone, for coming, and Ms. Berrick. I know 
you  had  to  change  your  schedule  to  be  here,  for  our  schedule,  and 
I appreciate your willingness to come and appear before us. 

Senator Inouye?

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  look  upon  this  oversight  of  TSA  as  one  of  the  most  important 

of this Committee. I have three principal areas of concern. 

In 2001, we agreed, by nearly unanimous votes in the House and 
the  Senate,  that  transportation  security  must  be  a  national-secu-
rity function. However, between TSA’s endless reorganizations and 
the  recent  talk  about  returning  to  private  security  screening  com-
panies, it’s becoming apparent that the central guiding principle is 
being eroded. And, Mr. Chairman, if we lose sight of this principle, 
I think we’ll forget one of the most important lessons of September 
11th. 

The  second  concern  is,  aviation  security  has  received  about  90 
percent  of  TSA’s  funds  and  virtually  all  of  its  attention.  There  is 
simply  not  enough  being  done  to  address  port,  rail,  motor-carrier, 
hazardous-material  shipment,  and  pipeline  security.  And  I’m  sure 
all of us agree that this must be changed. 

The  third,  as  you’ve  noted,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  Administration  is 
preparing to increase aviation security funds. This makes no sense 
to  me.  The  airline  industry,  as  you’ve  pointed  out,  is  bordering  on 
total bankruptcy. And the Administration wants to add to its costs. 
Yet,  at  the  same  time,  the  Administration  is  demanding  that  its 
unaffordable  tax  cuts  must  be  made  permanent.  And  I  just  don’t 
follow  this  thinking.  And,  quite  frankly,  I  can’t  believe  that  this 
proposal will be adopted by Congress. 

Mr.  Chairman,  with  your  approval,  I’ll  submit  the  rest  of  my 

statement for the record. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Mr. Chairman, as we begin this new session, I rank our oversight of the Transpor-
tation Security Administration as one of our highest priorities. As the primary Com-
mittee  of  jurisdiction  for  transportation  security,  I’m  looking  forward  to  a  spirited 
and  consistent  review  of  TSA’s  work  as  we  continue  to  make  progress  securing  all 
modes of transportation. 

I have 3 principal areas of concern:

1.  Congress  agreed  in  2001,  by  nearly  unanimous  votes  in  the  House  and  Sen-
ate, that transportation security must be a national security function. However, 
between  TSA’s  endless  reorganizations  and  the  recent  rhetoric  about  returning 
to  private  security  screening  companies,  it  is  becoming  apparent  that  this  cen-
tral, guiding principle is being eroded. If we lose sight of this principle, we will 
forget one of the most important lessons of September 11th.
2.  Aviation  security  has  received  90  percent  of  TSA’s  funds  and  virtually  all  of 
its attention. There is simply not enough being done to address port, rail, motor 
carrier, hazardous material, and pipeline safety. That must change, quickly.
3.  The  Administration  is  proposing  to  increase  aviation  security  fees.  This 
makes  no  sense  to  me.  The  airline  industry  is  bordering  on  total  bankruptcy, 
and the Administration wants to add to its costs. Yet at the same time the Ad-
ministration  is  demanding  that  its  unaffordable  tax  cuts  be  made  permanent. 
I don’t follow their thinking, and quite frankly, I don’t believe the proposal will 
go far.

Mr. Chairman, over the years, and particularly since 9/11, this Committee has led 
the effort to make transportation security a matter of national security. We crafted 
two  landmark  bills,  the  Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  of  2001  and  the 
Maritime Transportation Security Act of 2002, to ensure that funding and programs 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

3

were  developed  to  completely  change  the  way  we  address  security.  The  September 
11th  tragedy,  the  Madrid  train  bombing  and  many  other  attacks  remain  locked  in 
our conscience as we try to do all we can to avoid another attack. 

The continued threat risk is real and the vulnerabilities are real, across all modes 

of transportation. 

We  recently  witnessed  a  rail  tank  cargo  accident—not  a  terrorist  attack—in 
Graniteville,  SC.  An  entire  town  had  to  be  evacuated,  demonstrating  the  potential 
harm  if  someone  does  target  a  rail  tank  car.  The  District  of  Columbia  was  so  con-
cerned about rail cars carrying hazardous materials traversing the city they adopted 
a resolution to ban them. 

Port  security  is  of  particular  interest  to  me.  My  State  of  Hawaii  is  entirely  de-
pendent  upon  shipping  and  the  steady  flow  of  maritime  commerce.  The  dock  strike 
at  the  port  of  LA/Long  Beach  in  2001  caused  people  in  my  state  to  begin  running 
out of basic supplies. If an attack occurs, it could be weeks before service is renewed. 
It  is  important  to  remember  that  95  percent  of  the  nation’s  cargo  comes  through 
the  ports,  so  a  port  incident  will  send  devastating  shockwaves  through  the  entire 
economy, impacting every state. Yet the security initiatives at most ports have been, 
to  this  point,  woefully  underfunded,  and  most  ports  are  ill-prepared  for  an  attack. 
Unfortunately,  our  maritime  system  is  only  as  strong  as  its  weakest  link.  If  there 
is an incident at any one port, the whole system will screech to a halt, as we scram-
ble to ensure security at other ports. If we had to shut down our entire port system, 
the  economic  damage  would  be  widespread,  catastrophic  and  possibly  irreversible. 
Considering these simple observations, I cannot comprehend the Administration’s 
lack of serious attention and commitment to port, rail, motor carrier, hazardous ma-
terial and pipeline safety initiatives. 

Security  funding  for  all  modes  of  transportation  beyond  aviation  has  been  des-
perately  lacking.  The  9/11  Commission  found,  ‘‘over  90  percent  of  the  nation’s  $5.3 
billion  annual  investment  in  the  TSA  goes  to  aviation . . . [and] . . . current  ef-
forts  do  not  yet  reflect  a  forward-looking  strategic  plan.’’  And  according  to  Senate 
Banking Committee estimates, the Federal Government has spent $9.16 per airline 
passenger  each  year  on  enhanced  security  measures,  while  spending  less  than  a 
penny  annually  per  person  on  security  measures  for  other  modes  of  transportation. 
But considering the real threat risk and the constant talk about our War on Ter-
ror, I find it even harder to understand how the Administration has forgotten that, 
in a post-September 11th world, transportation security is national security. 

Based on the President’s Budget, there are apparently some in the Administration 
who seem to believe that our work is done. Their budget proposal suggests a whole-
sale dismantling of the Transportation Security Administration. In the last 2 years, 
we have witnessed a near constant reorganization that, under the current proposal, 
now  makes  Maritime  and  Land  security  virtually  nonexistent  at  TSA.  The  changes 
suggest  either  a  fundamental  lack  of  understanding  of  what  it  will  take  to  ensure 
the security of all transportation modes, bureaucratic mismanagement, or worse yet, 
the Administration’s complete loss of a sense of national urgency. 

The  President’s  Budget  recommends  shifting  critical  work  away  from  the  Trans-
portation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  to  other  organizations  within  DHS  that 
have  neither  the  expertise  nor  the  necessary  authority  to  be  effective.  In  my  view, 
further decentralizing the responsibilities of TSA will destroy the remaining, limited 
accountability that TSA provides for transportation security. 

The  problems  with  the  Budget  proposal  go  further:  it  offers  inadequate  funding 
for the U.S. Coast Guard to meet both its increased, homeland security responsibil-
ities, and its traditional missions like search and rescue and enforcement of coastal 
laws; an creates an odd rearrangement of the security grant programs that not only 
defies  Congressional  directives,  but  adds  bureaucracy  and  decreases  accountability; 
it cedes TSA’s regulatory authority of the Transportation Worker Identification Cre-
dential (TWIC) program; and the list goes on. 

On  aviation  security,  the  Administration’s  proposal  creates  as  many  problems  as 
it  aims  to  solve.  While  TSA  spending  in  FY06  would  increase  by  $156  million,  this 
funding level depends on $1.5 billion generated by increased security fees on airline 
passengers.  Since  this  proposal  was  unveiled,  there  has  been  no  shortage  of  airline 
and  industry  analysts  that  have  raised  deep  concerns  over  what  effect  this  may 
have on the future of existing air carriers. 

The  Administration  cannot  satisfy  its  budget  needs  on  the  backs  of  one  industry. 
I know that several other countries and airport authorities impose security fees, but 
with  perhaps  one  or  two  small  exceptions,  no  one  imposes  all  of  the  national  secu-
rity costs on the airlines. We can debate how much we need for security, but it does 
not make any sense to place the burden for new DHS revenue on an airline industry 
that  is  bordering  on  total  bankruptcy,  when  at  the  same  time  the  Administration 
is demanding that its unaffordable tax cuts be made permanent. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

4

The  U.S.  economy  depends  on  a  strong  commercial  aviation  industry.  Since  Sep-
tember 11th, the U.S. air carriers have taken unprecedented steps to cut their costs, 
and  their  employees  have  been  true  heros.  In  the  face  of  steep  layoffs  and  cuts  in 
pay  and  benefits,  the  workers  have  been  selflessly  supportive  of  the  industry  and 
still  manage  to  provide  the  highest  level  of  service  possible  day  in  and  day  out.  I 
think  we  must  be  very  careful  in  dealing  with  issues  that  will  have  wide  ramifica-
tions for the aviation industry and its workers. 

TSA  should  be  aggressively  seeking  improvements  to  the  current  transportation 
security regimes for all modes and promoting the technological and capital improve-
ments  that  will  save  considerable  money  in  the  long  run  while  improving  security. 
Instead, we have been given a budget that seeks short-term solutions that, I believe, 
will have negative consequences in the long term. 

Given the many misplaced priorities that I see in the President’s Budget proposal, 

it is clear that the Congress needs to help refocus the Department. 

I  have  been  discussing  the  real  needs  of  the  U.S.  transportation  security  system 
with my fellow Committee members, and we have been developing a transportation 
security  reauthorization  proposal  to  provide  further  direction  to  the  Department’s 
cargo security functions, to strengthen aviation, maritime, rail, hazardous materials, 
and pipeline security efforts, and enhance interagency cooperation. The proposal will 
incorporate several Commerce Committee-reported and Senate-passed bills from the 
prior Congress and will also put forth new ideas to enhance transportation security 
across all modes of transportation. 

of defense—be it an airport screener or a seaport agent;

We expect a fully funded, effective operating Administration that can:
• Provide  security  to  the  traveling  public  and  instills  confidence  in  the  first  line 
• Establish secure, efficient cargo systems for air, land and sea;
• Deter people that seek to do harm.
It  is  easy  to  set  the  goals,  but  often  difficult  to  achieve  them.  I  speak  for  my  col-
leagues when I say that this Committee is fully committed to achieving these goals. 
And we have a record that demonstrates our ability to deliver a bi-partisan, broadly 
supported result. 

The  difficult  work  of  securing  all  of  our  major  modes  of  transportation,  including 
our ports, railroads, intercity buses, pipelines, and motor carriers, is just beginning 
and the country demands a robust agency within DHS dedicated to that task. 

I thank the witnesses for their participation and I look forward to their testimony.

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator McCain, do you have an opening statement? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

Senator MCCAIN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Briefly,  I  understand  many  passengers,  including  myself,  a  fre-
quent  flyer,  don’t  look  forward  to  the  prospects  of  paying  an  in-
creased passenger security fee, as would—which is proposed in the 
President’s 2006 budget. We’re facing tough fiscal realities, and we 
need to make some tough choices. 

Neither  the  airlines,  already  under  huge  financial  strains,  nor 
the  general  taxpayers,  I  think,  should  shoulder  the  entire  burden 
of securing the airline passengers. I believe it’s important the Fed-
eral  Government  continue  to  play  a  critical  role  in  ensuring  the 
safety  and  security  of  airline  passengers.  And,  in  this  instance,  I 
think  it’s  appropriate  that  those  directly  benefiting,  even  me,  the 
passenger, join in helping to cover those costs. 

I look forward to hearing from the witnesses today on their views 
on the proposed passenger security fee increase and the President’s 
TSA  budget.  In  addition,  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  Admiral 
Stone,  in  particular,  on  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s 
progress  in  implementing  the  many  transportation  security  provi-
sions that were included in the Intelligence Reform Act. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Dorgan? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Chairman, thank you. 
This  is  obviously  a  very  important  issue.  I  think  not  only  avia-
tion  security,  but  all  forms  of  transportation  security  are  critically 
important  in  this  time  period,  and  I  look  forward  to  having  an  op-
portunity to visit with our witnesses about it. 

I  did  just  want  to  make  a  point  that  this  Committee  supported 
the amendment which will now require—and I believe they’re very 
close  to  finishing  the  rule  on  it—the  prohibition  of  butane  lighters 
on airplanes. As you know, Richard—I believe it was Reid—had the 
butane  lighter.  The  FBI  said  he  would  have  blown  up—the  shoe-
bomber  would  have  blown  up  the  airplane.  And  so,  we’ve  been 
working  on  that.  And  I  understand  that’s  about  done,  and  I  think 
we’re just waiting for a day or two before that gets out. 

But  I  think  rail  security,  port  security,  aviation  security,  all  of 
these  issues  are  critically  important,  and  I’m  anxious  to  discuss 
some of them today with our witnesses. 

Mr. Chairman, thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Boxer? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER,

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

Senator BOXER. I’ll just put my statement in the record. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Boxer follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 
Mr. Chairman, I want to thank you for holding this important hearing. 
I believe that the overall budget the White House has sent to Congress is incom-
plete  and  unacceptable.  Among  the  many  problems  with  the  budget  is  that  it  does 
not  include  the  cost  of  the  wars  in  Iraq  and  Afghanistan  and,  at  the  same  time,  it 
underfunds important domestic programs—including homeland security. 

We  are  here  today  to  focus  on  one  of  the  biggest  aspects  of  homeland  security—

securing our transportation system. 

Transportation security funding is crucial for California. The state has five major 
airports.  California’s  ports  receive  over  40  percent  of  our  nation’s  goods.  The  ports 
of Los Angeles and Long Beach comprise the largest port complex in the U.S.—they 
are crucial for our nation’s economy. California has the Amtrak line with the second 
highest ridership in the nation. 

Almost three and a half years ago, this country confronted the worst terrorist at-
tack  in  our  history.  Protecting  our  nation  should  be  a  top  priority.  However,  this 
isn’t the case with the Administration’s Homeland Security budget. 

Congress  has  said  that  aviation  security  is  a  federal  responsibility.  According  to 
the Joint Explanatory Statement of the Conference Committee on the ‘‘Aviation and 
Transportation Security Act,’’ which became law in November 2001, ‘‘The Conferees 
expect  that  security  functions  at  United  States  airports  should  become  a  Federal 
Government responsibility.’’ We must live up to that responsibility. 

We  have  the  same  responsibility  for  port,  rail,  and  transit  security.  But,  the  Ad-
ministration’s  budget  eliminates  the  Port  Security  Grant  Program  and  replaces  it 
with the so-called Targeted Infrastructure Protection Program (TIPP) that combines 
funding for protecting our ports, railroads, and transit systems. 

So  under  the  Administration’s  proposal,  these  major  transportation  systems  will 
be fighting against one another for homeland security funds. There is no guarantee 
where the funding would be targeted. 

In addition, the Administration requested only $600 million for TIPP. That is not 

enough to meet all of our security needs. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

It  is  not  close  to  the  $5.4  billion  over  ten  years  that  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  esti-
mates  is  needed  at  port  facilities  or  the  $7.3  billion  that  is  needed  overall  for  port 
security. It is not close to the $6 billion that transit agencies say is needed for secu-
rity  upgrades.  It  is  not  close  to  the  almost  $800  million  that  Amtrak  says  it  needs 
to improve its tunnels—not to mention improving security in other ways. 

From  the  budget,  we  can  tell  what  the  Administration’s  priorities  are—and  they 

do not appear to be in protecting our nation. 

Transportation security funding is crucial for California and our nation. We must 

be proactive in preventing another terrorist attack. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Nelson? 

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I noted that, in the budget, in the proposed fee increase, that this 
is  for  continuation  of  the  current  program,  apparently  does  not  in-
volve any kind of upgrading of the mechanical or nonpersonal secu-
rity  screening.  I  hope  that,  in  your  comments,  you’ll  address  how 
we’re going to upgrade the screening process in the future to make 
it  less  cumbersome  in  certain  areas,  and  more  secure  in  other 
areas.  There  have  to  be  these  upgrades  that  have  been  talked 
about  for  quite  a  period  of  time,  but  I  don’t  see  anything  that’s 
being  addressed,  and  I  hope  that  you  will  deal  with  that.  Thank 
you. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
We welcome your testimony, Admiral. Please proceed. 
Admiral  STONE.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator 

Inouye, and distinguished Members of the Committee. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I’m  sorry,  I  did  not  see  Senator  Pryor  come  in. 

I apologize, Senator. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  All  I  want  to  say  is, 
thank  you  for  being  here  today.  We  appreciate  the  witnesses,  look 
forward to the testimony. 

Mr. Chairman, thank you for your leadership on this Committee. 
I’m  a  new  Member  here,  and  I’m  excited  about  the  tasks  that  lie 
ahead. 

Thank you. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  We’re  glad  to  have  you.  You’re  not  exactly  a 

stealthy Senator. I’m sorry I missed you there. 

[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Senator  Burns?  Do  you  have  a  statement,  Sen-

ator? 

Senator  BURNS.  I  don’t  have  a  statement.  I  just  would  make 
some points, but I can do that later. I think you want to get to the 
witnesses. 

The CHAIRMAN. Good idea. Thank you. 
Proceed again, Admiral.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID M. STONE, ASSISTANT 

SECRETARY, TRANSPORTATION SECURITY ADMINISTRATION 
Admiral STONE. Thank you, sir. 
Good  morning,  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Inouye,  and  distin-

guished Members of the Committee. 

I  am  pleased  to  testify  before  you  this  morning  to  discuss  the 
President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget request for the TSA. I look for-
ward  to  working  closely  with  the  Committee  on  protecting  the  Na-
tion’s  transportation  systems  and  continuing,  under  your  direction 
and  leadership,  the  strong  relationship  we  have  forged  with  this 
Committee. 

For example, several Members of the Committee have focused on 
assuring the security of air cargo. Consistent with requirements of 
the intelligence reform legislation and our FY 2005 appropriations, 
we’re working to triple the number of air-cargo inspections that are 
actually  conducted  and  are  currently  analyzing  comments  to  our 
air-cargo  security  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  in  order  to  issue 
a  final  rule  by  August  2005.  Furthermore,  we  are  moving  aggres-
sively to double our air-cargo inspection workforce from 100 to 200. 
The  President’s  budget  requests  5.6  billion  for  TSA  in  2006  to 
stabilize  and  strengthen  TSA’s  essential  mission.  The  request  re-
flects  an  increase  of  415  million  for  several  initiatives  and  de-
creases of 258 million for programs being transferred to other com-
ponents of DHS and for other adjustments. This results in an over-
all  net  increase  of  156  million  over  the  amount  appropriated  to 
TSA in 2005. 

In  addition,  the  FY  2006  request  is  based  on  the  new  program 
structure  that  redefines  TSA’s  programs,  projects,  and  activities  to 
clearly  align  the  agency’s  mission  with  its  funding  requirements. 
The  restructuring  will  better  enable  TSA  to  effectively  and  effi-
ciently secure our nation’s transportation systems and will provide 
TSA with needed flexibility to respond to the ever-evolving security 
landscape. 

Under the new structure, TSA appropriations will be divided into 
three  categories:  Aviation  security,  surface  transportation  security, 
and  transportation  security  support.  I  would  like  to  highlight  in-
creases  to  particular  programs  where  we  believe  the  commitment 
of additional resources will greatly enhance TSA’s effectiveness and 
efficiencies. 

These  areas  include  174  million  to  complete  highspeed  oper-
ational  connectivity,  called  Hi-SOC.  Hi-SOC  will  enhance  the  abil-
ity  of  TSA  to  transmit,  on  a  timely  basis,  vital  threat  and  security 
information  throughout  areas  where  operations  are  being  con-
ducted. In addition, it will increase training efficiency and screener 
effectiveness, while minimizing costs, and also assist TSA in trans-
mitting  human-resource  data.  Finally,  and  most  importantly,  Hi-
SOC  will  allow  TSA  to  be  a  metrics-based  organization,  providing 
field data to headquarters via the Performance Management Infor-
mation System, known as PMIS. 

I  would  like  to  highlight  also  the  43.7  million  over  2005  for 
emerging  checkpoint  explosive-detection  technologies.  To  address 
the threat of explosives carried on persons, TSA is utilizing 28 mil-
lion  from  2005  to  purchase  and  deploy  to  checkpoints,  at  40  of  the 
nation’s largest airports, 147 trace portals. For 2006, we requested 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

8

an  increase  of  43.7  million,  for  a  total  of  $72  million  in  2006,  to 
purchase an additional 195 portal units for deployment at an addi-
tional  41  airports.  We  also  anticipate  that  the  proposed  increase 
will  enable  us  to  purchase  explosive-detection  document  scanners, 
designed  to  collect  explosive  particles  from  travel  documents  that 
a  passenger  has  handled,  as  well  as  to  invest  in  appropriate  facts-
gather technologies, once approved. 

There  will  be  180  million  in  additional  funding  for  the  screener 
work  force.  TSA  has  experienced  a  recurring  need  to  reprogram 
funds  from  other  programs  to  support  the  45,000  screener  work 
force. The estimate for increased FY 2006 payroll funds is based on 
the actual 2004 and 2005 experience to date. It incorporates higher 
benefit  and  other  adjustments  previously  supported  through 
reprogrammings.  The  proposed  increase  would  be  directed  mainly 
toward  stabilizing  the  screener  payroll  base,  and  should  minimize 
the need for any screener workforce reprogrammings in the future. 
The  budget  contains  significant  resources  related  to  deployment 
of explosive-detection systems. Of the 617 million requested specifi-
cally  for  EDS  ETV,  394  million  would  be  used  to  purchase  and  in-
stall EDS. 

Furthermore,  the  President’s  budget  includes  funds  for  reim-
bursement  to  airports  for  their  work  related  to  reconfiguration  of 
airport  facilities  to  accommodate  installation  of  inline  EDS  under 
the eight letters of intent that have been executed. 

The  President’s  budget  proposes  language  to  maintain  the  75 
percent  federal  cost  share  for  LOIs.  TSA  believes  that  the  current 
cost share is fair and equitable, and that changing this cost-sharing 
formula  would  not  only  disrupt  current  LOI  commitments,  but 
would also undermine security effectiveness at other airports. 

TSA  will  continue  to  work  in  conjunction  with  stakeholders  to 
identify  airports  where  there  is  the  greatest  need  for  support  for 
the  installation  of  inline  EDS  systems  and  to  explore  alternative 
mechanisms to fund inline EDS installations in the future. 

The  President’s  budget  proposes  to  adjust  the  manner  by  which 
aviation  security  screening  activities  are  funded.  The  proposed 
budget is designed to shift cost, to have the airline passenger, rath-
er  than  the  general  taxpayer,  shoulder  the  majority  of  the  cost  of 
aviation security in the interest of fairness and equity. The budget 
proposes  to  increase  the  passenger  fee  by  $3,  raising  the  fee  on  a 
typical flight from $2.50 to $5.50. The maximum fee for passengers 
traveling  multiple  legs  on  a  one-way  trip  would  rise  from  the  cur-
rent  maximum  of  $5  to  $8.  If  this  adjustment  were  to  be  adopted, 
passenger users would cover 73 percent of the estimated total avia-
tion  security  screening  costs  through  aviation  security  fees,  as  op-
posed to their current FY05 level of 36 percent. 

In  addition,  the  budget  proposes  air-carrier  fee  collections  be  set 
at 350 million in FY 2006, which would comprise 7 percent of avia-
tion  security  screening  costs,  which  is  in  sync  with  their  current 
FY05 7 percent level. 

The overall FY06 fee approach clearly shifts the burden of the fee 
more  heavily  onto  the  passenger  user,  and  provides  relief  for  the 
U.S.  taxpayer,  reducing  the  taxpayer’s  burden  from  57  percent  in 
FY 2005 to 20 percent in FY 2006. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

I  would  also  like  to  highlight  our  efforts  to  enhance  security 
across  America’s  surface  transportation  systems  and  to  adopt 
threat-based  risk-management  approach  for  operational  respon-
sibilities across all modes of transportation. 

In  accordance  with  HSPV–7  and  the  National  Infrastructure 
Plan, TSA is working closely with IAIP and is leading efforts to de-
velop  the  TSA  sector-specific  plan.  This  plan  delineates  roles  and 
responsibilities between transportation stakeholders to ensure that 
efforts  are  systemic,  complete,  and  consistent  with  security  efforts 
in other sectors. It will serve as the framework for defining the re-
sponsibilities for risk management of the transportation sector. 

Within  this  plan  is  the  modal  plan  that  will  implement  the  sec-
tor-specific  plan  on  an  operational  and  mode-specific  level.  The 
base  plan  was  released  for  stakeholder  review  earlier  this  month, 
and  I’m  pleased  to  announced  that,  as  of  yesterday,  stakeholders 
have secure Internet access to the modal plans for review. 

Our efforts on the SSP and the modal plans are being expedited 
to meet the requirements set forth in the intelligence reform legis-
lation for DHS to develop, prepare, implement, and update the na-
tional strategy for transportation security and modal security plans 
by April 1st, 2005. 

In conclusion, I want to convey how proud I am of TSA. Our em-
ployees  have  sought  to  carry  out  their  responsibilities  with  skill, 
dedication,  and  professionalism.  This  past  year  was  particularly 
challenging  with  the  large  number  of  national  special  security 
events  that  took  place  and  the  return  to  high  levels  of  airline  pas-
sengers. TSA will continue to strive to improve transportation secu-
rity  while  maintaining  the  free  flow  of  goods  and  people.  We  plan 
to  do  so  while  meeting  and  exceeding  the  high  expectations  that 
Americans expect of us. 

I’m happy to also report the results of our 2005 Customer Service 
Survey  that  were  released  late  yesterday.  Highlights  included  92 
percent  of  passengers  were  satisfied  with  their  overall  experience 
at  the  passenger  checkpoint;  89  percent  of  passengers  thought  se-
curity was adequate, as opposed to excessive or inadequate; 85 per-
cent  of  passengers  believe  screening  procedures  are  similar  be-
tween airports; and, finally, 82 percent of the passengers have con-
fidence in TSA. 

We  know  we  have  plenty  of  room  for  improvement.  However, 
these  numbers  give  perspective  to  what  is  often  a  slanted  and  dis-
torted story regarding the performance of TSA. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today.  I  look 
forward to working with the Committee in support of our FY 2006 
funding request. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  oral  statement.  I  would  be 

pleased to answer any questions, sir. 

[The prepared statement of Admiral Stone follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID M. STONE, ASSISTANT SECRETARY, 

TRANSPORTATION SECURITY ADMINISTRATION 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Inouye,  and  Members  of  the  Committee. 
I am pleased to appear before the Committee to speak in support of the President’s 
FY 2006 budget request for the Transportation Security Administration (TSA). I ap-
preciate  the  strong  partnership  we  have  forged  together  to  ensure  the  safety  and 
security  of  the  nation’s  transportation  systems  while  maintaining  customer  service 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

and  the  free  flow  of  people  and  goods.  I  look  forward  to  continuing  our  endeavors 
in partnership with the Committee under your direction and leadership. 

TSA’s mission—to protect the Nation’s transportation systems to ensure the free-
dom  of  movement  for  people  and  commerce—continues  to  be  a  vital  one,  31⁄2 years 
after the tragic events of 9/11 that motivated TSA’s creation. TSA’s mission is com-
pletely  aligned  with  that  of  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  and  the  Border 
and Transportation Security Directorate, created one year after the creation of TSA. 
TSA  has  worked  diligently  to  implement  the  mandates  of  Congress  to  improve  the 
security  of  aviation  and  surface  transportation,  first  within  the  Department  of 
Transportation and now within the Department of Homeland Security. 

Today  I  would  like  to  highlight  some  of  the  major  accomplishments  of  TSA  over 
the last fiscal year and focus your attention on some of the key initiatives that will 
be  supported  by  the  President’s  FY  2006  budget  request  for  TSA.  Those  key  initia-
tives include: 

Strengthening  Security  Through  Information  Technology  Connectivity.  High-speed 
information technology connectivity will be key in our efforts to deliver effective and 
efficient  security  by  better  facilitating  screener  workforce  training  and  the  timely 
sharing of vital performance information. 

Strengthening  Security  Through  Emerging  Technologies.  As  we  continue  to  refine 
our layered approach to aviation security, we are placing a high priority on address-
ing  the  threat  of  explosives  coming  through  the  passenger  screening  checkpoints. 
We  are  using  FY  2005  funding  to  move  forward  with  deployment  of  explosive  trace 
detection portals at screening checkpoints, and the proposed FY 2006 funding levels 
would  further  our  efforts  to  deploy  other  emerging  technologies  for  passenger  and 
baggage screening. 

Strengthening  Security  of  Surface  Transportation  Modes.  The  tragic  March  11, 
2004,  rail  bombings  in  Madrid  were  a  brutal  illustration  of  our  continuing  need  to 
protect  rail  and  other  open  surface  transportation  systems.  Additionally,  although 
not  terrorism-related,  recent  derailments  of  both  passenger  and  freight  trains  car-
rying  hazardous  materials  remind  us  of  the  potential  for  harm  by  anyone  so  in-
clined.  TSA  is  committed  to  working  with  the  private  sector  and  other  government 
entities to bring an appropriate level of security to all modes of transportation. 
Recent Accomplishments 

Before  addressing  these  key  programs,  I  would  like  to  highlight  briefly  some  of 
TSA’s major accomplishments. With passenger air traffic returned to pre-9/11 levels, 
TSA  is  proud  of  its  role  in  restoring  the  confidence  of  the  flying  public  and  making 
air  travel  more  secure  than  it  has  ever  been,  while  successfully  minimizing  pas-
senger  wait  times  at  security  checkpoints,  delivering  a  high  level  of  customer  serv-
ice, even during busy travel seasons. TSA has also worked with DHS, other federal 
agencies,  and  private  sector  partners  to  enhance  security  across  surface  modes  of 
transportation through its intermodal programs. During FY 2004, TSA:

over 600 firearms.

• Intercepted seven million prohibited items at airport checkpoints, including just 
• Implemented  the  Registered  Traveler  pilot  program  that  allows  frequent  fliers 
who  have  undergone  background  checks  to  undergo  expedited  screening,  thus 
improving  customer  service  while  maintaining  a  high  level  of  security  through 
verification of identity. The results of this pilot are now being analyzed.
• Took  major  strides  in  developing  and  field-testing  several  new  technologies,  in-
cluding the Secure Automobile Inspection Lane (SAIL) pilot on ferries operating 
between New Jersey and Delaware, scanning cars and trucks for explosives; the 
Transportation  Worker  Identification  Credential  (TWIC),  a  biometric-based 
identification  system  to  verify  the  identity  of  individuals  and  control  access  to 
secure areas of the nation’s transportation system; the Transit and Rail Inspec-
tion  Pilot  (TRIP)  for  screening  passengers  and  baggage  in  a  rail  environment; 
and  Explosives  Trace  Detection  Portals  and  Explosives  Detection  Document 
Scanners at multiple airports.
• Recently certified the Reveal Technologies CT–80, a third type of Explosives De-
tection  Systems  (EDS)  machine,  and  are  in  the  process  of  conducting  pilots  in 
the operational environment, for the detection of explosives in checked baggage. 
This  machine  is  smaller,  less  costly,  and  more  compact,  making  it  more  appro-
priate  for  use  in  limited  space  and  smaller  airports  where  baggage  throughput 
is lower and larger EDS machines are not practical because of limited space or 
the size of the airport.
• As part of Homeland Security Presidential Directive 7, for protection of Critical 
Infrastructure, we are nearing completion of the development of a security road 
map  called  the  Transportation  Sector  Specific  Plan  (TSSP)  and  the  Transpor-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

11

tation  Security  Operational  Plan,  or  TSSP’s  Modal  Plan  annexes,  which  set 
forth operational strategies and transportation security programs focused on re-
ducing  and  mitigating  security  risks  for  the  transportation  modes,  including 
aviation, rail, mass transit, highway, pipeline, and the postal and shipping sec-
tor.
• Issued  Rail  Security  Directives  setting  security  standards  for  all  heavy  and 
light  rail  operations,  as  well  as  Amtrak  and  the  Alaska  Railroad  Corporation. 
These  standards  establish  a  formal  baseline  and  standardize  protective  meas-
ures  for  all  passenger  rail  assets,  including  personnel  and  physical  assets  and 
critical facilities.
• Began  implementing  a  more  localized,  airport-centric  system,  underpinned  by 
20 local hiring centers around the country that serve as the focal points for local 
hiring activities. This decentralization promises speedier hiring to meet the dy-
namic  needs  of  individual  airports  and  greater  screening  workforce  retention. 
The objectives of this next generation hiring system are to streamline the hiring 
process  by  providing  direct,  immediate  hiring  support  to  individual  airports, 
putting  screener  hiring  and  training  under  control  of  the  Federal  Security  Di-
rectors  (FSD),  and  improving  the  ability  to  deliver  the  right  mix  of  required 
screeners in a timely manner. We also anticipate the next generation hiring sys-
tem will improve retention rates.
• Enhanced  airport  security  nationwide  by  requiring  fingerprint-based  back-
ground  checks  and  additional  background  screening  on  more  than  one  million 
airport  employees;  requiring  more  patrols  and  surveillance  in  secure  areas;  in-
creasing  checks  of  employee  identification  (IDs)  and  vehicles  in  the  sterile  and 
secure  areas;  and  piloting  of  SPOT  (Screening  of  Passengers  by  Observation 
Techniques)  at  two  airports  that  may  enhance  the  capability  of  TSA  screeners 
to identify threats to security.
• Strengthened  air  cargo  security  through  increasing  the  number  of  air  cargo  se-
curity  inspectors  (to  total  200  by  the  end  of  March  2005),  issuing  an  air  cargo 
Notice of Proposed Rule-Making (NPRM) that proposes major changes to the air 
cargo  industry  to  strengthen  air  cargo  security  throughout  the  supply  chain, 
while  not  impeding  the  flow  of  commerce;  enhanced  the  Known  Shipper  Pro-
gram  by  implementing  a  centralized  database  that  currently  includes  informa-
tion  on  approximately  450,000  known  shippers;  and,  in  coordination  with  the 
U.S.  Customs  and  Border  Protection,  developing  a  Freight  Assessment  System 
that will identify elevated-risk cargo to be targeted for inspection.
• Pursued  research  and  development  to  enhance  air  cargo  screening  capabilities 
by pilot testing commercial-off-the-shelf (COTS) technology for air cargo screen-
ing  at  six  airports  and  issuing  research  and  development  grants  to  inventors 
of new technologies for screening air cargo for explosives.
• Worked  closely  with  Customs  and  Border  Protection,  vetted  flight  crews  on  all 
incoming  and  outgoing  international  flights  on  domestic  and  foreign  airlines 
throughout 2004. That amounted to more than 1 million screenings, some 3,000 
a day, which served as a powerful and successful anti-terrorism deterrent. This 
vetting has thus far resulted in denials of 13 crew members that posed an unac-
ceptable security risk.
• Implemented the alien flight student training program originally run by the De-
partment  of  Justice  and  expanded  the  program  to  include  student  applicants 
seeking  training  on  aircraft  with  a  maximum  takeoff  weight  under  12,500 
pounds. Further, TSA has implemented improvements to the assessment proce-
dure and now conducts checks on student applicants against additional law en-
forcement and intelligence data sources.
• Doubled  the  capacity  of  the  training  program  for  Federal  Flight  Deck  Officers 
and  extended  the  program  to  include  cargo  pilots.  There  are  currently  thou-
sands of trained officers defending the cockpits of both commercial and all-cargo 
aircraft.
• Developed, tested and rolled out the volunteer Advanced Crew Member Self-De-
• As a customer service initiative, added to our public website security checkpoint 

fense Training program for flight and cabin-crew members of air carriers.

wait time information to assist travelers in planning for their next flight.

Summary of the FY 2006 Appropriation Request 

The  President’s  FY  2006  Budget  Request  of  $5.6  billion  for  TSA  is  dedicated  to 
stabilizing and strengthening TSA’s essential mission. These amounts do not include 
funding  for  programs  such  as  Secure  Flight  that  are  currently  under  the  purview 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

of TSA’s Office of Transportation Credentialing and Vetting. Most of these programs 
will  be  transferred  to  a  newly  established  Screening  Coordination  and  Operations 
(SCO) Office within the Department’s Border and Transportation Security (BTS) Di-
rectorate. The request reflects an increase of $415 million for several initiatives, and 
decreases  of  $258  million  for  programs  being  transferred  to  other  components  of 
DHS and for other adjustments. This results in an overall net increase of $156 mil-
lion over the amount appropriated to TSA in FY 2005. 

TSA’s FY 2006 budget request proposes revised appropriations language based on 
a  new  program  structure  that  redefines  TSA’s  appropriations  and  programs, 
projects, and activities to clearly align the agency’s mission with its funding require-
ments. As we are completing our second year as a part of DHS, and integrating pro-
grams with those of the Department as a whole to achieve greater synergies, lever-
age  assets,  and  reduce  duplication  of  effort,  this  realignment  will  more  accurately 
reflect  TSA’s  needs  on  the  road  ahead.  This  restructuring  will  better  enable  TSA 
to effectively and efficiently secure our Nation’s transportation system by providing 
needed flexibility to respond to the changing security landscape. Overall, the Admin-
istration proposes that TSA’s FY 2006 funding be divided into three appropriations: 
Aviation  Security,  Surface  Transportation  Security  and  Transportation  Security 
Support. 
Aviation Security 

TSA  requests  $4.7  billion  for  the  Aviation  Security  appropriation  in  FY  2006. 
These funds will support the current federalized and privatized screener workforce, 
provide  sufficient  training  and  other  support  for  both  passenger  and  baggage 
Screening  Workforce  and  Equipment,  and  continue  other  critical  aviation  security 
regulation  and  enforcement  activities.  Critical  increases  are  requested  for  screener 
payroll,  checkpoint  explosive  detection  technology,  and  high  speed  operational  IT 
connectivity.  An  additional  $250  million  will  be  provided  by  the  Aviation  Security 
Capital  Fund  for  EDS  installations.  Funds  will  be  used  to  continue  workforce  per-
formance  improvement  and  facilitate  travel  while  maintaining  security  in  our  na-
tion’s commercial service airports. 

The  Aviation  Security  appropriation  includes  two  distinct  decision  units:  (1) 
Screener  Workforce  and  Equipment  and  (2)  Aviation  Direction  and  Enforcement. 
Screening  Workforce  and  Equipment  comprises  funding  to  support  passenger  and 
baggage  screener  activities,  including  screener  salaries,  training,  supplies,  check-
point  support,  purchase  and  installation  of  screening  equipment  to  include  explo-
sives  detection  systems  (EDS)  and  explosives  trace  detection  machines  (ETD).  This 
unit also includes contractor private screening companies under the Screening Part-
nership Program. In FY 2005, TSA proposes to devote $3.8 billion to these activities, 
plus  $250  million  more  from  the  Aviation  Security  Capital  Fund  for  EDS  installa-
tions. 

The Screening Workforce and Equipment decision unit also includes the funds for 
reimbursements  to  airports  for  their  work  relating  to  reconfiguration  of  airport  fa-
cilities  to  accommodate  installation  of  in-line  EDS  pursuant  to  the  eight  letters  of 
intent  (LOIs)  that  have  been  executed.  The  President’s  Budget  proposes  language 
retaining  direction  included  in  the  Homeland  Security  Appropriations  Act,  2005,  to 
maintain  the  75  percent  federal  cost  share  for  LOIs.  TSA  believes  that  the  current 
cost  share  is  fair  and  equitable  and  that  changing  this  cost  sharing  formula  could 
not only disrupt current LOI commitments but undermine the long-term security ef-
fectiveness  and  efficiency  of  equipment  integration.  TSA  recognizes  that  additional 
airports have expressed an interest in obtaining federal financial support for instal-
lation  of  in-line  EDS  systems.  TSA  is  determining  where  there  is  greatest  need  for 
the  installation  of  in-line  EDS  systems.  In  addition  to  the  already  executed  eight 
Letters  of  Intent  (LOI)  covering  nine  airports,  TSA  purchases  and  installs  in-line 
EDS  equipment  through  a  variety  of  funding  mechanisms,  especially  Other  Trans-
actional  Agreements  (OTAs).  The  President’s  Budget  also  includes  proposed  lan-
guage  to  permit  the  distribution  of  funds  from  the  Aviation  Security  Capital  Fund 
based on the greatest benefit to aviation security, rather than a non-security related 
formula. 

The FY 2006 request includes $165 million in increased funds for screener payroll. 
TSA  has  experienced  a  recurring  need  to  reprogram  funds  from  other  programs  to 
support the 45,000 screener FTE. The estimate for increased FY 2006 payroll funds 
is based on actual FY 2004 and FY 2005 experience to date and incorporates higher 
benefit and other adjustments previously supported through reprogrammings. These 
increased funds in FY 2006 will stabilize the screener payroll base and should elimi-
nate  the  need  for  reprogrammings  in  the  future.  With  these  additional  funds,  TSA 
will  continue  to  ensure  security  and  adequate  wait  time  performance,  especially  at 
larger airports. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

The  second  decision  unit,  Aviation  Direction  and  Enforcement,  includes  activities 
that  ensure  that  TSA  continues  to  build  a  strong  security  regulation  and  enforce-
ment presence on-site at the nation’s commercial airports. Funding requested under 
this  decision  unit  supports  air  cargo  and  airport  regulation  compliance  through  in-
spections, TSA-certified explosives detection canine teams, and reimbursements pro-
vided to state and local law enforcement for support provided at commercial airport 
checkpoints.  This  decision  unit  also  includes  the  airport  management  and  direction 
staff,  airport  information  technology  (IT)  connectivity,  and  administrative  support. 
This  unit  also  supports  the  Transportation  Security  Operations  Center  (TSOC), 
which  serves  as  the  24/7  operations  center  (command  center)  for  transportation  se-
curity-related  operations,  incidents,  or  crises  for  TSA,  interfacing  directly  with  the 
DHS Homeland Security Operations Center for good information-flow with DHS. In 
FY 2005, TSA is budgeting to spend $862 million for these programs. 

The  President’s  Budget  proposes  to  recover  the  majority  of  the  Aviation  Security 
funds through aviation security user fees, specifically the passenger security fee and 
the air carrier fee (Aviation Security Infrastructure Fee (ASIF)). The original intent 
of  the  Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  (ATSA),  Pub.  L.  107–71,  was  for 
the newly created aviation user fees to cover TSA’s cost for aviation security. ATSA 
also  capped  the  fees  but  in  a  way  that  indicates  Congress  assumed  TSA’s  costs 
would be fully recovered even with those caps. However, currently, the government 
and  taxpayers  are  shouldering  the  majority  of  the  costs  of  civil  aviation  security 
rather  than  passengers  and  air  carriers.  For  example,  in  the  first  two  years  since 
TSA  was  created,  the  FY02  and  FY03  total  security  fee  collections  comprised  ap-
proximately 30 percent of total TSA costs for civil aviation security. These fees fund-
ed  approximately  41  percent  of  the  agency’s  aviation  security  costs  for  FY04,  and, 
if the current fee levels continue, estimates for FY05 and FY06 show that the secu-
rity fees would be less than 50 percent of the costs of aviation security costs. 

Since it costs TSA significantly more to provide aviation security than the agency 
collects in fees, the proposed budget is designed to have the airline passenger, rath-
er than the general taxpayer, cover more of TSA’s aviation security cost in the inter-
est  of  fairness  and  equity.  The  2006  Budget  proposes  to  increase  the  passenger  fee 
by $3.00, raising the fee on a typical flight from $2.50 to $5.50. For passengers trav-
eling multiple legs on a one-way trip, that fee would rise from the current maximum 
of  $5.00  to  $8.00.  If  this  adjustment  is  adopted,  the  revised  fee  would  ensure  near 
full recovery of aviation screening costs. TSA would cover nearly 80 percent of esti-
mated  total  TSA  aviation  screening  costs  through  aviation  security  fees  (equivalent 
to  more  than  90  percent  of  the  total  of  airport-specific  security  cost).  Consequently, 
resources  from  the  general  taxpayer  could  be  used  for  more  broadly  applicable 
homeland security needs. 

The  Budget  also  assumes  a  lower  collection  level  for  the  air  carrier  fee  than  was 
assumed in the proposed FY 2005 budget. TSA would set the amount of the fee col-
lected  at  $350  million  in  FY  2006,  a  reduction  from  the  $750  million  presumed  to 
be  collected  in  the  requested  level  in  FY  2005.  We  note  that,  consistent  with  the 
DHS  Appropriations  Act,  2005,  the  Government  Accountability  Office  is  currently 
conducting  an  audit  to  help  determine  what  the  proper  air  carrier  fee  collections 
should be based on the criteria set forth in ATSA. 
Surface Transportation Security 

The  Surface  Transportation  Security  appropriation  includes  resources  for  TSA’s 
security  operations  in  all  non-aviation  modes  of  transportation.  Such  operations  in-
clude  developing  best  practices,  standards,  and  regulations  to  protect  the  transpor-
tation infrastructure; conducting inspections to monitor and enforce compliance with 
standards  and  regulations;  designing  and  implementing  vulnerability  assessment 
models for all surface transportation modes; and strengthening industry stakeholder 
partnerships  through  sustained  information  sharing.  TSA’s  FY  2005  spending  plan 
includes  $128.8  million  for  these  programs,  plus  $27  million  in  anticipated  receipts 
from  fee  programs.  The  budget  requests  $32  million  for  the  Surface  Transportation 
Security appropriation in FY 2006. These funds will maintain TSA’s various surface 
transportation  security  initiatives,  including  the  surface  transportation  inspectors 
that focus primarily on rail security. 
Transportation Security Support 

The  third  appropriation,  Transportation  Security  Support,  supports  the  oper-
ational needs of TSA’s extensive airport/field personnel and infrastructure. TSA has 
developed  and  will  maintain  a  flat  organizational  structure  that  emphasizes  front-
line  service  delivery  with  well-trained  managers  that  are  supported  by  an  array  of 
services.  Included  in  this  appropriation  is  funding  for  headquarters  facilities  and 
staff, Transportation Security Intelligence Service (TSIS), and rent, furniture, park-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

ing  and  transit  benefits.  The  FY  2005  TSA  budget  includes  $771.9  million  for  the 
full range of support activities. TSA requests $545 million in FY 2006 for the Trans-
portation  Security  Support  appropriation.  These  funds  will  ensure  that  TSA’s 
screeners  and  other  operational  employees  have  sufficient  intelligence,  information 
technology,  policy  direction,  administrative  services,  and  other  key  support  to  ac-
complish  the  agency’s  mission.  TSA  will  continue  to  seek  opportunities  to  increase 
efficiencies in these programs through innovative approaches and improved manage-
ment. 
Strengthening Security Through Information Technology Connectivity 

The  President’s  FY  2006  budget  request  includes  an  increase  of  $174  million  for 
High  Speed  Operational  Connectivity  (Hi-SOC)  to  continue  our  efforts  to  deploy  at 
more  than  200  sites.  This  request  supports  a  key  DHS  strategic  objective  of  pro-
viding operational end users with the technology and capabilities to detect and pre-
vent  terrorist  attacks,  means  of  terrorism  and  other  illegal  activities.  The  DHS  Of-
fice  of  the  Chief  Information  Office  (CIO)  Council  identifies  TSA  connectivity  as  its 
number one requirement. 

Hi-SOC  is  a  critical  investment  for  TSA  that  will  greatly  impact  DHS’s  mission 
performance.  Without  these  funds,  379  out  of  600  (63  percent)  field  sites,  including 
airports, will continue to communicate and provide security-related information over 
dial-up Internet connections. As a result, FSDs have reported download times of two 
or more hours when attempting to access Security Directives, On Line Learning pro-
grams, Human Resource capabilities and TSA and DHS websites. Further, at some 
of  the  largest  airports  in  the  country  there  is  little  to  no  telephone  or  computer 
interconnectivity  among  administrative  spaces,  screening  areas  and  baggage  areas. 
If  a  security  incident  were  to  occur  in  one  area  of  the  airport,  a  critical  time  delay 
in transmitting information to another key operating element could create a risk of 
enormous magnitude. Overall, Hi-Soc will:

• Increase Training Efficiency and Screener Effectiveness while minimizing costs. 
As  of  June  22,  2004,  TSA  has  deployed  network  connectivity  to  1,822  of  4,052 
(45  percent)  of  the  training  computers  located  at  120  of  440  (27  percent)  Fed-
eralized  airports.  This  network  connectivity  has  provided  access  to  the  Online 
Learning  Center  for  these  airports,  yet  the  majority  of  the  federal  screeners 
must endure long download times or rely on alternate means to take their man-
datory  training,  making  it  difficult  for  them  to  access  programs  to  help  them 
stay  abreast  of  the  most  current  security  threats.  Additionally,  supervisors  at 
these  locations  must  perform  manual  data  management  for  their  training 
records. 
Hi-SOC will also provide a much more efficient method of developing and trans-
mitting  training  materials  to  airports.  Currently,  the  Workforce  Performance 
and Training Office (WPT) must use a high cost and labor-intensive distribution 
process,  which  includes  the  production  of  computer  disk  training  material  (ap-
proximately $110,000 per year, with 20 mass distributions). 
Today,  screener  training  results  cannot  be  collected  or  aggregated.  As  a  result, 
the WPT cannot correlate training results down to the individual screener level 
nor  tailor  remedial  training  material  at  the  screener  level.  Hi-SOC  will  enable 
training  results  data  to  be  aggregated  quickly  and  ensure  data  is  immediately 
available  to  local  airport  screener  managers  and  others  to  facilitate  improve-
ment in screener workforce performance.

• Improve  Overall  IT  and  Aviation  Security.  Because  airport  computers  are  not 
connected  to  the  TSA  network,  TSA  cannot  maintain  information  security  on 
the computers or deploy quick security patches to the computers, making these 
computers  potentially  vulnerable  to  hackers  and  virus  infections.  Hi-SOC  will 
provide  much  better  protection  through  an  overall  computer  network  with  se-
cure communications and tested capabilities.

• Enhance Aviation and Surface Security. High speed connectivity is necessary to 
deploy  and  implement  fully  several  security  programs  that  have  been  or  are 
being  developed.  These  programs  include  Electronic  Surveillance  System  (a  re-
mote  camera  system  for  performance  monitoring,  potential  facial  recognition 
technology)  and  Transportation  Workers  Identification  Credential  (TWIC).  Hi-
SOC will also greatly increase the efficiency and decrease the cost of the Threat 
Image Projection program (a threat detection training and performance process 
using images of prohibited items to simulate a threat) by allowing performance 
data to be accessed from headquarters and enabling rapid updates of the threat 
image  library,  in  lieu  of  manual  updates  to  x-ray  machines  at  airports  across 
the country.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

Strengthening Security Through Emerging Checkpoint Technologies 

15

TSA  is  committed  to  enhancing  technological  support  to  the  screening  workforce 
at  the  passenger  checkpoint.  Of  the  many  technology-related  activities  that  con-
tribute to this goal, a key element is deploying emerging technology. The President’s 
budget  proposes  an  increase  of  $43.7  million  for  Emerging  Checkpoint  Explosives 
Technology. 

The  9/11  Commission  recommended  that  DHS  take  immediate  action  to  improve 
explosives  screening  of  all  higher  risk  passengers  at  airport  screening  checkpoints. 
TSA  will  devote  a  total  of  $100  million  to  this  initiative  in  Fiscal  Years  2005  and 
2006  to  ensure  that  all  higher  risk  passengers  receive  improved  explosives  screen-
ing. This will reduce the need for extensive pat-down screening. 

In  FY  2005,  TSA  received  $28.3  million  in  resources  for  the  first  time  to  field 
emerging  technology  equipment  at  checkpoints.  These  resources  will  be  used  to  ac-
quire  technologies  that  had  recently  been  developed  and  will  improve  the  effective-
ness of checkpoints today. This funding will facilitate the purchase and deployment 
of  147  static  trace  portals,  a  passenger  screening  sub-system  using  a  whole  body 
portal  to  inspect  passengers  for  concealed  explosives  using  an  automated,  non-con-
tact trace sampling and processing system. The selected sites for this initial deploy-
ment effort will include 40 of the Nation’s largest airports. TSA will use the portals 
to screen those passengers identified as selectees for the presence of explosives. Use 
of the portals will limit the need to conduct selectee pat-down searches to those who 
cause the trace portal or walk through metal detector to alarm. TSA anticipates that 
the  use  of  this  technology  will  also  decrease  passenger  processing  times  and  mini-
mize the impact on the traveling public. 

TSA  is  also  piloting  explosives  trace  detection  document  scanners  that  are  de-
signed  to  collect  explosives  particles  from  travel  documents  that  a  passenger  has 
handled.  The  first  generation  of  this  technology,  currently  being  tested  at  four  air-
ports, is a manual system that requires the screener to handle the document during 
the  screening  process.  TSA  is  working  with  industry  to  develop  an  automated  sys-
tem,  which  will  allow  the  document  to  be  inserted  into  the  technology  directly, 
eliminating the need for screener interaction. 

For FY 2006 the Administration is requesting $43.7 million in addition to the ex-
isting $28.3 million in base resources to direct additional resources to this important 
initiative.  With  this  funding,  TSA  is  planning  to  purchase  an  additional  195  trace 
portal  units,  which  will  allow  us  to  expand  the  deployment  of  trace  portals  to  41 
additional airports. Additionally in FY 2006, we anticipate that an automated explo-
sives  trace  detection  document  scanner  will  be  ready  for  purchase  and  deployment. 
TSA  also  will  deploy  improved  technology  for  screening  checked  baggage.  $394 
million of the $617 million requested for EDS/ETD for FY 2006 (including contribu-
tions  of  $250  million  from  the  mandatory  funded  Aviation  Security  Capital  Fund) 
will  be  used  to  purchase  and  install  EDS  (which  includes  Next  Generation  (Next 
Gen)  and  ETDs  for  needed  life-cycle  replacement).  These  purchases  are  part  of  the 
agency’s deployment plan to change the mix of stand alone EDS and ETD machines. 
Next  Gen  EDS  availability  is  a  direct  result  of  prior  year  investments  in  the  re-
search  and  development  of  Checkpoint  and  Electronic  Baggage  screening  systems. 
These systems are expected to provide improved detection capabilities and improved 
passenger  and  baggage  throughput;  are  smaller  in  size  in  some  instances;  and  are 
expected  to  reduce  staffing  requirements  and  minimize  industry/customer  impact. 
Operational expenditures are expected to be reduced because Next Gen development 
is  divided  into  two  categories,  short  term  and  long  term.  Deployment  of  short  term 
Next  Gen  solutions  will  begin  in  FY  2005  and  continue  through  FY  2006.  One  of 
the two Next Gen projects that will be pilot tested in FY 2005 will be Reveal Tech-
nologies  CT–80.  This  technology,  while  still  CT  (computed  tomography/cat  scan) 
based,  is  much  smaller  and  less  expensive  than  the  current  certified  EDS  tech-
nologies.  We  will  be  purchasing  eight  units  from  Reveal  for  operational  testing  at 
three  airports  within  the  next  several  months.  Then,  TSA  will  review  the  results 
of  the  pilots  to  determine  the  appropriate  next  steps.  The  other  Next  Gen  product 
currently  undergoing  certification  testing  is  an  upgrade  to  one  of  the  current  high-
throughput  EDS  technologies.  This  upgrade  will  increase  throughput  capacity,  re-
duce  alarm  rates  and  significantly  enhance  the  image  quality  presented  to  our 
screeners. With these improvements, we anticipate that fewer bags will require res-
olution  screening,  thereby  reducing  the  manpower  needed  to  clear  bags  that  cause 
an alarm. 

Long  term,  Next  Gen  solutions  are  under  development  and  may  be  deployable  in 
FY  2009  and  beyond.  The  mix  of  equipment  would  change  as  it  could  be  possible 
that one Next Gen EDS could replace up to three ETD machines for primary screen-
ing, depending upon throughput requirements. We anticipate that one ETD will still 
be deployed with Next Gen EDS for use in alarm resolution. This solution will pro-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

16

vide increased EDS security benefits and expand EDS capabilities to cover all oper-
ations at airports that have only partial EDS capabilities. 

In the past, the TSA budget has contained requests for research and development 
(R&D)  funding.  The  TSA  R&D  program  consists  of  research  and  development  per-
formed  at  the  Transportation  Security  Lab  (TSL)  in  Atlantic  City,  New  Jersey,  ap-
plied research and development efforts for weapons detection, as well as infrastruc-
ture  and  conveyance,  Next  Gen  Explosives  Detection  Systems,  and  development  of 
Air  Cargo  technology.  These  programs  received  a  total  of  $178  million  in  the  FY 
2005 Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Appropriations Act. For FY 2006, the 
research and development elements of these programs would be permanently trans-
ferred  to  the  DHS  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  (S&T).  A  significant  portion  of 
the  R&D  budget  and  a  portion  of  TSL  full  time  equivalents  (FTE)  are  proposed  to 
be transferred to S&T in the FY 2006 request. TSA will retain $23 million, as well 
as  14  FTEs  needed  to  ensure  the  agency  can  continue  to  meet  its  operational  mis-
sion  and  to  liaison  with  S&T  for  defining  program  requirements  and  integrating 
R&D products into operations. 
Strengthening Security of Surface Transportation 

TSA  also  enhances  security  for  America’s  surface  transportation  systems,  while 
ensuring  freedom  of  movement  of  people  and  commerce.  America’s  transportation 
system includes approximately 775 million passengers traveling on buses each year 
and  over  9  billion  passenger  trips  on  mass  transit  per  year;  over  140,000  miles  of 
railroad  track  (of  which  120,000  miles  are  privately  owned),  3.8  million  miles  of 
roads  (46,717  miles  of  Interstate  highway  and  114,700  miles  of  National  Highway 
System  roads),  582,000  bridges  over  20  feet  of  span,  54  tunnels  over  500  meters  in 
length,  nearly  2.2  million  miles  of  pipeline;  and  nearly  800,000  shipments  of  haz-
ardous materials transported everyday (95 percent by truck). 

To  help  achieve  greater  security  for  surface  transportation,  TSA  is  the  DHS  re-
sponsible agency for developing the Transportation Sector-Specific Plan (TSSP) and 
Transportation  Security  Operations  Plans  (TSOP)  (i.e.,  modal  security  plans).  The 
plans are being developed in accordance with Homeland Security Presidential Direc-
tive  7  (HSPD–7),  the  developing  National  Infrastructure  Protection  Plan  (NIPP), 
and  Congressional  direction.  They  will  serve  a  critical  purpose  by  providing  the 
framework  and  defining  the  responsibilities  for  risk  management  of  the  Transpor-
tation Sector. TSA has worked closely with Information Analysis and Infrastructure 
Protection  Directorate  (IAIP)  and  the  Department  of  Transportation  to  develop  the 
Transportation Sector Specific Plan (TSSP) under the guidance of Border and Trans-
portation  Security  Directorate  (BTS).  The  TSSP  and  TSOP  will  provide  important 
guidance for TSA’s surface transportation security work. 

As evidenced by last year’s rail bombings in Madrid, there is an ongoing potential 
threat  to  our  domestic,  intermodal  transportation  system  that  requires  intermodal 
countermeasures.  TSA  has  regulatory  authority  for  all  of  surface  transportation  se-
curity and utilizes a threat-based risk management system to ensure transportation 
security  and  to  direct  the  investment  of  resources.  Transportation  security  is  a 
shared  public/private  responsibility,  and  with  this  in  mind,  TSA  coordinates  and 
leverages  government  and  industry  efforts  to  develop  security  plans  and  standards 
for intermodal transportation. 

This  approach  provides  consistency  among  modes  and  recognizes  transportation 
security  in  the  context  of  intermodal,  interdependent  and  international  concerns. 
TSA continues to work with modal administrators within the Department of Trans-
portation  and  industry  stakeholders  to  establish  best  practices  and  national  stand-
ards,  develop  security  plans  and  regulations,  better  assess  security  vulnerabilities, 
and identify needed security enhancements for surface transportation modes and re-
lated infrastructure. In FY 2005, it is anticipated that TSA will:

• Build  upon  the  pilot  project  efforts  and  initiatives  commenced  in  FY  2004  to 
identify  best  practices,  develop  performance-based  standards  and  regulations, 
and  build  risk-based  security  plans,  such  as  identifying  Hazmat  transportation 
security vulnerabilities and mitigation strategies.
• As  delegated  by  IAIP,  continue  to  develop  and  implement  vulnerability  assess-
ment models for all surface modes as the basis for identifying security gaps and 
developing mitigation.
• In  coordination  with  IAIP,  strengthen  industry  stakeholder  partnerships  to  fa-
cilitate  information  sharing  through  the  transition  from  Information  Sharing 
Analysis  Centers  (ISACs)  to  Sector  Coordinating  Councils  and  Government  Co-
ordinating Councils.
• Increase security awareness and response by providing security awareness ma-
terials  for  surface  transportation  employees,  operators,  and  passengers;  con-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

ducting national security exercises; and continuing to provide transportation se-
curity guidance, support, and coordination for National Special Security Events.
• Provide  operational  support  and  expertise  to  Office  of  State  and  Local  Govern-
ment  Coordination  and  Preparedness  in  the  non-aviation  transportation  secu-
rity grant selection process.

• Hire and deploy 100 surface transportation compliance inspectors, who will first 
focus  on  rail  security,  to  enhance  the  level  of  national  transportation  security 
by leveraging private and public partnerships through a consistent national pro-
gram  of  compliance  reviews,  audits,  and  enforcement  actions  pertaining  to  re-
quired standards and directives.

In presenting our budget, we understand our responsibility towards the American 
public  to  be  good  stewards  of  the  funds  entrusted  to  us.  TSA  has  achieved  an  un-
qualified  audit  opinion  for  FY  2004,  its  fourth  consecutive  clean  audit.  In  FY  2005, 
TSA  is  striving  to  maintain  its  clean  audit  record  and  correct  any  internal  control 
weaknesses noted in audit reports. With the transition to DHS behind us, TSA con-
tinues  to  implement  more  efficient  and  effective  financial  management  processes 
across the organization. 

In  conclusion,  I  want  to  express,  as  I  have  in  the  past,  how  proud  I  am  of  TSA’s 
security  screening  workforce.  Our  screeners  have  carried  out  their  responsibilities 
with skill and professionalism in a challenging and ever-changing environment. This 
past  year  was  particularly  challenging  with  the  large  number  of  National  Special 
Security  Events,  for  which  many  of  our  screeners  and  other  personnel  provided 
unique  support.  The  reality  of  TSA’s  mission  is  such  that  we  must  constantly  be 
prepared  to  provide  on  a  24/7  basis  the  highest  level  of  security  we  can  within  the 
resources we have been provided. The increasing variety and sophistication of weap-
ons  and  communication  tools  available  to  modern  terrorists  presents  a  significant 
challenge. 

While  our  security  screening  workforce  is  on  the  front  lines,  headquarters  staff 
and  TSA  leadership  maintain  the  vigilance  necessary  to  support  our  vital  mission. 
Each day, I meet with TSA leaders at an Operations/Intelligence briefing to address 
key operational and intelligence issues as they arise and to ensure that appropriate 
action  is  taken.  While  we  are  aware  that  the  risk  of  terrorism  will  likely  never  be 
eliminated,  that  risk  has  been  greatly  reduced.  TSA  will  continue  to  identify  and 
evaluate threats and vulnerabilities and to implement measures that both facilitate 
transportation and improve its security. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  this  information.  TSA  looks  forward  to 
working with the Committee as we continue our efforts to strengthen homeland se-
curity. I will be pleased to answer any questions you may have.

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Ms.  Berrick,  the  Director  of  Homeland  Security  and  Justice  at 

the GAO, please. 

AND 

JUSTICE, 

SECURITY 

STATEMENT  OF  CATHLEEN  A.  BERRICK,  DIRECTOR,  HOME-
GOVERNMENT

LAND 
ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 
Ms.  BERRICK.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the 
Committee,  for  the  opportunity  to  discuss  TSA’s  budget  request 
today and efforts to secure the transportation system. 

My testimony today describes DHS and TSA efforts in managing 
risks  and  allocating  resources  across  transportation  modes  and  in 
integrating  screening  and  R&D  efforts  to  achieve  efficiencies,  as 
proposed in the President’s budget. 

TSA should be commended for the many initiatives they have un-
dertaken  since  September  11th  to  strengthen  security.  These  in-
clude  purchasing  and  deploying  equipment  to  screen  checked  bag-
gage  for  explosives  and  hiring  a  federal  work  force  of  over  40,000. 
However, we have found that, in allocating its resources, TSA could 
improve in conducting the systematic planning needed to prioritize 
their efforts. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

18

With  respect  to  baggage  screening,  we  found  that,  having  ini-
tially  fielded  equipment  to  screen  checked  baggage  for  explosives, 
TSA  has  not  conducted  the  planning  needed  to  optimize  effi-
ciencies.  TSA  has  estimated  that  integrating  screening  equipment 
in  line  with  airport  baggage  conveyor  systems,  although  requiring 
a significant up-front investment, could result in savings of over $1 
billion to the Federal Government over 7 years for the nine airports 
they  reviewed.  This  estimated  savings  is  due,  in  large  part,  to  the 
significantly fewer number of screeners that will be required to op-
erate the machines. 

We  also  found  that  airport  passenger  and  baggage  screeners  do 
not always receive the required training that they were required to 
have.  This  is  due,  in  part,  to  a  lack  of  highspeed  Internet  access 
at airport facilities. Only 27 percent of airports currently have this 
access.  The  President’s  budget  request  for  additional  funds  to  in-
stall  this  access  should  help  airports  make  this  training  available 
to all screeners. 

We also found that TSA plans to implement a threat-based risk-
managed  approach  to  securing  air  cargo.  However,  TSA  must  take 
a number of actions before they can move forward with their plans. 
These include developing a data base to help them target high-risk 
shippers and finalizing criteria for profiling high-risk cargo. 

DHS  has  also  proposed  in  the  budget  request  two  key  organiza-
tional  changes  designed  to  achieve  synergy  and  avoid  duplication 
of  efforts.  These  changes  include  creating  an  Office  of  Screening 
Coordination  and  Operations  that  would  combine  several  terrorist-
related  screening  activities,  and  consolidating  their  R&D  efforts  at 
the  DHS  level.  We  commend  DHS  in  attempting  to  achieve  effi-
ciencies  through  this  consolidation.  As  they  move  forward,  it  will 
be  important  to  define  program  commonalities  and  roles  and  re-
sponsibilities. 

DHS  will  also  need  to  address  existing  challenges  that  we  have 
identified  with  its  screening  and  R&D  programs.  These  challenges 
include  developing  a  comprehensive  plan  for  managing  the  trans-
portation workers identification credential and increasing coordina-
tion  between  DHS  and  other  federal  agencies,  including  the  De-
partment of Transportation, related to R&D activities. 

We  are  encouraged  that  the  President’s  budget  request  outlines 
that TSA plans to integrate a risk-management approach into their 
decision-making processes. Consistent with this approach, TSA will 
need to conduct rigorous planning and prioritization to help ensure 
they are focusing their resources on the areas of greatest need. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  opening  statement.  I  would  be 

happy to respond to any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Berrick follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CATHLEEN A. BERRICK, DIRECTOR, HOMELAND SECURITY 

AND JUSTICE, GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee: 
I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  today’s  hearing  to  discuss  the  secu-
rity  of  our  nation’s  transportation  system  and  the  numerous  initiatives  under  way 
and planned intended to strengthen security. Following the terrorist attacks of Sep-
tember  11,  2001,  much  attention  was  focused  on  securing  our  commercial  aviation 
system.  Since  that  time,  emphasis  on  other  modes  of  transportation  has  grown  as 
vulnerabilities  are  identified  and  highlighted,  such  as  attempts  to  introduce  weap-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

19

ons of mass destruction into the United States through ports, or to launch chemical 
attacks  on  mass  transit  systems.  Critical  transportation  systems  crisscross  the  na-
tion  and  extend  beyond  our  borders  to  move  millions  of  passengers  and  tons  of 
freight each day, making them both attractive targets and difficult to secure. Secur-
ing  these  systems  is  further  complicated  by  their  nature  and  scope,  the  number  of 
stakeholders  involved,  and  the  need  to  balance  security  with  the  expeditious  flow 
of  people  and  goods  through  these  systems.  The  Department  of  Homeland  Security 
(DHS)  and  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  face  the  daunting 
challenge of determining how to allocate their finite resources to manage risks while 
addressing threats and enhancing security across all transportation modes. 

My  testimony  today  describes  DHS  and  TSA  efforts  in  managing  risks  and  allo-
cating  resources  across  aviation  and  surface  transportation  modes,  and  in  inte-
grating  screening,  credentialing,  and  research  and  development  (R&D)  efforts  to 
achieve efficiencies. My comments are based on issued GAO reports and testimonies 
addressing the security of U.S. aviation and surface transportation systems, and our 
review  of  the  President’s  budget  request  for  Fiscal  Year  2006.  Appendix  I  contains 
a list of related GAO products released since September 11, 2001. 
Summary 

DHS and TSA have undertaken numerous initiatives to strengthen transportation 
security, particularly in aviation, and their efforts should be commended. Since Sep-
tember  11th,  for  example,  in  addition  to  hiring  and  deploying  a  workforce  of  over 
40,000 airport passenger and baggage screeners, TSA has:

transportation system.

and to develop performance measures to assess screener performance.

• Installed equipment at most of the nation’s more than 400 commercial airports 
to provide the capability to screen all checked baggage using explosive detection 
systems, as mandated by Congress.
• Taken  numerous  steps  to  expand  training  available  to  the  screener  workforce 
• Outlined  a  threat-based,  risk-management  approach  for  securing  the  air  cargo 
• Taken  actions  to  evaluate  and  enhance  the  security  of  airport  perimeters  and 
• Partnered with federal agencies and state governments and the general aviation 
• Implemented  a  Screening  Partnership  Program  through  which  commercial  air-
ports  can  apply  to  TSA  to  use  private  rather  than  federal  passenger  and  bag-
gage screeners.
• Issued security regulations for passenger rail assets, and begun to conduct criti-

the controls that limit access into secured airport areas.

industry in securing general aviation operations.

cality assessments of stations, tunnels, and bridges.

DHS  has  also  proposed,  in  its  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request,  two  key  changes 
in its organizational structure that are designed to achieve synergy and avoid dupli-
cation of effort. These changes include creating an Office of Screening Coordination 
and  Operations  within  the  Border  and  Transportation  Security  Directorate  that 
would  combine  several  ongoing,  terrorist-related  screening  initiatives,  and  consoli-
dating  its  R&D  efforts—currently  spread  across  four  DHS  component  agencies  in-
cluding TSA—inside its Science and Technology Directorate. 

While these are commendable efforts, we also found that TSA had not always im-
plemented a risk management approach, or conducted the systematic analysis need-
ed,  to  inform  its  decision-making  processes  and  to  prioritize  its  security  improve-
ments.  While  we  recognize  that  fully  integrating  a  risk  management  approach  is 
challenging  for  any  organization,  our  work  has  shown  that  such  an  approach  can 
help  inform  decision  makers  in  allocating  finite  resources  to  the  areas  of  greatest 
need.  For  example,  we  found  that  since  the  initial  deployment  of  equipment  to 
screen checked baggage for explosives at commercial airports in response to congres-
sional mandates, TSA has not conducted the systematic planning needed to optimize 
the deployment and integration of this equipment. Limited analysis has shown that 
the  integration  of  this  equipment  in-line  with  airport  baggage  conveyor  systems—
rather than maintaining the systems in a stand-alone mode—could result in signifi-
cant  savings  for  the  Federal  Government  for  the  nine  airports  assessed.  We  also 
found that TSA must take a number of actions before a comprehensive risk manage-
ment  approach  can  be  applied  to  securing  air  cargo.  These  actions  include  estab-
lishing  complete  databases  of  known  shippers,  addressing  the  potential  ease  with 
which  shippers  may  become  ‘‘known,’’  and  identifying  and  testing  security  tech-
nologies  in  order  to  develop  and  implement  a  system  to  screen  100  percent  of  high 
risk cargo. We also found that a risk-based approach is being adopted for rail secu-
rity. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

In  addition,  while  we  applaud  DHS’s  efforts  to  achieve  efficiencies  through 
leveraging  resources  and  technology  and  improving  internal  coordination  through 
proposed  organizational  changes,  it  will  be  important  for  DHS  to  address  several 
challenges  that  have  been  identified  with  respect  to  these  programs  as  the  integra-
tion  moves  forward.  Restructuring  alone  will  not  resolve  all  existing  challenges  or 
ensure  the  successful  integration  and  achievement  of  DHS’s  goals.  The  challenges 
we  identified  include  developing  regulations  identifying  eligibility  requirements  for 
the  Transportation  Workers  Identification  Credential,  and  instituting  a  comprehen-
sive  plan  for  managing  the  project.  DHS  will  also  need  to  include  goals  with  meas-
urable  objectives  in  its  R&D  strategic  plans,  prepare  and  use  risk  assessments  to 
select and prioritize R&D projects, and coordinate with R&D stakeholders. 
Background 

The  nation’s  transportation  system  is  a  vast,  interconnected  network  of  diverse 
modes.  Key  modes  of  transportation  include  aviation;  highways;  motor  carrier 
(trucking);  motor  coach  (intercity  bus);  maritime;  pipeline;  rail  (passenger  and 
freight); and transit (buses, subways, ferry boats, and light rail). The nation’s trans-
portation  systems  are  inherently  open  environments,  designed  to  move  people  and 
commerce  quickly  to  their  destinations.  For  example,  the  nation’s  transportation 
system moves over 30 million tons of freight and provides approximately 1.1 billion 
passenger trips each day. The diversity and size of the transportation system make 
it vital to our economy and national security. 

TSA  is  responsible  for  the  security  of  all  modes  of  transportation,  as  outlined  in 
the  Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  (ATSA)  (Pub.  L.  107–71).  Following 
the  passage  of  ATSA,  TSA  began  addressing  two  major  challenges—procuring  and 
installing  explosives  detection  systems  (EDS)  and  explosive  trace  detection  (ETD) 
systems to screen checked baggage for explosives, 1 and hiring and deploying federal 
screeners to screen passengers and their baggage at commercial airports nationwide. 
TSA  is  also  tasked  with  managing  security  risks  to  surface  transportation  systems. 
These systems include 9 billion passenger trips per year on the nation’s mass tran-
sit  systems,  over  161,000  miles  of  interstate  and  national  highways  and  their  inte-
grated  bridges  and  tunnels,  and  nearly  800,000  shipments  of  hazardous  materials. 
Risk Management Approach 

Given  the  vast  transportation  network,  quick  and  easy  access  for  passengers  and 
cargo must be maintained while identifying the best possible strategies for security. 
The  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  recognizes  the  need  for  TSA  to 
identify,  prioritize,  and  manage  risks,  and  mitigate  the  impact  of  potential  inci-
dents, to help ensure that the best strategies are pursued. Consistent with this goal, 
GAO  has  advocated  the  need  to  implement—at  TSA  and  throughout  the  Federal 
Government—a  risk  management  approach  for  prioritizing  efforts  and  focusing  re-
sources. A risk management approach entails a continuous process of managing risk 
through  a  series  of  actions,  including  setting  strategic  goals  and  objectives,  assess-
ing  risk,  evaluating  alternatives,  selecting  initiatives  to  undertake,  and  imple-
menting and monitoring those initiatives. 

Assessing  risk,  a  critical  component  of  a  risk  management  approach,  involves 
three key elements—threats, vulnerabilities, and criticality—that provide input into 
the decision-making process. A threat assessment identifies and evaluates potential 
threats  on  the  basis  of  factors  such  as  capabilities,  intentions,  and  past  activities. 
A  vulnerability  assessment  identifies  weaknesses  that  may  be  exploited  by  identi-
fied  threats  and  suggests  options  to  address  those  weaknesses.  A  criticality  assess-
ment evaluates and prioritizes assets and functions in terms of specific criteria, such 
as  their  importance  to  public  safety  and  the  economy,  as  a  basis  for  identifying 
which  structures  or  processes  are  relatively  more  important  to  protect  from  attack. 
Information  from  these  three  assessments  can  lead  to  a  risk  characterization,  such 
as  high,  medium,  or  low,  and  provides  input  for  prioritizing  security  initiatives. 2 
Figure 1 depicts a risk management cycle.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

President’s Budget Request for Fiscal Year 2006

In  addressing  security  needs  and  challenges  for  all  transportation  modes,  the 
President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  categorizes  TSA  activities  into  three 
main  areas:  (1)  Aviation  Security,  (2)  Surface  Transportation  Security,  and  (3) 
Transportation  Security  Support. 3 Each  of  these  areas  is  summarized  in  detail 
below  and  the  total  funds  requested  are  presented  in  table  1  that  follows  the  sum-
mary. 

Aviation  security  includes  two  distinct  decision  units:  screening  workforce  and 
equipment, and aviation direction and enforcement. Screening workforce and equip-
ment includes funding to support passenger and baggage screener activities such as 
screener salaries and training, and the purchase and installation of screening equip-
ment.  Aviation  direction  and  enforcement  includes  regulation  compliance  for  air 
cargo, airports, and airlines through inspections and other efforts, and airport tech-
nology  activities  and  administrative  support.  The  budget  requests  about  $5  billion 
for  the  aviation  security  appropriation  for  Fiscal  Year  2006.  These  funds  will  sup-
port the current federalized and privatized screener workforce, provide training and 
other  support  for  both  passenger  and  baggage  screening,  and  continue  other  avia-
tion  security  regulation  and  enforcement  activities.  Increases  were  requested  for, 
among  other  things,  the  screener  workforce,  checkpoint  explosive  detection  tech-
nology, and high-speed information technology connectivity. The budget request fur-
ther  identified  the  mandatory  $250  million  appropriation  of  the  Aviation  Security 
Capital  Fund  to  assist  in  the  purchase,  installation,  and/or  integration  of  EDS  and 
ETD  systems.  At  these  levels,  TSA  expects  to  maintain  current  security  and  wait 
time performance at over 430 commercial airports. 

Surface transportation security includes resources for TSA’s security operations in 
all non-aviation modes of transportation. Such operations include developing stand-
ards and regulations to protect the transportation infrastructure; conducting inspec-
tions  to  monitor  and  enforce  compliance  with  standards  and  regulations;  designing 
and  implementing  vulnerability  assessment  models  for  all  surface  transportation 
modes;  and  facilitating  information  sharing  with  transportation  stakeholders.  The 
budget requests $32 million for surface transportation security in Fiscal Year 2006. 
These  funds  will  be  used  to  maintain  TSA’s  various  surface  transportation  security 
initiatives,  including  surface  transportation  inspectors  added  during  Fiscal  Year 
2005. 

Transportation  security  support  includes  funding  for  the  operational  needs  of 
TSA’s  airport  and  field  personnel  and  infrastructure.  This  area  also  supports  TSA 
headquarters  and  the  Transportation  Security  Intelligence  Service.  Although  R&D 
funds are also included in this appropriation, the President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budg-
et  request  proposes  that  these  funds  be  transferred  to  the  DHS  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Directorate.  The  budget  requests  $545  million  for  transportation  security 
support  for  Fiscal  Year  2006.  These  funds  will  be  used  to  help  ensure  that  TSA 
screeners  and  other  operational  employees  have  sufficient  intelligence  information, 
information  technology,  management  direction,  administrative  services,  and  other 
key support to accomplish the agency’s mission.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
1
o
a
g
5
1
2

22

TSA  Has  Taken  Steps  to  Strengthen  Aviation  and  Surface  Transportation 

Security, but Better Planning Is Needed 

TSA has taken numerous steps to strengthen aviation and surface transportation 
security and should be commended for its efforts. However, better planning is need-
ed  to  help  ensure  that  these  initiatives  are  focused  on  the  areas  of  greatest  need 
to  assist  TSA  in  achieving  efficiencies  and  enhancing  security.  For  example,  since 
September  11,  for  example,  TSA  has  (1)  installed  EDS  and  ETD  systems  at  most 
of  the  nation’s  commercial  airports  to  provide  the  capability  to  screen  all  checked 
baggage  using  explosive  detection  systems,  (2)  expanded  screener  training  and  de-
veloped  performance  measures  and  indicators  for  the  screening  systems,  (3)  devel-
oped an air cargo strategic plan, and (4) evaluated the security of airport perimeters 
and access controls and provided funds for security equipment. Despite these efforts, 
however,  we  have  consistently  found—because  of  circumstances  beyond  TSA’s  con-
trol  and  a  lack  of  planning—that  TSA  has  not  conducted  the  systematic  analysis 
needed  to  inform  its  decision-making  processes  and  to  prioritize  security  enhance-
ments.  For  example,  we  found  that  TSA  has  not  always  conducted  needed  assess-
ments  of  threats,  vulnerabilities,  and  criticality  in  allocating  its  resources,  and  has 
not fully assessed alternatives that could be pursued to achieve efficiencies and po-
tentially enhance security. Such planning could guide TSA in moving forward in its 
allocation  of  transportation  security  funding  and  assist  it  in  making  wise  invest-
ment decisions while enhancing the security of all transportation modes. 
Systematic  Planning  Needed  to  Optimize  the  Deployment  of  Checked  Baggage 

Screening Systems 

In  February  2005,  we  reported  that  TSA  had  installed  EDS  and  ETD  systems  at 
most of the nation’s more than 400 commercial airports to provide the capability to 
screen all checked baggage using explosive detection systems, as mandated by Con-
gress. 4 Despite  these  efforts,  however,  we  found  that  in  moving  forward,  TSA  had 
not  conducted  the  systematic  planning  needed  to  optimize  the  deployment  of  these 
systems—in particular determining at which airports EDS machines should be inte-
grated  in-line  with  airport  baggage  conveyor  systems  to  achieve  efficiencies.  Such 
planning  is  important  for  TSA  to  be  able  to  ensure  that  it  is  efficiently  allocating 
its limited resources to maximize the effectiveness of its checked baggage screening 
operations and is achieving desired results. 

From  its  creation  in  November  2001  through  September  2004,  TSA  obligated 5 
about $2.5 billion (93 percent) of the approximately $2.7 billion it had budgeted for 
Fiscal  Years  2002  through  2004  for  procuring  and  installing  explosive  detection 
equipment—predominantly  to  screen  checked  baggage  for  explosives—and  making 
associated  airport  modifications  to  accommodate  the  equipment.  Specifically,  TSA 
procured  and  placed  about  1,200  EDS  machines  and  about  6,000  ETD  machines  at 
over 400 airports, and modified airports for the installation of this equipment. Given 
the  congressional  mandate  to  screen  all  checked  baggage  using  explosive  detection 
systems  by  December  31,  2002,  later  extended  to  December  31,  2003,  TSA  worked 
with  a  contractor  to  quickly  deploy  EDS  and  ETD  equipment  to  the  nation’s  air-
ports.  This  response  resulted  in  TSA  placing  stand-alone  ETD  and  the  minivan-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
2
o
a
g
5
1
2

23

sized  EDS  machines—usually  in  airport  lobbies—that  were  not  integrated  in-line 
with  airport  baggage  conveyor  systems.  Some  of  these  interim  lobby  solutions  re-
sulted  in  operational  inefficiencies,  including  requiring  a  greater  number  of  screen-
ers,  as  compared  with  using  EDS  machines  in-line  with  baggage  conveyor  systems. 
Also,  screening  solely  with  ETD  machines  is  more  labor  intensive  and  less  efficient 
than screening using the EDS process. TSA officials stated that they used EDS ma-
chines  in  a  stand-alone  mode  and  ETD  machines  as  an  interim  solution  in  order 
to meet the congressional deadline for screening all checked baggage for explosives. 
Officials  further  stated  that  they  employed  these  interim  solutions  because  of  the 
significant costs required to install in-line systems and the need to reconfigure many 
airports’  baggage  conveyor  systems  to  accommodate  the  equipment.  While  in-line 
EDS  baggage  screening  systems  have  a  number  of  potential  benefits,  including 
streamlining  airport  and  TSA  operations  and  reducing  screening  costs,  these  sys-
tems  are  capital-intensive  because  they  often  require  significant  airport  modifica-
tions, including terminal reconfigurations, new conveyor belt systems, and electrical 
upgrades. 

Since the initial deployment of EDS and ETD equipment, TSA has not conducted 
a systematic analysis of cost savings and other benefits that could be achieved from 
the installation of in-line baggage screening systems. However, TSA has estimated—
through  its  limited  retrospective  analysis  for  the  nine  airports  that  received  letter 
of  intent  (LOI)  funding  agreements 6—that  in-line  baggage  screening  systems  at 
these  airports  could  save  the  Federal  Government  $1.3  billion  over  7  years  com-
pared  with  stand-alone  EDS  systems. 7 TSA  further  estimated  that  it  could  recover 
its initial investment in the in-line systems at these airports in a little over 1 year. 
One factor that significantly affected estimated savings was the number of screeners 
required  to  conduct  screening  when  using  in-line  baggage  screening  systems.  Ac-
cording to TSA’s analysis, in-line EDS systems would reduce by 78 percent the num-
ber  of  TSA  baggage  screeners  and  supervisors  required  to  screen  checked  baggage 
at these nine airports, from 6,645 to 1,477. This analysis indicates the potential for 
cost  savings  through  the  installation  of  in-line  EDS  systems  at  other  airports  and 
provides insights about other key factors likely to influence potential savings. These 
factors include how much an airport’s facilities would have to be modified to accom-
modate  the  in-line  configuration;  TSA’s  costs  to  buy,  install,  and  network  the  EDS 
machines; and subsequent maintenance costs. 

TSA and airport operators are relying on LOIs as their principal method for fund-
ing the modification of airport facilities to incorporate in-line baggage screening sys-
tems.  The  Fiscal  Year  2003  Consolidated  Appropriations  Resolution  approved  the 
use  of  LOIs  as  a  vehicle  to  leverage  Federal  Government  and  industry  funding  to 
support  facility  modification  costs  for  installing  in-line  EDS  baggage  screening  sys-
tems.  When  an  LOI  is  established  to  provide  multiyear  funding  for  a  project,  the 
airport  operator  is  responsible  for  providing—up  front—the  total  funding  needed  to 
complete  the  project.  Work  proceeds  with  the  understanding  that  TSA  will,  if  suffi-
cient funding is appropriated, reimburse the airport operator for a percentage of the 
facility  modification  costs,  with  the  airport  funding  the  remainder  of  the  costs.  The 
LOI does not constitute a binding commitment for federal funds. 

Although  airport  officials  we  interviewed  stated  that  they  will  require  federal 
funding  to  install  in-line  systems—and  TSA  officials  stated  that  additional  airports 
would  benefit  from  in-line  systems  to  achieve  efficiencies  and  for  other  reasons—
TSA  officials  stated  that  they  do  not  have  sufficient  resources  in  their  budget  to 
fund  additional  LOIs  beyond  the  eight  LOIs  that  have  already  been  issued  as  of 
January  2005.  These  eight  LOIs  will  support  the  installation  of  in-line  baggage 
screening  systems  at  nine  airports  for  a  total  cost  to  the  Federal  Government  of 
$957.1  million  over  4  years.  The  Vision  100—Century  of  Aviation  Reauthorization 
Act—among other things, provided for the creation of the Aviation Security Capital 
Fund  to  help  pay  for  placing  EDS  machines  in  line  with  airport  baggage  handling 
systems. The President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget request for TSA provides approxi-
mately $240.5 million for the continued funding of the eight existing LOIs and pro-
vides no funds for new LOI agreements for in-line system integration activities. 

We reported that with the objective of initially fielding EDS and ETD equipment 
largely  accomplished,  TSA  needs  to  shift  its  focus  from  equipping  airports  with  in-
terim  screening  solutions  to  systematically  planning  for  the  more  optimal  deploy-
ment  of  checked  baggage  screening  systems.  Part  of  such  planning  should  include 
analyzing  which  airports  should  receive  federal  support  for  in-line  baggage  screen-
ing  systems  based  on  cost  savings  and  other  benefits  that  could  be  achieved  from 
more  effective  and  efficient  baggage  screening  operations.  Also,  for  airports  where 
in-line systems may not be economically justified, a cost-effectiveness analysis could 
be used to determine the benefits of additional stand-alone EDS machines to screen 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

24

checked  baggage  in  place  of  more  labor-intensive  ETD  machines  currently  used  at 
more than 300 commercial airports. 

To assist TSA in planning for the optimal deployment of checked baggage screen-
ing  systems,  we  recommended  that  TSA  systematically  evaluate  baggage  screening 
needs  at  airports,  including  the  costs  and  benefits  of  installing  in-line  baggage 
screening  systems  at  airports  that  do  not  yet  have  in-line  systems  installed.  DHS 
agreed  with  our  recommendation,  stating  that  TSA  has  initiated  an  analysis  of  de-
ploying  in-line  checked  baggage  screening  systems  and  is  in  the  process  of  formu-
lating  criteria  to  identify  those  airports  that  would  benefit  from  an  in-line  system. 
DHS  also  stated  that  TSA  has  begun  conducting  an  analysis  of  the  airports  that 
rely heavily on ETD machines as the primary checked baggage screening technology 
to  identify  those  airports  that  would  benefit  from  augmenting  ETDs  with  stand-
alone EDS equipment. 
TSA  Is  Taking  Steps  to  Enhance  Screener  Training  and  Measure  Screener

Performance 

Since we first reported on TSA’s passenger screening program in September 2003, 
TSA has taken a number of steps to expand training available to the screener work-
force and to develop performance measures to assess screener performance. With re-
gard to screener training, the President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget requests $91 mil-
lion  to  fully  implement  TSA’s  passenger  and  baggage  screener  training  programs 
and  related  workforce  development  programs  at  the  expected  Fiscal  Year  2006 
screener  workforce  level.  However,  as  we  reported  this  time  last  year,  insufficient 
screener  staffing  and,  at  many  airports,  a  lack  of  high-speed  Internet/intranet 
connectivity have made it difficult for all screeners to receive required training and 
have  access  to  all  courses  offered. 8 Specifically,  we  reported  that  Federal  Security 
Directors 9 at 5 of the 15 category X airports we visited—during our reviews of pas-
senger and baggage screening—stated that it was difficult, if not impossible, to com-
ply with TSA’s recurrent training requirement of 3 hours each week, averaged over 
a  3-month  period. 10 The  directors  stated  that  because  of  staffing  shortages,  they 
were unable to let screeners take required training because it would affect the direc-
tor’s ability to provide adequate screener coverage. 

In  May  2004,  TSA  announced  a  revised  allocation  of  the  45,000  full-time  equiva-
lent  screeners  among  the  nation’s  airports  in  order  to  provide  more  appropriate 
screener coverage. TSA based the allocation on various factors, including forecasted 
air  travel,  hours  of  operation,  baggage  screening  and  checkpoint  configurations, 
types of screening equipment deployed, and actual operating experience. In addition, 
TSA  headquarters  officials  stated  that  TSA  is  factoring  training  requirements  into 
workplace planning efforts, including a new staffing model currently under develop-
ment. 11 However,  it  is  too  soon  to  determine  whether  the  staffing  model  will  ad-
dress  TSA’s  ability  to  provide  required  training  while  maintaining  adequate  cov-
erage  for  screening  operations. 12 The  President’s  request  of  about  $2.7  billion  for 
the screener workforce in Fiscal Year 2006 represents an increase of about $245 mil-
lion over last year’s enacted budget, but maintains the screener staffing level at the 
congressionally mandated ceiling of 45,000 full-time equivalent screeners. 

The  lack  of  high-speed  Internet/intranet  connectivity  at  airport  training  facilities 
has  also  limited  screener  access  to  TSA  training  tools.  TSA  established  its  Online 
Learning  Center  to  provide  passenger  and  baggage  screeners  with  online,  high-
speed access to training courses. However, effective use of the Online Learning Cen-
ter  requires  high-speed  Internet/intranet  access,  which  TSA  has  not  been  able  to 
provide  to  all  airports.  In  February  2004,  we  reported  that  TSA  had  provided 
connectivity to 71 airport locations, including training sites with 927 fully connected 
training computers, and expected to install high-speed connectivity at up to 81 addi-
tional airports by the end of Fiscal Year 2004. 13 However, TSA suspended installa-
tion  of  high-speed  connectivity  at  airports  in  April  2004  when  funding  was  ex-
hausted. Currently, TSA reports that it has provided high-speed connectivity to 120 
airports  with  1,822  fully  connected  training  computers.  TSA  plans  to  continue  to 
distribute  new  training  products  using  other  delivery  channels,  such  as  written 
training  materials  and  CD–ROMs.  However,  we  reported  that  until  TSA  provides 
high-speed  connectivity  at  every  airport,  screeners  at  airports  without  high-speed 
connectivity  will  not  have  access  to  the  full  menu  of  courses  available  through  the 
Online Learning Center. 

The budget request for Fiscal Year 2006 includes $174 million to complete the in-
stallation of high-speed connectivity at the nation’s commercial airports. The budget 
request  stated  that  without  these  funds,  379  out  of  600  (63  percent)  of  the  field 
sites,  including  airports,  will  continue  to  communicate  and  provide  security-related 
information  over  dial-up  Internet  connections,  causing  delays  and  access  problems. 
We  believe  that  the  installation  of  high-speed  connectivity  at  the  nation’s  airports 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

25

will  significantly  increase  screener  access  to  available  training,  thereby  assisting 
TSA  in  strengthening  its  screening  operations.  For  example,  the  budget  request 
stated  that  without  these  funds,  screeners  would  not  have  access  to  training  pro-
grams  such  as  ‘‘Threat  of  the  Day,’’  which  allows  screeners  to  stay  abreast  of  the 
most current security threats. 

In addition to training, developing performance measures for TSA’s screening pro-
gram is necessary to assess achievements and make decisions about where to direct 
performance  improvement  efforts.  In  April  2004,  we  reported  that  while  TSA  was 
taking  steps  to  measure  screener  performance,  it  had  not  collected  sufficient  data 
to assess how well screeners performed—particularly with regard to baggage screen-
ers—and  had  not  determined  what  steps  to  take  to  strengthen  screener  perform-
ance. 14 Since  then,  TSA  has  gathered  additional  performance  data  and  has  estab-
lished performance measures and targets for the screening system. We have an on-
going  review  assessing  TSA’s  efforts  in  strengthening  screener  training  and  meas-
uring performance. This review will address TSA’s efforts in developing performance 
measures to assist in the prioritization of security improvements. 
TSA Efforts to Implement a Risk Management Approach for Securing Air Cargo Are 

Ongoing 

TSA’s  Air  Cargo  Strategic  Plan,  completed  in  November  2003,  outlines  a  threat-
based, risk management approach for securing the air cargo transportation system. 
Specifically,  the  plan  identifies  priority  actions  based  on  risk,  cost,  and  deadlines. 
The plan also calls for coordinated efforts in four strategic areas—enhancing shipper 
and  supply  chain  security,  identifying  elevated  risk  cargo  through  prescreening, 
identifying  technology  for  performing  targeted  air  cargo  inspections,  and  securing 
all-cargo aircraft through appropriate facility security measures. In November 2004, 
TSA published a proposed rule that would implement many of the provisions of the 
Air Cargo Strategic Plan for enhancing air cargo security. 

The President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget requests $40 million for ensuring the se-
curity of air cargo. The $40 million request will support the 200 authorized air cargo 
inspectors and associated air cargo screening operations initiated during Fiscal Year 
2005.  In  addition,  the  request  will  support  the  continued  development  of  required 
programs,  training  and  development  of  requirements  for  Indirect  Air  Carriers, 15 
and  improvements  and  maintenance  of  the  Known  Shipper 16 and  Indirect  Air  Car-
rier  Program  Databases.  TSA  will  also  field  test  the  Air  Cargo  Freight  Assessment 
Program,  which  will  incorporate  the  Known  Shipper  and  Indirect  Air  Carrier  Pro-
gram Databases. 

TSA’s proposed rule for air cargo security describes a number of actions that must 
be  taken  before  a  comprehensive  risk  management  approach  can  be  applied  to  se-
curing  cargo.  One  of  the  key  components  of  TSA’s  risk-based  approach  for  securing 
air cargo is the development and implementation of a system to screen 100 percent 
of high-risk cargo. This program, known as the Freight Assessment System, is based 
on  several  key  components.  First,  the  system  will  use  data  on  known  shippers  and 
indirect  air  carriers  who  deliver  cargo  to  air  carriers  for  transport.  It  is  important 
that this data be complete, accurate, and current, so that shippers about whom rel-
evant security information is known can be distinguished from those shippers about 
whom  there  is  inadequate  security  information.  Second,  the  system  must  incor-
porate  criteria  for  profiling  cargo  so  that  it  can  identify  high-risk  cargo  that  must 
undergo  physical  screening.  Third,  effective  technology  must  be  deployed  to  screen 
cargo identified as high-risk. 

TSA is still in the early stages of developing the Freight Assessment System and 
needs to resolve several issues that could affect the system’s development. First, the 
principal  source  of  data  for  prescreening  is  through  the  use  of  its  Known  Shipper 
Program.  However,  carriers  who  collect  this  information  are  not  currently  required 
to  submit  data  on  known  shippers  for  inclusion  in  TSA’s  centralized  database.  In 
May  2004,  a  TSA  official  testified  that  the  known  shipper  database  contained  only 
about  one-third  of  all  known  shippers.  There  are  also  concerns  about  the  relative 
ease  of  obtaining  known  shipper  status,  and  the  ability  for  someone  to  pose  as  a 
known  shipper  by  falsifying  or  counterfeiting  shipping  documents  used  to  identify 
the  source  as  a  known  shipper.  Second,  the  TSA  working  group  charged  with  pro-
posing criteria for profiling cargo has not yet reported its recommendations to TSA. 
Any  field  testing  of  the  Freight  Assessment  System  will  require  complete  and 
verified data on known shippers, as well as criteria for evaluating risk. Finally, TSA 
is  in  the  early  stages  of  identifying  and  testing  air  cargo  security  technologies.  For 
example,  it  has  not  yet  developed  plans  outlining  when  these  tests  will  be  com-
pleted,  or  determined  whether  technologies  proven  to  be  effective  will  be  deployed. 
In  addition,  TSA’s  proposed  air  cargo  security  rule  estimates  the  costs  of  imple-
menting the agency’s proposals for enhancing air cargo security at $837 million over 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

26

a  10-year  period.  However,  industry  stakeholders  have  raised  concerns  over  TSA’s 
projected  cost  estimates,  in  part  because  of  the  number  of  air  cargo  workers  the 
stakeholders  estimate  to  be  affected  by  some  of  the  proposed  measures.  For  exam-
ple,  several  stakeholders  commented  that  TSA’s  cost  estimate  for  conducting  the 
proposed  security  threat  assessments  of  air  cargo  workers  was  low,  and  that  TSA 
underestimated the number of air cargo workers that would have to undergo an as-
sessment.  In  addition,  air  cargo  industry  stakeholders  expressed  concerned  that 
they would incur approximately 97 percent of the projected cost of the air cargo se-
curity procedures described in the proposed rule. We have an ongoing review evalu-
ating TSA’s efforts to implement a risk-based approach to securing air cargo, includ-
ing  TSA  efforts  to  target  high-risk  cargo,  and  efforts  to  identify  and  test  screening 
technologies. 
TSA  Has  Taken  Actions  to  Strengthen  the  Security  of  Commercial  Airport 

Perimeters and Access Controls, but More Work Is Needed 

In  June  2004,  we  reported  that  TSA  had  taken  a  variety  of  actions  to  evaluate 
the security of airport perimeters and the controls that limit access into secured air-
port  areas,  but  had  not  yet  determined  how  the  results  of  these  evaluations  could 
be used to make systemwide improvements. 17 Specifically, TSA has conducted regu-
latory compliance inspections, covert (undercover) testing of selected security proce-
dures,  and  vulnerability  assessments  at  selected  airports.  These  evaluations—
though not yet complete—have identified perimeter and access control security con-
cerns. For example, TSA identified instances where airport operators failed to com-
ply with existing security requirements, including access control-related regulations. 
In  addition,  TSA  identified  threats  to  perimeter  and  access  control  security  at  each 
of  the  airports  where  vulnerability  assessments  were  conducted  during  2003.  In 
January 2004, TSA temporarily suspended its assessment efforts to conduct higher-
priority  vulnerability  assessments  dealing  with  shoulder-fired  missiles.  Although 
TSA plans to begin conducting joint vulnerability assessments with the Federal Bu-
reau  of  Investigation,  it  has  not  yet  determined  how  it  will  allocate  existing  re-
sources between its own independent airport assessments and the new joint assess-
ments,  or  developed  a  schedule  for  conducting  future  vulnerability  assessments. 
Further,  TSA  has  not  yet  determined  how  to  use  the  results  of  its  inspections,  in 
conjunction  with  covert  testing  and  vulnerability  assessments  results,  to  enhance 
the overall security of the commercial airport system. 

TSA has also helped some airports enhance perimeter and access control security 
by  providing  funds  for  security  equipment,  such  as  electronic  surveillance  systems. 
TSA  has  further  initiated  efforts  to  evaluate  the  effectiveness  of  security-related 
technologies, such as biometric identification systems. By December 2003, responsi-
bility  for  funding  most  airport  security  projects  had  shifted  from  the  Federal  Avia-
tion  Administration  to  TSA.  As  a  result,  TSA  is  developing  new  policies  to  deter-
mine  how  to  review,  approve,  and  prioritize  security  project  funding.  However,  we 
reported  that  TSA  has  not  yet  begun  to  gather  data  on  airport  operators’  historical 
funding  of  security  projects  and  current  needs  to  aid  the  agency  in  setting  funding 
priorities. 

Regarding reducing the potential security risk posed by airport workers, we found 
that,  at  the  time  of  our  review,  TSA  had  not  fully  addressed  all  related  require-
ments  mandated  by  ATSA.  For  example,  TSA  required  fingerprint-based  criminal 
history records checks and security awareness training for most, but not all, airport 
workers  called  for  in  the  act.  We  also  found  that  TSA  had  not  addressed  the  act’s 
provision that requires airport vendors with direct access to the airfield and aircraft 
to  develop  security  programs  to  address  security  measures  specific  to  vendor  em-
ployees. TSA said that expanding requirements for background checks and security 
awareness training for additional workers and establishing requirements for vendor 
security programs would be costly to implement. 

On the basis of our work, we recommended, and DHS generally agreed, that TSA 
better justify future decisions on how best to proceed with security evaluations, fund 
and  implement  security  improvements—including  new  security  technologies—and 
implement  additional  measures  to  reduce  the  potential  security  risks  posed  by  air-
port workers. In July 2004, TSA made several improvements in these areas, through 
the  issuance  of  a  series  of  security  directives,  including  requiring  enhanced  back-
ground  checks  and  improved  access  controls  for  airport  employees  who  work  in  re-
stricted airport areas. 
Continued  Partnerships  and  Risk  Assessments  Are  Needed  for  Securing  General 

Aviation 

The  Federal  and  State  Governments  and  general  aviation  industry  all  play  roles 
in  securing  general  aviation  operations.  While  the  Federal  Government  provides 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

27

guidance, enforces regulatory requirements, and provides some funding, the bulk of 
the responsibility for assessing and enhancing security falls on airport operators. In 
November 2004, we reported that although TSA has issued a limited threat assess-
ment of general aviation, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation has said that ter-
rorists  have  considered  using  general  aviation  to  conduct  attacks,  a  systematic  as-
sessment  of  threats  has  not  been  conducted. 18 In  addition,  we  reported  that  TSA 
had conducted vulnerability assessments at a small number of general aviation air-
ports,  but  agency  officials  stated  that  conducting  these  assessments  is  costly  and, 
therefore, impractical to do for the 19,000 general aviation airports nationwide. 

TSA  intends  to  implement  a  risk  management  approach  to  better  assess  threats 
and  vulnerabilities  of  general  aviation  aircraft  and  airports  and,  as  part  of  this  ap-
proach, is developing an online vulnerability self-assessment tool to be completed by 
individual  airport  managers.  However,  we  found  limitations  in  the  use  of  the  self-
assessment tool. Further, at the time of our review, these efforts had not been com-
pleted,  and  TSA  had  not  yet  developed  a  plan  with  specific  milestones  for  imple-
menting the tools and assessments. Without such a plan, it will be difficult for TSA 
to determine the proper allocation of its resources to the areas of greatest need and 
to monitor the progress of its efforts. 

TSA  has  also  partnered  with  industry  associations  to  develop  security  guidelines 
that enable general aviation airport managers to assess their own vulnerabilities to 
terrorist attack, and works through industry associations to communicate threat in-
formation.  However,  industry  and  state  aviation  officials  we  spoke  with  stated  that 
security advisories distributed by TSA were general in nature and were not consist-
ently received. In part this is understandable because, among other things, TSA re-
lies  on  other  federal  agencies  for  threat  information.  However,  we  have  found  that 
applying  risk  communication  principles—relaying  only  timely,  specific,  and  action-
able  information,  to  the  extent  possible—provides  organizations  like  TSA  with  the 
best opportunity to achieve desired results. 

We  also  found  that  TSA  and  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  have  taken  a 
number of steps to address security risks to general aviation through regulation and 
guidance  but  still  face  challenges  in  their  efforts  to  further  enhance  security.  For 
example,  TSA  developed  regulations  governing  background  checks  for  foreign  can-
didates  for  U.S.  flight  training  schools  and  issued  security  guidelines  for  general 
aviation airports. However, we found limitations in the process used to conduct com-
pliance inspections of flight training schools. 

Because of the importance of securing general aviation operations and to help ad-
dress associated challenges, we recommended, and DHS generally agreed, that TSA 
take  actions  to  better  assess  the  possibility  of  terrorists’  misuse  of  general  aviation 
aircraft, better communicate terrorist threat information, and help mitigate security 
risks to general aviation operations. 
TSA  Established  a  Screening  Partnership  Program  but  Needs  to  Finalize

Performance Measures 

In  November  2004,  we  reported  on  our  preliminary  observations  of  TSA’s  efforts 
to  establish  and  implement  a  Screening  Partnership  Program,  a  program  through 
which commercial airports can apply to TSA to use private rather than federal pas-
senger  and  baggage  screeners. 19 Beginning  on  November  19,  2004,  TSA  was  re-
quired by law to begin allowing commercial airports to apply to use private contrac-
tors  to  screen  passengers  and  checked  baggage.  A  federal  workforce  has  performed 
this function since November 2002, in response to a congressional mandate that the 
Federal Government take over screening services from air carriers after the terrorist 
attacks  of  September  11,  2001.  A  2-year  pilot  program  at  five  airports  testing  the 
effectiveness  of  private  sector  screening  in  a  post-September  11  environment  was 
concluded on November 18, 2004. 

In  assessing  TSA’s  efforts  to  implement  a  Screening  Partnership  Program,  we 
found  that  TSA  had  completed  or  was  developing  key  policies  and  procedures  ad-
dressing  program  implementation  and  oversight,  and  was  taking  steps  to  commu-
nicate  with  stakeholders  by  developing  informational  guidance  and  soliciting  infor-
mation  and  suggestions.  However,  we  found  that  some  airport  operators,  private 
screening  contractors,  and  aviation  industry  representatives  identified  the  need  for 
additional information regarding flexibilities airports and contractors would have to 
manage  the  program,  liability  in  the  event  of  a  terrorist  attack,  and  costs  related 
to program participation. 

We  also  reported  that  consistent  with  risk  management  principles,  TSA  was  de-
veloping  performance  measures  to  assess  the  performance  of  airports  participating 
in  the  Screening  Partnership  Program  and  individual  contractors  performing  the 
screening  services.  However,  we  found  that  specific  performance  measures  had  not 
yet been finalized and were not scheduled to be completed until mid-2005. TSA offi-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

28

cials  stated  that  once  developed,  performance  measures  for  the  Screening  Partner-
ship  Program  will  be  based  on  measures  already  developed  by  an  independent  con-
sulting  firm  for  the  five  airports  that  participated  in  the  pilot  screening  program. 
These  measures  include  how  well  screeners  detect  test  threat  objects,  such  as  guns 
and knives, during screening operations. TSA also reported that it plans to develop 
performance  measures  evaluating  how  well  private  screening  contractors  comply 
with the terms of their contracts, which they intend to become part of a quality as-
surance  plan.  GAO  has  consistently  supported  program  evaluation—including  the 
development  and  use  of  performance  measures  to  measure  program  outcomes—as 
an important tool in assessing whether programs are achieving intended goals. 

The  President’s  budget  request  for  Fiscal  Year  2006  includes  about  $161  million 
for the five private contract screening airports. The administration expects contract 
screening  operations  to  expand  beyond  the  five  airports  currently  using  private 
screening  contractors  through  2006.  To  date,  one  additional  airport  beyond  the  five 
that participated in the pilot program has applied to use private screening contrac-
tors. Beginning in May 2005, TSA will begin awarding contracts to private screening 
contractors.  We  are  continuing  to  assess  TSA’s  development  and  implementation  of 
the  Screening  Partnership  Program,  to  include  its  development  of  performance 
measures to assess screener performance. 
TSA Has Begun to Increase Focus on Passenger and Transit Rail Security 

We  have  reported  on  the  security  of  passenger  and  transit  rail  in  the  past,  most 
recently during testimony before this Committee in March 2004. 20 At that time, we 
stated  that  following  the  September  11  terrorist  attacks,  passenger  and  freight  rail 
providers  implemented  new  security  measures  or  increased  the  frequency  or  inten-
sity  of  existing  activities,  including  performing  risk  assessments,  conducting  emer-
gency  drills,  and  developing  security  plans.  We  also  reported  that—because  of  a 
focus  on  commercial  aviation  security—TSA  initially  devoted  limited  attention  to 
passenger  and  transit  rail  security.  Since  that  time,  TSA  has  begun  to  focus  more 
attention on rail security needs and is in the process of assessing critical passenger 
rail assets—such as stations, tunnels, and bridges. The Federal Transit Administra-
tion also plays a role in rail security, including providing grants for emergency drills 
and conducting security assessments at the largest transit agencies. The Fiscal Year 
2006  budget  requests  includes  $8  million  for  rail  security  to  support  funding  re-
quirements  for  100  surface  transportation  inspectors  that  will  focus  primarily  on 
rail  security.  The  budget  request  identified  that  the  remaining  $24  million  of  the 
surface  transportation  budget  will  support  operational  funding  requirements,  the 
development  and  implementation  of  performance-based  standard  and  regulations, 
vulnerability  assessments  for  critical  assets,  and  security  awareness  training  and 
exercises. 

We are currently reviewing TSA’s efforts to strengthen passenger rail and transit 
security,  including  determining  to  what  extent  threats  and  vulnerabilities  to  rail 
systems  have  been  assessed,  what  actions  have  been  taken  to  strengthen  security, 
and  the  applicability  of  foreign  rail  security  practices  to  the  U.S.  rail  system.  Our 
review, among other things, will determine the extent to which federal rail security 
efforts  are  consistent  with  risk  management  principles  to  ensure  that  finite  re-
sources  are  allocated  where  they  are  needed  most,  and  that  security  efforts  are 
being coordinated to help avoid duplication and support integration. Our review will 
also  identify  any  challenges  involved  with  implementing  measures  to  improve  rail 
security, including practices used by foreign rail systems. 
DHS  Proposal  to  Integrate  Common  Functions  is  Commendable,  but

Existing Challenges Will Need to Be Addressed 

DHS’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget request proposes two key changes in DHS’s orga-
nizational  structure  that  are  designed  to  achieve  synergy  and  avoid  duplication  of 
effort. First, DHS proposes to create an Office of Screening Coordination and Oper-
ations within the Border and Transportation Security Directorate that would coordi-
nate a comprehensive approach to several ongoing terrorist-related screening initia-
tives—in  immigration;  law  enforcement;  intelligence;  counterintelligence;  and  pro-
tection  of  the  border,  transportation  systems,  and  critical  infrastructure. 21 Specifi-
cally,  the  Office  of  Screening  Coordination  and  Operations  would  consolidate  nine 
screening activities, including six that are currently housed within a single TSA of-
fice.  DHS  expects  this  consolidation  to  save  administrative  overhead  costs,  thereby 
enabling the department to use those savings toward accomplishing the missions of 
the  programs.  In  total,  DHS  is  requesting  about  $847  million  for  the  Office  of 
Screening Coordination and Operations. Table 2 provides the budget request for the 
6 screening activities that currently reside within TSA. 22

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

29

DHS  identified  11  goals  in  creating  the  Office  of  Screening  Coordination  and  Op-

erations:

programs;

plication of standards and use of common services;

grams that enhances security, facilitates travel, and safeguards privacy;

• enable  consistent,  effective,  and  efficient  day-to-day  operations  through  the  ap-
• assist  in  the  development  of  policy  for  DHS-wide  screening  and  credentialing 
• create an integrated business strategy for DHS screening and credentialing pro-
• reduce redundancy and close mission and technological gaps;
• manage investments of screening and credentialing programs to ensure efficient 
• remove technological barriers to sharing screening information within DHS;
• enable  consistent  status  reporting  of  major  screening  and  credentialing  pro-
• ensure  consistent  acquisition/contracting  and  program  management  processes/
• establish  a  central  clearinghouse  to  administer  registered  traveler  programs 
• deliver  clear  and  consistent  messages  to  domestic  and  foreign  travelers  and 
• work  with  other  federal  agencies  to  improve  and  coordinate  screening  stand-

use of assets;

grams;

disciplines are applied;

and worker credentialing programs;

workers for increased compliance; and

ards.

Second,  DHS  is  proposing  to  consolidate  its  R&D  efforts  inside  its  Science  and 
Technology Directorate. 23 This office will house the current R&D activities that are 
currently  spread  across  four  DHS  component  agencies—TSA,  U.S.  Coast  Guard, 
Customs and Border Patrol, and Information Analysis and Infrastructure Protection 
Directorates. The existing TSA R&D program consists of research and development 
(Transportation  Security  Laboratory), 24 next-generation  explosive  detection  sys-
tems,  and  air  cargo  research,  and  received  a  total  of  $178  million  in  Fiscal  Year 
2005 appropriations. 25 By consolidating these and other R&D programs under a sin-
gle  office,  DHS  is  seeking  to  maximize  the  efficiency  and  effectiveness  of  its  R&D 
efforts to allow the components to focus on their operational missions and eliminate 
duplicate  management  infrastructure.  DHS’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  in-
cludes $1.4 billion for R&D. 

We  applaud  DHS’s  efforts  to  achieve  efficiencies  and  cost  savings,  leverage  re-
sources  and  technology,  and  improve  internal  coordination  and  operations.  As  DHS 
works  toward  consolidating  screening  functions  and  initiatives  within  the  Office  of 
Screening  Coordination  and  Operations,  and  the  R&D  functions  within  the  Science 
and Technology Directorate, it will be important for DHS to define the interrelation-
ships  and  commonalities  among  these  programs,  explicitly  define  roles  and  respon-
sibilities, and identify data needs. Additionally, DHS will need to address the exist-
ing  challenges  that  have  been  identified  regarding  the  programs  these  offices  will 
absorb.  While  these  organizational  changes  should  assist  DHS  in  providing  a  solid 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
3
o
a
g
5
1
2

30

foundation from which to manage and oversee its screening, credentialing, and R&D 
efforts, restructuring alone will not resolve all existing challenges or ensure the suc-
cessful  integration  and  achievement  of  DHS’s  goals.  We  have  recently  reported  on 
challenges DHS and TSA are facing with regard to some of these programs, includ-
ing  Secure  Flight,  the  Transportation  Worker  Identification  Credential,  and  re-
search  and  development  activities.  The  sections  below  describe  the  challenges  we 
identified. 
TSA  is  in  Early  Stages  of  Testing  and  Implementing  the  Secure  Flight  Passenger 

Prescreening System 

One  challenge  the  proposed  Office  of  Screening  Coordination  and  Operations  will 
face  immediately  is  the  continued  development  of  a  system  to  prescreen  domestic 
airline  passengers.  The  prescreening  of  passengers—that  is,  determining  whether 
airline  passengers  pose  a  security  risk  before  they  reach  the  passenger  screening 
checkpoint—is used to focus security attention on those passengers representing the 
greatest potential threat. Since the late 1990s, passenger prescreening has been con-
ducted  using  the  Computer-Assisted  Passenger  Prescreening  System  (CAPPS  I). 
This  system,  operated  by  air  carriers,  compares  passenger  information  against 
CAPPS I rules as well as a government-supplied watch list that contains the names 
of known or suspected terrorists. 26

In  the  wake  of  September  11,  concerns  were  raised  over  the  effectiveness  of 
CAPPS  I.  In  2002,  TSA  began  developing  a  second-generation  computer-assisted 
passenger prescreening system, known as CAPPS II, which was intended to provide 
a more effective and efficient way to prescreen airline passengers. However, the de-
velopment  of  CAPPS  II  faced  a  number  of  significant  delays  and  challenges.  As  we 
reported  in  February  2004,  key  activities  in  the  development  of  CAPPS  II  were  de-
layed,  complete  plans  identifying  system  functionality  were  not  established,  and 
TSA  was  behind  schedule  in  testing  and  developing  initial  increments  of  the  sys-
tem. 27 Further,  we  found  that  TSA  had  not  yet  fully  addressed  seven  of  the  eight 
issues identified by Congress as key areas of interest, such as privacy concerns, pas-
senger  redress,  and  system  oversight.  We  further  reported  that  TSA  faced  chal-
lenges  in  obtaining  the  international  cooperation  needed  to  obtain  passenger  data, 
managing  the  expansion  of  the  program’s  mission  beyond  its  original  purpose,  and 
ensuring  that  identity  theft—in  which  an  individual  poses  as  and  uses  information 
of another individual—cannot be used to negate the security benefits of the system. 
Moreover,  in  July  2004,  the  9/11  Commission  advised  that  improvements  to  the 
passenger prescreening system are required, noting that the watch lists used by the 
air carriers for the current prescreening system, CAPPS I, do not include all terror-
ists or terrorism suspects because of concerns about sharing intelligence information 
with  private  firms  and  foreign  countries. 28 The  9/11  Commission  stated  that  pas-
senger prescreening should be performed by TSA and should use the larger consoli-
dated  watch  list  data  maintained  by  the  Federal  Government.  As  a  result  of  these 
problems  and  challenges,  as  well  as  widespread  concerns  with  CAPPS  II  by  Con-
gress,  the  public,  and  other  key  stakeholders,  DHS  terminated  the  CAPPS  II  pro-
gram  and  in  August  2004  announced  that  it  would  develop  a  new  passenger 
prescreening program called Secure Flight. 

Under  Secure  Flight,  TSA  will  take  over,  from  commercial  airlines,  the  responsi-
bility  for  checking  passenger  information  against  terrorist  watch  lists  and  the 
CAPPS  I  rules.  TSA  expects  that  Secure  Flight,  once  implemented,  will  provide  a 
number  of  benefits  over  the  current  airline-operated  system.  For  example,  TSA  ex-
pects  that  Secure  Flight  will  be  more  effective  than  CAPPS  I  in  identifying  terror-
ists because it will utilize an expanded watch list with more information than is cur-
rently available to air carriers. TSA also believes Secure Flight will reduce the num-
ber  of  passengers  mistakenly  identified  as  being  on  a  terrorist  watch  list  as  com-
pared with the current system. TSA is currently testing the ability of Secure Flight 
to  perform  watch  list  matching  and  applying  CAPPS  I  rules. 29 TSA  expects  that 
this  phase  of  testing  will  be  completed  later  this  month.  In  addition,  TSA  plans  to 
test  the  feasibility  of  using  commercial  data  to  improve  the  ability  of  Secure  Flight 
to  more  accurately  verify  passenger  identity.  TSA  expects  to  complete  commercial 
data  testing  in  early  April  2005. 30 On  the  basis  of  these  test  results,  TSA  plans  to 
make policy decisions regarding the use of commercial data as part of Secure Flight. 
TSA  also  plans  subsequently  to  test  additional  functionality  and  the  operations  of 
Secure  Flight  before  implementation,  regardless  of  whether  it  incorporates  the  use 
of  commercial  data  as  part  of  Secure  Flight.  At  the  conclusion  of  testing,  TSA  ex-
pects to implement Secure Flight with one or two air carriers in August 2005. 

Although  TSA  reported  that  it  spent  approximately  $100  million  on  the  develop-
ment  of  CAPPS  II,  TSA  considers  much  of  that  cost  to  be  applicable  to  Secure 
Flight. This is because Secure Flight will leverage certain capabilities that had been 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

31

developed  for  the  CAPPS  II  program,  such  as  the  system  infrastructure  used  to 
match  passenger  information  against  terrorist  watch  lists.  However,  in  developing 
Secure Flight, TSA modified the CAPPS II infrastructure to remove certain features 
that were not authorized for Secure Flight. For Fiscal Year 2005, TSA was allocated 
$35  million  for  the  development  of  Secure  Flight.  The  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006 
budget  request  includes  approximately  $94  million  for  Secure  Flight  development 
and  implementation  as  well  as  crew  vetting. 31 This  represents  an  increase  of  ap-
proximately $46 million for Secure Flight and approximately $3 million for crew vet-
ting.  These  funds  are  intended  to  support  continued  testing,  information  systems, 
connectivity to airlines, and daily operations. 

As  mandated  by  the  Fiscal  Year  2005  Homeland  Security  Appropriations  Act 
(Public Law 108–334, Section 522), as well as in response to congressional requests, 
we  are  currently  conducting  a  review  of  the  Secure  Flight  program. 32 Our  review 
will  highlight  four  key  areas:  (1)  the  status  of  Secure  Flight’s  development  and  im-
plementation, (2) any challenges to the system’s effective implementation and oper-
ation, (3) processes in place for system oversight and program management, and (4) 
efforts  to  minimize  the  impact  of  Secure  Flight  on  passengers  and  to  protect  pas-
senger  rights.  As  part  of  this  review,  we  will  examine  the  future  costs  associated 
with the development and implementation of Secure Flight. We will also determine 
if  TSA  has  addressed  the  weaknesses  identified  in  our  February  2004  report  on 
CAPPS II. We will issue a report discussing the results of our review by March 28, 
2005. 
TSA Faces Planning Challenges in Moving Forward with the Transportation Worker 

Identification Credential 

The Office of Screening Coordination and Operations will also need to address the 
challenges TSA has faced in developing a Transportation Worker Identification Cre-
dential (TWIC). The TWIC program is intended to improve security by establishing 
an integrated, credential-based, identity management program for higher risk trans-
portation workers requiring unescorted access to secure areas of the nation’s trans-
portation  system.  TSA  expects  that  the  Office  of  Screening  Coordination  and  Oper-
ations  will  leverage  separate  screening  processes  within  TWIC,  such  as  in  estab-
lishing  watchlist  checks  on  transportation  workers  and  establishing  access  inter-
operability  with  transportation  companies,  and  apply  those  practices  to  other 
screening activities. 

In  December  2004,  we  reported  on  TSA’s  efforts  to  issue  a  worker  identification 
card  that  uses  biometrics,  such  as  fingerprints,  to  control  access  to  secure  areas  of 
ports  or  ships. 33 We  found  that  three  main  factors  caused  TSA  to  miss  its  initial 
August  2004  target  date  for  issuing  maritime  worker  identification  cards:  (1)  TSA 
officials had difficulty obtaining timely approval of the prototype test from DHS be-
cause  of  competition  for  executive-level  attention  and  agency  resources,  (2)  extra 
time was required to work with DHS and Office of Management and Budget officials 
to  identify  additional  data  to  be  collected  for  cost-benefit  and  alternative  analyses, 
and (3) additional work was required to assess the capabilities of various card tech-
nologies  to  determine  which  technology  was  most  appropriate  for  controlling  access 
in  seaports.  Because  of  program  delays,  some  port  facilities,  recognizing  an  imme-
diate need to enhance access control systems, are proceeding with plans for local or 
regional  identification  cards  that  may  require  additional  investment  in  order  to 
make  them  compatible  with  the  TWIC  system.  Accordingly,  delays  in  the  program 
may  affect  enhancements  to  port  security  and  complicate  stakeholder’s  efforts  in 
making wise investment decisions regarding security infrastructure. 

We  also  identified  additional  challenges  that  DHS  will  face  as  it  moves  forward 
with  developing  and  operating  the  TWIC  program,  such  as  developing  regulations 
that  identify  eligibility  requirements  for  the  card  and  instituting  a  comprehensive 
plan for managing the project. A documented comprehensive project plan will assist 
DHS  in  achieving  mutual  understanding,  commitment,  and  performance  of  individ-
uals, groups, and organizations that must execute or support the plan. Without such 
a plan—which is an established industry best practice for project planning and man-
agement—the program’s schedule and performance is placed at higher risk. For ex-
ample, additional delays could occur unless involved parties agree on efforts guiding 
the  remainder  of  the  project,  stakeholder  responsibilities,  and  associated  deadlines. 
Additionally, without a plan to guide the cost-benefit and alternatives analyses—an-
other  industry  best  practice—risk  is  increased  that  DHS  may  not  sufficiently  ana-
lyze  the  feasibility  of  various  approaches  to  issuing  the  card,  an  analysis  needed  to 
make informed decisions regarding the program. 34 On the basis of our work, we rec-
ommended, and DHS generally agreed, that TSA employ industry best practices for 
project  planning  and  management  by  developing  a  comprehensive  project  plan  for 
managing  the  program  and  specific  detailed  plans  for  risk  mitigation  and  cost-ben-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

32

efit  and  alternatives  analyses.  As  DHS  moves  forward  in  developing  TWIC,  it  will 
be important that it incorporates these best practices to help address the challenges 
it faces in developing and implementing a maritime worker identification card. 

DHS’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  includes  about  $245  million  for  TWIC. 
This amount is to cover the costs of personnel, contractors, equipment maintenance, 
software  and  license  updates,  background  checks,  fingerprint  processing,  and  adju-
dication of results. DHS estimated that the $245 million will enable it to distribute 
roughly 2 million TWICs to transportation security workers needing access to high-
risk areas of the transportation system by the end of Fiscal Year 2006. Additionally, 
DHS  is  seeking  authority  to  recover  these  costs  in  their  entirety  through  fees 
charged to the applicants. 

TSA is also exploring the cost-effectiveness of two other program alternatives: (1) 
a federal approach: a program wholly designed, financed, and managed by the Fed-
eral  Government,  and  (2)  a  decentralized  approach:  a  program  requiring  ports  and 
port facilities to design, finance, and manage programs to issue identification cards. 
In  February  2005,  TSA  officials  stated  that  they  do  not  expect  to  make  a  decision 
on  which  of  the  three  alternatives  to  implement—the  federal,  decentralized,  or 
TWIC  program—until  later  in  2005.  Officials  stated  that  whichever  approach  is  se-
lected will be known as TWIC and will meet legislative requirements. 
Further Planning, Risk Assessment, and Coordination Needed to Focus R&D Efforts 
As  DHS  moves  forward  in  integrating  its  R&D  functions  into  a  single  office—a 
commendable  goal—it  will  be  important  for  the  department  to  resolve  the  existing 
challenges  facing  its  various  R&D  programs.  Researching  and  developing  tech-
nologies  to  detect,  prevent,  and  mitigate  terrorist  threats  is  vital  to  enhancing  the 
security of the nation’s transportation system. In September 2004, we reported that 
TSA  and  DHS  have  made  some  progress  in  managing  transportation  security  R&D 
programs  according  to  applicable  laws  and  R&D  best  practices. 35 However,  we 
found  that  their  efforts  were  incomplete  in  several  areas,  including  preparing  stra-
tegic plans for R&D efforts that contain measurable objectives, preparing and using 
risk assessments to select and prioritize R&D projects, and coordinating with stake-
holders.  We  also  found  that  TSA  and  DHS  delayed  several  key  R&D  projects  and 
lacked both estimated deployment dates for the vast majority of their R&D projects 
and adequate databases to effectively manage their R&D portfolios. 

The Homeland Security Act requires DHS, through its Science and Technology Di-
rectorate, to prepare a strategic plan that identifies goals and includes annual meas-
urable objectives for coordinating the Federal Government’s civilian efforts in devel-
oping  countermeasures  to  terrorist  threats.  Similarly,  the  National  Academy  of 
Sciences has stated that research programs should be described in strategic and per-
formance plans and evaluated in performance reports. We are encouraged that TSA 
and  DHS  have  prepared  strategic  plans  for  their  agencies,  and  that  TSA  has  pre-
pared  a  strategic  plan  for  its  R&D  program.  However,  we  found  that  these  plans 
do  not  contain  measurable  objectives  for  tracking  the  progress  of  R&D  efforts.  We 
recommended  that  TSA  and  DHS  complete  strategic  plans  containing  measurable 
objectives  for  their  transportation  security  R&D  programs.  According  to  DHS  offi-
cials,  the  department  is  preparing  a  separate  strategic  plan  for  its  R&D  program 
that  will  include  more  specific  goals  and  measurable  objectives.  DHS  also  stated 
that the Science and Technology Directorate’s strategic planning process will include 
(1) determining strategic goals for the next 5 years, threats, and vulnerabilities, and 
(2) developing a list of prioritized projects for Fiscal Years 2005 through 2010. 

In  consolidating  its  R&D  functions,  it  will  also  be  important  for  DHS  to  use  risk 
management  principles  in  making  R&D  funding  decisions,  as  required  by  ATSA. 36 
Although  both  TSA  and  DHS  have  established  processes  to  select  and  prioritize 
R&D projects that include risk management principles, they have not yet completed 
vulnerability  and  criticality  assessments,  which  we  have  identified  as  key  elements 
of  a  risk  management  approach,  for  all  modes  of  transportation. 37 In  the  absence 
of  completed  risk  assessments,  TSA  and  DHS  officials  report  basing  funding  deci-
sions  on  other  factors—such  as  available  threat  intelligence,  expert  judgment,  and 
information  about  past  terrorist  incidents.  TSA  officials  further  stated  that  TSA’s 
Chief  Technology  Officer  receives  daily  intelligence  briefings  and  that  the  agency 
uses  threat  information  to  select  R&D  projects  to  pursue.  However,  officials  stated 
that they do not use formal threat assessments to make R&D decisions. In addition, 
the DHS Inspector General reported in March 2004 that although many senior offi-
cials  agreed  that  DHS’s  Science  and  Technology  and  the  Information  Analysis  and 
Infrastructure  Protection  Directorates  should  closely  coordinate,  staff  below  them 
were not actively involved in sharing terrorist threat information or using the infor-
mation  to  form  the  basis  for  selecting  new  homeland  security  technologies.  On  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

33

basis of our work, we recommended, and DHS generally agreed, that TSA and DHS 
use  the  results  of  risk  assessments  to  help  select  and  prioritize  their  R&D  efforts. 
In moving forward with the proposed integration of R&D functions, DHS will also 
need  to  enhance  its  efforts  to  coordinate  with  other  federal  agencies  with  respect 
to  transportation  security  R&D,  and  reach  out  to  industry  stakeholders.  ATSA  and 
the Homeland Security Act require DHS to coordinate its efforts with those of other 
government agencies, in part to reduce duplication and identify unmet needs. Simi-
larly,  R&D  best  practices  identify  the  importance  of  stakeholder  coordination  in 
identifying R&D needs. For TSA and DHS to select the best technologies to enhance 
transportation security, it is important that they have a clear understanding of the 
R&D projects currently being conducted, both internally and externally. During our 
review,  we  found  limited  evidence  of  coordination  between  TSA  and  DHS,  or  be-
tween  these  agencies  and  other  federal  agencies,  such  as  the  Department  of  Trans-
portation.  Without  such  coordination,  DHS  raises  the  risk  that  its  R&D  resources 
will  not  be  effectively  leveraged  and  that  duplication  may  occur.  Further,  most 
transportation  industry  association  officials  we  interviewed  stated  that  TSA  and 
DHS  had  not  coordinated  with  them  to  obtain  information  on  their  security  R&D 
needs.  We  recommended,  and  officials  generally  agreed,  that  TSA  should  develop  a 
process with the Department of Transportation to coordinate transportation security 
R&D,  such  as  a  memorandum  of  agreement  identifying  roles  and  responsibilities, 
and share this information with transportation stakeholders. 

DHS will also need to address several additional challenges while moving forward 
in  consolidating  its  R&D  functions  into  a  single  office,  including  managing  delays 
in  key  R&D  projects,  better  estimating  deployment  dates,  and  conducting  better 
tracking  of  its  R&D  portfolio.  During  our  review,  we  found  that  progress  on  some 
R&D projects was delayed in Fiscal Year 2003 when TSA transferred about $61 mil-
lion,  more  than  half  of  its  $110  million  R&D  appropriation,  to  support  operational 
needs,  such  as  personnel  cost  for  screeners.  As  a  result,  TSA  delayed  several  key 
R&D  projects  related  to  checked  baggage  screening,  checkpoint  screening,  and  air 
cargo  security.  For  example,  TSA  delayed  the  development  of  a  device  to  detect 
weapons, liquid explosives, and flammables in containers found in carry-on baggage 
or passengers’ effects, as well as the development and testing of a walk-through por-
tal  for  detecting  traces  of  explosives  on  passengers.  We  also  found  that  although 
many of TSA’s projects were in later phases of development, the agency had not es-
timated deployment dates for 133 of the 146 projects that it funded in Fiscal Years 
2003  and  2004.  While  we  recognize  that  deployment  dates  are  not  always  predict-
able, we generally believe that R&D program managers should estimate deployment 
dates  for  projects  that  are  beyond  the  basic  research  phase  because  deployment 
dates  can  serve  as  goals  that  the  managers  can  use  to  plan,  budget,  and  track  the 
progress of projects. We also found that TSA and DHS did not have adequate data-
bases  to  monitor  and  manage  the  spending  of  the  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars 
that  Congress  had  appropriated  for  R&D.  For  example,  for  the  146  projects  that  it 
funded in 2003 and 2004, TSA was not able to provide us information on anticipated 
deployment  dates  for  91  percent,  the  current  phase  of  development  for  49  percent, 
and  the  amounts  obligated  and  budgeted  for  8  percent  that  were  appropriated  tens 
of  millions  of  dollars  in  both  Fiscal  Years  2003  and  2004.  We  recommended  that 
TSA and DHS develop a database to provide accurate, complete, current, and read-
ily accessible project information for monitoring and managing their R&D portfolios, 
and  a  vehicle  for  communicating  R&D  need  with  the  transportation  industry.  In 
September  2004,  DHS  stated  that  TSA  had  developed  a  system  to  track  R&D 
projects’  goals  and  milestones,  acquisition,  funding,  testing,  and  deployment  infor-
mation. 
Concluding Observations 

DHS and TSA have undertaken numerous initiatives to strengthen transportation 
security,  particularly  in  aviation,  and  their  efforts  should  be  commended.  Meeting 
the  congressional  mandates  to  screen  passengers  and  checked  baggage  alone  was  a 
tremendous challenge—yet TSA successfully hired and deployed a federal screening 
workforce of over 40,000 and deployed equipment to screen checked baggage for ex-
plosives at over 400 commercial airports nationwide. In our previous work address-
ing transportation security, we identified future actions that TSA should take to en-
hance security within and across all modes of transportation. Throughout the course 
of this work, one theme consistently surfaced—the need for TSA to fully utilize and 
integrate a risk management approach into its decision making processes. Our work 
has  shown—in  homeland  security  and  in  other  areas—that  a  comprehensive  risk 
management  approach  can  help  inform  decision  makers  in  allocating  finite  re-
sources to the areas of greatest need. We are encouraged that the President’s Fiscal 
Year  2006  budget  request  discusses  TSA’s  plans  to  implement  a  risk  management 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

34

approach  in  focusing  its  resources  related  to  transportation  security.  However,  we 
recognize  that  fully  integrating  a  risk  management  approach  into  decision  making 
processes  is  challenging  for  any  organization.  Further,  in  order  to  fully  apply  this 
approach, TSA must also address the challenges we have identified in our work re-
lated  to  program  planning,  risk  assessments,  and  implementation  and  monitoring. 
Without  rigorous  planning  and  prioritization,  and  knowledge  of  the  effectiveness  of 
their transportation security programs, DHS and TSA cannot be sure that they are 
focusing their resources on the areas of greatest need, are addressing the most crit-
ical  security  requirements,  and  are  ensuring  the  most  efficient  utilization  of  its  re-
sources. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to  answer  any 

questions that you or other members of the Committee may have. 
Related GAO Products Released Since September 11, 2001

Aviation Security: Preliminary Observations on TSA’s Progress to Use Private Pas-
senger  and  Baggage  Screening  Services,  GAO–05–126.  Washington,  DC:  November 
19, 2004. 

General Aviation Security: Increased Oversight Is Needed, but Continued Partner-
ship  with  the  Private  Sector  Is  Critical  to  Long-Term  Success,  GAO–05–144.  Wash-
ington, DC: November 10, 2004. 

Maritime Security: Substantial Work Remains to Translate New Planning Require-

ments into Effective Port Security. GAO–04–838. Washington, DC: June 30, 2004. 

Aviation Security: Further Steps Needed to Strengthen the Security of Commercial 
Airport  Perimeters  and  Access  Controls.  GAO–04–728.  Washington,  DC:  June  4, 
2004. 

Transportation Security Administration: High-Level Attention Needed to Strength-

en Acquisition Function. GAO–04–544. Washington, DC: May 28, 2004. 

Aviation  Security:  Private  Screening  Contractors  Have  Little  Flexibility  to  Imple-

ment Innovative Approaches. GAO–04–505T. Washington, DC: April 22, 2004. 

Homeland Security: Summary of Challenges Faced in Targeting Oceangoing Cargo 

Containers for Inspection. GAO–04–557T. March 31, 2004. 

Aviation  Security:  Improvement  Still  Needed  in  Federal  Aviation  Security  Efforts. 

GAO–04–592T. Washington, DC: March 30, 2004. 

Rail  Security:  Some  Actions  Taken  to  Enhance  Passenger  and  Freight  Rail  Secu-
rity, but Significant Challenges Remain. GAO–04–598T. Washington, DC: March 23, 
2004. 

Aviation  Security:  Challenges  Delay  Implementation  of  Computer-Assisted  Pas-

senger Prescreening System. GAO–04–504T. Washington, DC: March 17, 2004. 

Aviation  Security:  Computer-Assisted  Passenger  Prescreening  System  Faces  Sig-
nificant  Implementation  Challenges.  GAO–04–385.  Washington,  DC:  February  13, 
2004. 

Aviation  Security:  Challenges  Exist  in  Stabilizing  and  Enhancing  Passenger  and 
Baggage Screening Operations. GAO–04–440T. Washington, DC: February 12, 2004. 
Homeland Security: Preliminary Observations on Efforts to Target Security Inspec-

tions of Cargo Containers. GAO–04–325T. Washington, DC: December 16, 2003. 

Aviation  Security:  Efforts  to  Measure  Effectiveness  and  Strengthen  Security  Pro-

grams. GAO–04–285T. Washington, DC: November 20, 2003. 

Aviation Security: Efforts to Measure Effectiveness and Address Challenges. GAO–

04–232T. Washington, DC: November 5, 2003. 

Airport  Passenger  Screening:  Preliminary  Observations  on  Progress  Made  and 

Challenges Remaining. GAO–03–1173. Washington, DC: September 24, 2003. 

Maritime Security: Progress Made in Implementing Maritime Transportation Secu-
rity  Act,  but  Concerns  Remain.  GAO–03–1155T.  Washington,  DC:  September  9, 
2003. 

Aviation  Security:  Progress  Since  September  11,  2001,  and  the  Challenges  Ahead. 

GAO–03–1150T Washington, DC: September 9, 2003. 

Transportation  Security:  Federal  Action  Needed  to  Enhance  Security  Efforts. 

GAO–03–1154T. Washington, DC: September 9, 2003. 

Transportation  Security:  Federal  Action  Needed  to  Help  Address  Security  Chal-

lenges. GAO–03–843. Washington, DC: June 30, 2003. 

Rail  Safety  and  Security:  Some  Actions  Already  Taken  to  Enhance  Rail  Security, 

but Risk-based Plan Needed. GAO–03–435. Washington, DC: April 30, 2003. 

Federal  Aviation  Administration:  Reauthorization  Provides  Opportunities  to  Ad-

dress Key Agency Challenges. GAO–03–653T. Washington, DC: April 10, 2003. 

Transportation  Security:  Post-September  11th  Initiatives  and  Long-term  Chal-

lenges. GAO–03–616T. Washington, DC: April 1, 2003. 

Transportation  Security  Administration:  Actions  and  Plan  to  Build  a  Results-Ori-

ented Culture. GAO–03–190 Washington, DC: January 17, 2003. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

35

Aviation  Safety:  Undeclared  Air  Shipments  of  Dangerous  Goods  and  DOT’s  En-

forcement Approach. GAO–03–22. Washington, DC: January 10, 2003. 

Aviation  Security:  Vulnerabilities  and  Potential  Improvements  for  the  Air  Cargo 

System. GAO–03–344. Washington, DC: December 20, 2002. 

Mass Transit: Federal Action Could Help Transit Agencies Address Security Chal-

lenges. GAO–03–263. Washington, DC: December 13, 2002. 

Aviation Security: Registered Traveler Program Policy and Implementation Issues. 

GAO–03–253. Washington, DC: November 22, 2002. 

Combating  Terrorism:  Actions  Needed  to  Improve  Force  Protection  for  DoD  De-
ployments  through  Domestic  Seaports.  GAO–03–15.  Washington,  DC:  October  22, 
2002. 

Airport  Finance:  Using  Airport  Grant  Funds  for  Security  Projects  Has  Affected 

Some Development Projects. GAO–03–27. Washington, DC: October 15, 2002. 

Mass  Transit:  Challenges  in  Securing  Transit  Systems.  GAO–02–1075T.  Wash-

ington, DC: September 18, 2002. 

Port  Security:  Nation  Faces  Formidable  Challenges  in  Making  New  Initiatives 

Successful. GAO–02–993T. Washington, DC: August 5, 2002. 

Aviation  Security:  Transportation  Security  Administration  Faces  Immediate  and 

Long-Term Challenges. GAO–02–971T. Washington, DC: July 25, 2002. 

Aviation  Security:  Information  Concerning  the  Arming  of  Commercial  Pilots. 

GAO–02–822R. Washington, DC: June 28, 2002. 

Aviation Security: Vulnerabilities in, and Alternatives for, Preboard Screening Se-

curity Operations. GAO–01–1171T. Washington, DC: September 25, 2001. 

Aviation  Security:  Weaknesses  in  Airport  Security  and  Options  for  Assigning 

Screening Responsibilities. GAO–01–1165T. Washington, DC: September 21, 2001. 

Homeland  Security:  A  Framework  for  Addressing  the  Nation’s  Efforts.  GAO–01–

1158T. Washington, DC: September 21, 2001. 

Aviation  Security:  Terrorist  Acts  Demonstrate  Urgent  Need  to  Improve  Security  a 

the Nation’s Airports. GAO–01–1162T. Washington, DC: September 20, 2001. 

Aviation Security: Terrorist Acts Illustrate Severe Weaknesses in Aviation Security. 

GAO–01–1166T. Washington, DC: September 20, 2001. 
ENDNOTES 

1 EDS  operates  in  an  automated  mode  and  use  probing  radiation  to  examine  ob-
jects  inside  baggage  and  identify  the  characteristic  signatures  of  threat  explosives. 
ETD works by detecting vapors and residues of explosives. ETD requires human op-
erators  to  collect  samples  by  rubbing  bags  with  swabs,  which  are  chemically  ana-
lyzed to identify any traces of explosive materials. References to ‘‘explosive detection 
systems’’ include both EDS and ETD systems. 

2 GAO,  Homeland  Security:  A  Risk  Management  Approach  Can  Guide  Prepared-
ness  Efforts,  GAO–02–208T  (Washington,  DC:  October  31,  2001);  and  Combating 
Terrorism:  Threat  and  Risk  Assessments  Can  Help  Prioritize  and  Target  Program 
Investments, GAO/NSIAD–98–74 (Washington, DC: April 9, 1998). 

3 U.S.  Department  of  Homeland  Security,  Performance  Budget  Overview  Fiscal 
Year  2006,  Congressional  Budget  Justification  (Washington,  DC:  February  2005); 
and  Homeland  Security  Budget-in-Brief,  Fiscal  Year  2006  (Washington,  DC:  Feb-
ruary 2005). 

4 See  GAO,  Aviation  Security:  Systematic  Planning  Needed  to  Optimize  the  De-
ployment of Checked Baggage Screening Systems, GAO–05–302SU (Washington, DC: 
February 4, 2005). 

5 Obligations  are  amounts  of  orders  placed  or  contracts  awarded  during  a  given 
period that will require payment during the same or a future period. An administra-
tive  commitment  is  an  administrative  reservation  of  funds  in  anticipation  of  their 
obligation. 

6 In 2003, Congress authorized TSA to issue LOIs—a cost-sharing mechanism be-
tween TSA and the airports—to support funding the installation of in-line EDS bag-
gage screening systems. 

7 This refers to the net present value saved over 7 years if received up front. 
8 GAO,  Aviation  Security:  Challenges  Exist  in  Stabilizing  and  Enhancing  Pas-
senger  and  Baggage  Screening  Operations,  GAO–04–440T  (Washington,  DC:  Feb-
ruary 12, 2004). 

9 Federal  Security  Directors  are  responsible  for  providing  day-to-day  operational 
direction for federal security at airports. The Federal Security Director is the rank-
ing  TSA  authority  responsible  for  the  leadership  and  coordination  of  TSA  security 
activities at the airport. 

10 TSA  classifies  the  over  450  commercial  airports  in  the  United  States  into  one 
of five security risk categories (X, I, II, III, IV, and V) based on various factors, such 
as  the  total  number  of  takeoffs  and  landings  annually,  the  extent  to  which  pas-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

36

sengers  are  screened  at  the  airport,  and  other  special  security  considerations.  In 
general,  category  X  airports  have  the  largest  number  of  passenger  boardings,  and 
category IV airports have the smallest. 

11 In May 2003, TSA hired a contractor to develop a staffing model for its screen-
ing  workforce.  TSA  officials  reported  that  the  model  was  completed  in  June  2004, 
and all airports now have the capability to use the contractors’ standalone software. 
TSA  expects  to  install  the  software  on  its  intranet  by  the  end  of  February  2005, 
thereby  providing  headquarters  with  access  to  the  staffing  models  used  at  airports. 
12 The  Intelligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004  (Pub.  L.  108–
458)  requires  TSA  to  develop  standards  for  determining  aviation  security  staffing 
at  commercial  airports  no  later  than  90  days  after  its  enactment—December  14, 
2004.  It  also  directs  GAO  to  conduct  an  analysis  of  these  standards,  which  we  will 
initiate once the standards are developed. 

13 TSA  defines  a  fully  connected  training  computer  as  one  that  has  the  network 

image installed and is connected to the TSA broadband network. 

14 See  GAO,  Aviation  Security:  Private  Screening  Contractors  Have  Little  Flexi-
bility  to  Implement  Innovative  Approaches,  GAO–04–505T  (Washington,  DC:  April 
22, 2004). 

15 An  indirect  air  carrier  is  an  entity,  such  as  a  freight  forwarder,  that  engages 

indirectly in the air transportation of property on passenger aircraft. 

16 Known  shippers  are  entities  that  have  routine  business  dealings  with  freight 
forwarders  or  air  carriers  and  are  thus  considered  trusted  shippers,  in  contrast  to 
unknown  shippers  who  have  conducted  limited  or  no  prior  business  with  a  freight 
forwarder or air carrier. 

17 GAO,  Aviation  Security:  Further  Steps  Needed  to  Strengthen  the  Security  of 
Commercial  Airport  Perimeter  and  Access  Controls,  GAO–04–728  (Washington,  DC: 
June 2004). 

18 GAO, General Aviation Security: Increased Oversight Is Needed, but Continued 
Partnership  with  the  Private  Sector  Is  Critical  to  Long-Term  Success  GAO–05–144, 
(Washington, DC: Nov. 10, 2004). 

19 GAO,  Aviation  Security:  Preliminary  Observations  on  TSA’s  Progress  to  Allow 
Airports  to  Use  Private  Passenger  and  Baggage  Screening  Services,  GAO–05–126 
(Washington, DC: Nov. 19, 2004). 

20 GAO,  Rail  Security:  Some  Actions  Taken  to  Enhance  Passenger  and  Freight 
Rail  Security,  but  Significant  Challenges  Remain,  GAO–04–598T  (Washington,  DC: 
March 23, 2004.) 

21 The  mission  of  the  Office  of  Screening  Coordination  and  Operations  would  be 
to  enhance  terrorist-related  screening  through  comprehensive,  coordinated  proce-
dures  that  detect,  identify,  track,  and  interdict  people,  cargo  and  conveyances,  and 
other entities and objects that pose a threat to homeland security. 

22 DHS’s Fiscal Year 2006 request for the proposed Office of Screening Coordina-
tion  and  Operations  also  includes  about  $390  million  for  US-VISIT;  $7  million  for 
Free  and  Secure  Trade,  and  $14  million  for  NEXUS/Secure  Electronic  Network 
Rapid  Inspection,  which  are  currently  part  of  DHS’s  Office  of  Customs  and  Border 
Patrol. 

23 The  Homeland  Security  Act  of  2002  states  that  DHS  is  responsible  for  coordi-
nating  and  integrating  all  research,  development,  demonstration,  testing,  and  eval-
uation activities of the Department. Pub. L. No. 107–296, § 302(12). 

24 TSA’s  Transportation  Security  Laboratory  performs  research  and  development 

related to civil transportation security. 

25 The  budget  proposal  consolidates  the  bulk  of  TSA’s  research  and  development 
programs  into  the  Science  and  Technology  Directorate,  resulting  in  a  transfer  of 
$109 million. TSA will retain $23 million for operational research and development 
activities in FY 2006. 

26 CAPPS I rules are behavioral characteristics associated with the way an airline 

ticket is purchased. 

27 GAO,  Aviation  Security:  Computer-Assisted  Passenger  Prescreening  System 
Faces  Significant  Implementation  Challenges,  GAO–04–385  (Washington,  DC:  Feb-
ruary 12, 2004). 

28 The 9/11 Commission Report: Final Report of the National Commission on Ter-

rorist Attacks Upon the United States (Washington, DC: July 2004). 

29 In order to obtain data for testing, TSA issued an order in November 2004 re-
quiring  domestic  airlines  to  provide  passenger  records  for  the  month  of  June  2004. 
30 We  have  ongoing  work  assessing  TSA’s  testing  of  commercial  data  and  expect 

to issue a report later this month. 

31 The  proposal  to  create  the  new  Office  of  Screening  Coordination  and  Oper-
ations  would  combine  two  screening  programs  that  will  use  the  same  system  infra-
structure—Secure  Flight  and  crew  vetting.  The  crew  vetting  program  matches 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

37

names of aircraft pilots and flight and cabin crew against terrorist watch lists. Cur-
rently,  these  programs  are  run  by  the  Office  of  Transportation  Vetting  and 
Credentialing. 

32 This  review  is  separate  from  our  ongoing  work  assessing  TSA’s  commercial 

data testing efforts. 

33 GAO,  Port  Security:  Better  Planning  Needed  to  Develop  and  Operate  Maritime 
Worker  Identification  Card  Program,  GAO–05–106  (Washington,  DC:  December  10, 
2004). 

34 Best  practices  indicate  that  plans  for  activities  such  as  cost-benefit  and  alter-
natives  analyses  should  be  developed  to  help  facilitate  data  collection  and  analysis. 
These  plans  typically  describe,  among  other  things,  the  data  to  be  collected,  the 
source  of  these  data,  and  how  the  data  will  be  analyzed.  Such  plans  are  important 
to guide needed data analysis as well as prevent unnecessary data collection, which 
can be costly. 

35 GAO, Transportation Security R&D: TSA and DHS Are Researching and Devel-
oping  Technologies,  but  Need  to  Improve  R&D  Management,  GAO–04–890  (Wash-
ington, DC: September 30, 2004). 

36 Pub. L. 107–71, § 112(b)(1)(B). Additionally, under the Homeland Security Act, 
DHS  is  required  to  establish  R&D  priorities  for  detecting,  preventing,  protecting 
against,  and  responding  to  terrorist  attacks  (Pub.  L.  107–296,  § 302(5)(B)),  and  to 
prepare  comprehensive  assessments  of  the  vulnerabilities  of  the  nation’s  key  re-
sources  and  critical  infrastructure  sectors,  one  of  which  is  transportation  (Pub.  L. 
107–296, § 201(d)(2)). 

37 GAO,  Homeland  Security:  Key  Elements  of  a  Risk  Management  Approach, 

GAO–02–150T (Washington, DC: October 12, 2001).

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
If there is no objection, I would like to set a time limit of 7 min-
utes  on  each  Senator,  and  we’ll  bounce  back  for  another  round,  if 
that is required. 

Admiral, I was pleased to talk to you last evening about some of 
these subjects. And I do thank you for your courtesy of coming and 
changing your schedule, as I said. 

You  have  an  enormous  responsibility.  This  is  not  just  transpor-
tation  of  airline  security,  it  is  the  total  transportation  security  of 
the whole country. But we seem to be putting emphasis only on the 
air  passengers  to  contribute  to  the  cost  of  this  security  that  we’ve 
insisted  on  putting  in  place  throughout  the  transportation  system. 
Do  you  have  any  plans  to  put  fees  on  any  other  portion  of  the 
transportation  system  as  we  go  forward  with  these  plans  that 
you’ve  documented  in  your  statement  and  Ms.  Berrick  has  com-
mented upon? 

Admiral  STONE.  I  have  no  plans,  right  now,  to  assign  additional 

fees. It’s my understanding——

The  CHAIRMAN.  I’m  talking  about  other  than  airline  passengers. 
Is anyone else going to pay, other than the taxpayer and the airline 
passengers? 

Admiral STONE. In the other modes of transportation, sir? Is that 

The  CHAIRMAN.  In  terms  of  putting  up  the  security  system  we 
have that covers rail, bus, air, everything—I presume that is what 
your  statement  says.  That  total  transportation  programs  of  the 
United  States  are  subject  to  your  jurisdiction,  and  you  have  taxes 
only  on  the  airline  passengers.  Now,  do  you  plan  on  putting  fees 
or taxes on any other person that uses some of those transportation 
systems? 

Admiral  STONE.  We  have  no  plans  to  put  additional  fees  on  any 
of those other modal areas, other than those that I understand cur-
rently exist. 

what——

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

38

The CHAIRMAN. Tell me why. I mean, all of them are covered by 
your  security  system.  Trains  are  covered  by  your  security  system. 
Boats are covered by your security system. Why should only airline 
passengers contribute beyond taxpayers for the security system? 

Admiral STONE. I think a user-fee approach with all those modes 
of  transportation  merits  review  for  the  very  aspect  of  this  theme 
that it really has to be a shared responsibility. Right now, the gen-
eral  taxpayer  has  a  share  of  roughly  57  percent  of  the  aviation 
screening.  And  this  just  adjusts  it  down  to  20  percent.  There’s  al-
ways going to be that percentage of sharing. And so, I would agree 
that  each  mode  of  transportation  merits  review  for  what  type  of 
fees are paid for, both by users as well as the general taxpayer. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Do  you  have  plans  for  any  additional  security 
measures  that  apply  to  automobiles,  in  general,  upon  our  high-
ways? 

Admiral STONE. I do not, sir, for automobiles. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Is  that  a  subject  that’s  left  totally  for  local  and 

state jurisdiction? 

Admiral STONE. Currently, I do not have visibility on whether or 
not  the  states  and  local  jurisdictions  are  reviewing  the  automobile 
piece  of  that.  Our  responsibilities  for  highways,  though,  are  very 
clear.  And,  therefore,  the  $20  million  Highway  Watch  Program, 
which  we  work  with  ATA,  American  Trucking  Association,  is  the 
foundation  of  that.  With  regard  to  fees  for  automobiles  in  support 
of that, I have no plans for that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  let  me  tell  you  a  little  story  that  I  heard 
in one of the airports. I’ll not say which one it was, because I don’t 
want you to get people running out and asking too many questions 
about  it.  But  one  of  the  security  people  in  an  airport  that  I  flew 
into told me that he had noticed an automobile in their parking lot 
several times that had a very distinctive license plate. And the per-
son appeared to be doing things erratically and was obviously from 
the  Middle  East.  He  decided  to  put  that  license  plate  up  on  the 
Net. And a couple of weeks later, he got a call from a distant city, 
all  the  way  across  the  country,  saying  that  they  had  seen  this  li-
cense  plate,  wanted  to  know  what  did  he  know  about  the  people 
that were involved. Well, he told them why he had done it. He just 
believed  the  automobile  was  suspicious  in  what  it  was  doing.  And 
they  tracked  that  automobile  in  the  other  city.  And  when  it  came 
back,  he  got  notice,  all  along  the  line,  of  how  that  car  was  coming 
across the country. And when they finally found it back in its origi-
nal city, it did do some things that were fairly much out of the ordi-
nary,  and  they  picked  this  person  up.  It  turned  out  that  was  an 
employee  of  the  airport,  and,  under  questioning,  he  had  not  flown, 
because  he’s  on  the  no-fly  list.  But  they  had  tracked  him  using  li-
cense plates. 

Now,  aren’t  we  missing  a  whole  area  of  security  threats  by 
screening  only  people  on  airports,  only  people  that  get  on  and  off 
airplanes?  We  know  there  was  a  terrible  disaster  that  came  from 
airlines  being  used  as  weapons  of  mass  destruction,  but  aren’t  the 
people  who  are  capable  of  doing  that  using  other  means  of  trans-
portation  now?  They’re  not  flying.  They’re  on  the  no-fly  list.  Now, 
don’t you have any plans for extending this system of security? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

39

Admiral  STONE.  We  do.  In  fact,  every  morning  we  spend  about 
2  hours  reviewing  the  report  from  the  Terrorist  Screening  Center; 
to use the example you just gave, in which that type of information 
on  suspicious  cars,  license  plate,  law-enforcement  action—is  re-
viewed  by  TSA  each  morning,  from  an  intermodal  point  of  view—
trains, mass transit, rail, highway, pipeline security. All of that in-
telligence  in  the  Terrorist  Screening  Center  is  integrated  into  a  2-
hour  morning  brief  where  we  look  at  each  mode  of  transportation, 
what the threats are, and how they interrelate to one another. And 
so,  that  very  approach  of—it’s  all  related,  it  has  to  be  intermodal, 
and  the  Terrorist  Screening  data  bases  apply  not  just  to  aviation, 
but  need  to  be  looked  at  across  all  modes.  And  so,  that  morning 
brief  is  the  centerpiece  of  what  we  do,  because  it  gets  at  that  very 
issue of domain awareness and being able to followup on leads and 
how they connect to one another. 

Ms.  BERRICK.  And,  Mr.  Chairman,  if  I  could  add  to  that,  GAO 
is  currently  doing  several  reviews  looking  at  other  modes  of  trans-
portation,  and  the  difference  between  aviation  and  other  modes  is 
that  other  modes  of  transportation  are  inherently  open  to  promote 
the flow of goods and people. For example, we’re looking at rail se-
curity. So in looking at rail security, TSA will need to consider dif-
ferent  security  measures  that  would  be  appropriate  for  that  envi-
ronment.  And  one  of  the  issues  we’re  looking  at  is  what’s  being 
done  in  other  countries  to  secure  their  rail  systems,  and  can  that 
be applied to the United States. 

You  asked  earlier  about  taxes  for  other  modes  of  transportation. 
Right now, for other modes of transportation, the transit operators 
are  primarily  funding  security  enhancements.  They  get  some 
grants,  and  they  also  get  some  assistance  from  the  Department  of 
Transportation.  But,  primarily,  they’re  shouldering  the  burden  for 
security improvements. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. My time’s up. I intend to 
go  further  in  this  when  it  comes  around  to  my  time  again.  It  just 
seems to me that other people, beyond airline passengers, ought to 
be paying for this security. Taxpayers, obviously. We don’t even call 
these taxes. We call them fees now, right? But they’re taxes, as far 
as the airline passengers are concerned. But there’s no such burden 
on other people who use other forms of transportation, and I think 
that’s wrong. 

Senator Inouye? 
Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much. 
I’d like to followup on your questioning. Of the amount raised by 

this passenger fee, how much do you anticipate raising? 

Admiral  STONE.  The  passenger  fee,  a  total  for  Fiscal  Year  2006 

would be $3.7 billion, 73 percent of the screening costs. 

Senator INOUYE. Of that amount, what is the new fee? 
Admiral STONE. The new fee would raise from $2.50 to $5.50, the 

one-way flight, and up to a cap of $8 for segment flights. 

Senator INOUYE. Of the amount being raised, how much is being 

spent for airline security? 

Admiral STONE. The $5.2 billion overall is the fee for aviation se-
curity,  of  which  the  passenger  fee,  if  enacted,  would  be  73  percent 
of that total. The airlines’ fee would maintain consistency with this 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

40

fiscal year, at 7 percent, and then the general taxpayers’ fee would 
drop to 20 percent of that overall amount. 

Senator  INOUYE.  In  other  words,  you’re  telling  us  that  none  of 

the increase will be spent for other modes of transportation? 

Admiral STONE. Yes, sir. I’m saying that this all goes toward the 
aviation  screening  bill  of  $5.2  billion,  and  it  just  adjusts  the  share 
between passengers and the general taxpayer. 

Senator  INOUYE.  And  for  the  other  modes,  taxpayers  are  paying 

100 percent? 

Admiral STONE. And in the other modes of transportation, as was 
indicated, there are various fee adjustments, but the TSA does not, 
in the Department, intend on recommending additional fees at this 
time in those modes of transportation. 

Senator INOUYE. So the fees are being paid by the general taxing 

population. 

Admiral  STONE.  By  the  general  tax  population  and  some  degree 

of user fee, depending on the mode. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Your  recent  reorganization,  where  you  put  the 
maritime, land, and aviation operations into an Office of Intermod-
alism——

Admiral STONE. Yes, sir. 
Senator  INOUYE.—will  this  improve  maritime  and  rail  transpor-

tation security? 

Admiral  STONE.  Yes,  sir,  I  believe  it  will.  We’ve  taken  what  was 
previously  an  organization  at  TSA  that  had  a  block  for  aviation 
and then a block called maritime and land, and we combined them 
and broke them down in accordance with Homeland Security Presi-
dential  Directive  number  7,  which  has  the  modes  of  transpor-
tation—mass  transit,  rail,  highway,  pipeline,  aviation,  maritime, 
and  shipping  and  postal—in  order  to  give  more  of  an  intermodal 
focus.  It  also  helps  stakeholders  that  are  looking  at  TSA  know 
where  to  come  in,  in  order  to  be  serviced  for  their  specific  ques-
tions, be it mass transit or rail or highways. 

So  we  see  that  this  will  be  a  powerful  signal  of  our  intent  that 
we  are  responsible  across  transportation  sectors.  We  have  speci-
ficity  with  regard  to  those  modes,  and  the  modal  plans  that  are 
coming  out  on  April  1st,  which  are  constructed  by  threat,  criti-
cality,  vulnerability,  and  then  the  appropriate  risk  mitigation 
measure,  I  think,  will  integrate  extremely  well  with  that  new 
alignment. 

Ms. BERRICK. And if I could——
Senator  INOUYE.  Besides  sending  a  powerful  signal,  will  it  im-

prove the operations? 

Admiral  STONE.  I  believe  it  will.  It  really  helps  us  understand 
the  entire  domain  by  having  that  sort  of  a  realignment  and  focus 
on those modes. 

Ms.  BERRICK.  If  I  could  add,  Senator,  we  believe  that  the  intent 
behind the restructuring, which is to achieve efficiencies and avoid 
duplication  of  effort,  is  a  good  approach.  However,  the  organiza-
tional  change  alone  isn’t  going  to  ensure  its  success.  They  have  to 
make  sure  that  those  coordination  and  commonalities  among  the 
programs are evaluated. 

And,  also,  several  of  these  programs,  we’ve  identified  existing 
challenges  that  will  need  to  be  addressed.  For  example,  in  inte-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

41

grating  the  R&D  efforts  throughout  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security, certain issues are going to need to be resolved that we’ve 
identified in the past. For example, having deployment dates for its 
R&D  efforts,  also  having  just  a  complete  inventory  of  what  all  the 
R&D projects are throughout the Department, which we didn’t see. 
So  those  issues  will  still  need  to  be  addressed  in  moving  forward 
with this reorganization. 

Senator  INOUYE.  This  reorganization  will  bring  about  secure—I 
mean, efficiency, as you said. Will it mean cutting personnel or in-
creasing personnel? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  I  don’t  know  what  the  Department’s  decisions  are 
regarding  personnel,  other  than  the  functions  are  going  to  be——
Admiral  STONE.  With  regard  to  the  proposed  realignments  for 
the Screening Coordination Office, the personnel that are currently 
engaged in that activity at TSA would transfer into that office and 
work  them  with  their  counterparts  that  would  be  coming  in  from 
Customs  and  Border  Protection.  And  so,  the  bodies  stay  the  same. 
The  attempt  to  reduce  the  stovepipe  approach,  where  you  have, 
say, a program like international travel that Commissioner Bonner 
is  working  in  that  fashion  today,  and  then  we  have  Registered 
Traveler,  and  there’s  USVISIT.  The  Screening  Coordination  Office 
will  be  designed  to  bring  those  individuals  together  under  that  of-
fice  and  have  one  seamless  program,  rather  than  three  stovepiped 
ones. 

Senator  INOUYE.  How  much  would  it  cost  to  bring  about  this  re-

organization? 

nization? 

Admiral  STONE.  For  the  Screening  Coordination  Office,  it’s  a 
transfer  of  those  funds  from  the  respective  agencies  in  there,  so 
there’s  no  additional  cost  involved.  It’s  the  transfer  of  those  bodies 
and people into the Screening Coordination Office. 

And  then  for  the  research  and  development  piece,  the  desire  by 
the Department to integrate the laboratories so that you don’t have 
one  laboratory  working  on  the  project  at  the  TSA  lab  and  Atlantic 
City  has  no  visibility  on,  to  integrate  that  to  reduce  overlap  and 
duplication, while, at the same time, empowering TSA to task that 
lab to achieve its mission, is the goal of that realignment. 

Senator INOUYE. And, Ms. Berrick, do you approve of this reorga-

Ms. BERRICK. We believe, again, that the intent behind the reor-
ganization  is  a  good  one.  And,  again,  the  intent  is  to  achieve  effi-
ciencies  and  avoid  duplication  of  efforts.  Because  there  are  several 
screening  systems  throughout  the  Department,  and  several  within 
TSA—six  within  TSA,  specifically.  So  the  intent  is  a  good  one,  but 
the  organizational  change  alone  isn’t  going  to  make—ensure  suc-
cess and that those goals are achieved. 

Commonalities among the programs need to be fully evaluated to 
ensure that efficiencies are achieved. Also, there has to be much co-
ordination.  And,  again,  there  were  some  existing  problems  with 
some  of  these  programs  before  this  reorganization  was  proposed, 
and those problems will still need to be addressed. 

Senator INOUYE. And this intent will not address it? 
Ms. BERRICK. I believe they’re moving in the right direction, and 
I think the reorganization, in terms of trying to achieve efficiencies 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

42

and commonality is a good idea. It’s just the implementation that’s 
going to be what’s important. 

Admiral  STONE.  Sir,  if  I  may  add,  and  also  to  make  sure,  as  we 
go  about  that,  that  we  do  no  harm  to  the  momentum  that’s  been 
achieved in these programs, such as Registered Traveler and inter-
national pass, so I think Under Secretary Hutchinson and Admiral 
Loy  have  stated  that  the  idea  is  not  to  do  harm  and  slow  down 
those  programs.  We  need  to  move  forward  aggressively,  but  inte-
grate them. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much. 
Admiral STONE. Yes, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator McCain? 
Senator MCCAIN. I want to thank the witnesses. 
Ms.  Berrick,  from  reading  your  report,  it  seems  to  me  the  area 
that  you  emphasize—and,  I  think,  appropriately—is  the  risk-man-
agement aspect of TSA, identifying prioritizing, and managing risk. 
Is that correct? 

Ms. BERRICK. Yes, it is, Senator. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  And,  Admiral  Stone,  would  you  agree  with 

that? 

now? 

Admiral  STONE.  That  the  key  is  that  we  have  a  risk-based  ap-

proach, I would agree with that, yes, sir. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  And  right  now,  in  Ms.  Berrick’s  view,  the 

GAO’s review, that’s lacking. 

Admiral  STONE.  I  don’t  agree  with  that.  We  have  the  Strategic 
Threat  Assessment  Report,  which  is  a  secret  no-foreign  document 
that  we  have  all  of  our  programs  linked  to.  I  think  we  have  our 
emphasis and our money going where the threats are. 

Senator MCCAIN. Tell me, where’s our area of greatest risk right 

Admiral  STONE.  I  believe  the  use  of  an  aircraft  as  a  weapon  to 
be  able  to  be  delivered  anywhere  throughout  the  United  States, 
whether that’s to a chemical plant or a nuclear plant or a economic 
center or a political center——

Senator  MCCAIN.  That’s  still  our  area  of  greatest  risk,  even 

though that’s been the area of our greatest investment. 

Admiral  STONE.  I  think  it’s  the  greatest  risk  due  to  the  prepon-
derance  of  threat  streams  that  indicate  that,  despite  our  efforts, 
there’s  a  desire  to  use  a  weapon  as  a  delivery  vehicle  and  also,  I 
would  add  a  second  to  that,  an  aircraft  as  a  target.  So  both  as  a 
delivery system, as a target, I would list at the very top of our pri-
ority  list,  and  that  our—and,  therefore,  our  strategy  matches  the 
threat and the risk. 

Senator MCCAIN. Ms. Berrick, go ahead. 
Ms.  BERRICK.  Thank  you,  Senator.  With  respect  to  conducting 
risk assessments, we do identify in our statement that TSA is mov-
ing  in  that  direction  and  they’ve  started  developing  tools  to  inte-
grate  this  into  their  decision-making  processes,  but  we  don’t  think 
that they’re fully there yet. 

You mentioned areas where there may be vulnerabilities. We did 
a  review  looking  at  general  aviation,  and  there’s  19,000  general 
aviation airports across the country, and found that although there 
were  some  limited  assessments  of  threats,  a  complete  threat  as-
sessment  wasn’t  conducted  of  the  general  aviation  population,  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

43

there  were  also  only  limited  vulnerability  assessments  that  were 
conducted to determine, out of these 19,000 airports, which are the 
most vulnerable and which should we be focused on. 

And  related  to  aviation  security,  we  looked  at  airport  perimeter 
security  and  access  controls,  and  also  identified  areas  for  improve-
ment  in  conducting  vulnerability  assessments  within  the  airports 
themselves.  Which  airports  are  the  most  vulnerable?  What  should 
we do to improve access controls to protect the airports? 

Senator MCCAIN. How did you view border security, Ms. Berrick, 

as a priority? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  Border  security  is  another  area  that  we  think  a 
risk-management  approach  should  be  applied  relative  to  aviation 
and the other modes of transportation. Until this approach is fully 
integrated into decision-making processes and analysis, it’s hard to 
determine where the resources should be allocated. So I don’t think 
right  now  we  can  answer  the  question—Should  money  be  going  to 
border security versus aviation versus any other mode?—until this 
is  really  integrated  into  the  process  and  these  assessments  are 
done.  And  this  is  a  very  difficult  thing  to  do  for  any  organization 
that we’ve looked at, so it’s definitely a challenge to integrate that. 

Senator MCCAIN. Do you want to speak, Admiral? 
Admiral STONE. Yes, sir. I believe the key documents for TSA are 
the  modal  plans,  the  fact  that  we  need  to  develop  and  provide  to 
Congress, by 1 April, those modal plans that list each mode—mass 
transit, rail. Currently the stakeholders now are reviewing those so 
that  we  can  benefit  from  their  view  of  how  that  risk-mitigation 
plan  should  be  developed.  And  that  truly  is  the  essence  of  a  risk-
based  plan.  If  you’ve  got  a  modal  plan  that  looks  at  threat,  criti-
cality,  vulnerability,  and  concrete  steps  to  mitigate  risk  that  has 
viable  that  has  buy-in  from  the  stakeholders,  that’s  a  powerful 
roadmap  for  how  to  secure  transportation.  So  I  believe  that  docu-
ment  is  critical  and  why  we’re  putting  so  much  emphasis  on  it 
today. 

Ms. BERRICK. I——
Senator MCCAIN. Well, as a—Ms. Berrick, go ahead. 
Ms. BERRICK. I’m sorry. 
Senator MCCAIN. Go ahead. 
Ms. BERRICK. I just wanted to add that I would agree that that’s 
where  TSA  needs  to  start,  is  with  these  modal  plans.  And  from 
that flows other tools, risk-management tools, that they need to de-
velop to integrate those into processes. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Admiral,  one  of  my  disappointments  is  that  I 
can’t  identify,  as  a  passenger,  any  significant  improvements  with 
the  use  of  technology  in  the  screening  of  passengers  since  TSA 
began  its  operations.  Time  after  time  in  hearings  before  this  Com-
mittee,  I  and  other  Members  urge  that  we  develop  technology 
which  will  expedite  the  movement  of  millions  of  people  every  day 
in  and  out  of  airports.  And  so  far  I  have  not  seen—now,  I  know 
explosive-detection  devices  have  been  put  in,  and  I  think  baggage 
screeners have been put in, but, as far as the individual passenger 
is concerned, I’ve seen very little change, except now I have to take 
off  my  jacket,  as  well  as  my  shoes.  So  I  urge  you,  again,  we’ve  got 
to  develop  technology,  or  the  airlines  will  never  fully  recover,  as 
long as there is extreme inconveniences that passengers are experi-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

44

encing.  And  I’ll  be  glad  to  hear  your  response  to  that.  But  does  it 
concern  you  that  two  million  people  are  crossing  our  border  every 
year  in—coming  into  the  United  States?  Isn’t  that  a  security  con-
cern? 

Admiral  STONE.  I  believe  it  is.  And  I  know  that  a  lot  of  people 
are  working  real  hard  at  Customs  and  Border  Protection  and  the 
Under  Secretary  for  Border  Transportation  Security  to  mitigate 
that risk. 

With regard to the issue of——
Senator MCCAIN. Go ahead. 
Admiral  STONE.—technology,  sir,  the—I’d  just  highlight  that. 
The  $28  million,  this  year,  so  that  we  can  have  portals  at  some  of 
our checkpoints and expand it in 2006 to get away from the intru-
sive  torso  pat-down,  the  use  of  technologies—biometrics,  iris  scan, 
fingerprinting—for  Registered  Traveler,  and  then  the  Reveal  tech-
nology,  which  was  recently  certified,  in  that  we  have  $15  million 
and  they’re  starting  pilots  at  airports,  which  is  a  mini  CAT-scan 
device. Those sorts of technologies, both in Registered Traveler, Re-
veal, and then the portals, are absolutely critical to easing the flow 
of people through checkpoints, to accelerate that, and——

Senator MCCAIN. When can we expect to see some of that? 
Admiral STONE. The three Reveal pilots should start next month, 
and  then  last  for  60  days,  and  then  we  look  at  then  having  that—
a  list  developed  of  where  those  airports  should  be  that  need  that. 
Because it gets us away from the explosive-trace devices, which are 
manpower  intensive,  and  gives  you  higher  quality  security.  So 
we’re going to hear a lot about Reveal-type technologies in the com-
ing  months,  and  how  that’s  our  future.  RT—today  we  signed  the 
MOU with Orlando for the private-sector initiative, for how we can 
roll out Registered Traveler in a more accelerated manner. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  What  would  be  the  effect,  if  any,  of  privatiza-

tion of the screeners? 

Admiral STONE. For privatization——
Senator MCCAIN. In your view. 
Admiral  STONE.—of  our  screening  force?  I  think  to  do  so  in  a 
sweeping  manner  would  cause  tremendous  churn  of  the  entire 
work force throughout the United States. We saw that churn as we 
went  from  private  screeners  to  federalized  screeners.  So  I  believe 
the  process,  which  is  more  thoughtful,  where  you  provide  a  oppor-
tunity for an airport to decide what’s best for them, and then allow 
them  to  decide  if  they  want  to  revert  back  to  a  private  screening 
regime, is the appropriate one. 

Senator MCCAIN. And you would be setting standards of perform-
ance,  because  originally  the  reason  why  we  went  to—away  from 
private  screeners  is  because  of  the  lack  of  standards  and  lack  of 
performance, right? 

Admiral STONE. Right. We would be back in the business of hav-
ing  an  oversight  staff  at  an  airport,  much  like  San  Francisco  and 
Kansas  City,  where  the  Federal  Security  Director  and  his  or  her 
staff oversee the standards at that airport. 

Senator MCCAIN. I thank the witnesses. Thank you. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Dorgan? 
Senator DORGAN. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

45

We  all  understand,  I  think,  that  transportation  security  is  not 
optional, it’s a requirement. The 9/11 attack, terrorist attack in this 
country  using  aircraft,  and  last  year’s  devastating  terrorist  attack 
in  Spain  using  the  rail  system,  we  all  understand  that  this  is  not 
an option, it’s a requirement. The question is how to do it. 

And I want to talk to you just a little bit about the fees. The way 
the  fees  have  been  applied,  and  I  think  would  be  applied,  I  think, 
are  unfair,  rather,  to  people  in  my  part  of  the  country,  in  rural 
areas.  When  Senator  Boxer  would  fly  from  her—a  California  con-
stituent—fly  from  Los  Angeles  to  Washington,  DC,  they’ll  pay  the 
two-and-a-half-dollar  fee,  but  every  North  Dakotan  who  flies  from 
North Dakota to DC will pay that twice, because they’re using two 
segments.  There  is  no  nonstop  service  from  Bismark  to  Wash-
ington, DC, or Fargo to Washington, DC. So we’ve constructed a fee 
that  is  fundamentally  unfair,  in  my  judgment,  to  people  in  rural 
areas, because they have to use more segments to get where they’re 
going. Would you agree with that? 

Admiral STONE. In that scenario that you described, for user fees 
and  how  we’ve  constructed  it,  I  would  agree  that  there’s  a  greater 
fee for those that are put in a position where they have to fly with 
segmented flights, yes, sir. 

Senator DORGAN. And there is a greater fee, despite the fact that 
when  they  get  to  their  connection  point—in  North  Dakota’s  case, 
it’s almost always Minneapolis—they don’t place any burden on se-
curity  there  because  they’ve  already  been  screened  through  secu-
rity at the airport origin, Bismark or Fargo or one of the North Da-
kota  cities.  So  they’re  charged  twice,  because  there  are  two  seg-
ments, despite the fact they impose no additional burden on the se-
curity  system  at  the  point  where  they  transfer.  Do  you  agree  with 
that? 

Admiral  STONE.  I  would  agree  with  that,  the  way  you’ve  de-

scribed it, yes, sir. 

Senator  DORGAN.  And  so,  this  unfairness  will  be  exacerbated  by 

a proposed increase in the fee. Do you agree with that? 

Admiral STONE. Exactly. Those that are traveling in the manner 
that  you  describe  will  have  a  higher  fee  to  pay  as  a  result  of  this 
adjustment, yes, sir. 

Senator DORGAN. So I don’t know that—whether Senator Stevens 
was  trying  to  make  that  point,  but  it  seems  to  me,  whether  you’re 
in Alaska or whether you’re in North Dakota, or perhaps Arkansas, 
where  you  don’t  have  many  nonstop  flights  to  the  major  hubs, 
we’re  always  going  to  pay  more,  always  perhaps  double  or  triple 
the  fees  that  are  paid  by  people  that  are  traveling  from  one  large 
city  to  another,  because  they’re  going  nonstop.  They’ll  pay  one  fee. 
And  we’re  going  with  one  or  two  transfers,  and  we’ll  pay  two  or 
three  fees.  And  so,  I  made  the  point  when  the  fee  was  originally 
established,  but  increasing  the  fee  will  increase  the  unfairness  for 
folks  who  live  in  our  part  of  the  country,  rural  areas,  rural  states. 
And  so,  I  don’t  think  much—it  makes  much  sense  to  recognize  an 
unfairness  and  then  see  if  we  can  exacerbate  it  with  an  increase 
in the fee. 

So,  I  mean,  we  have  to  pay  for  all  this.  I  agree  with  my  col-
league,  Senator  McCain.  One  way  or  the  other,  security  is  not  an 
option, it’s a requirement. And we have to pay for it. The question 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

46

isn’t  whether,  it’s  how.  But,  frankly,  I  don’t  like  the  notion  of  pay-
ing for it in a way that always, inevitably overburdens the folks in 
rural areas, where you don’t have nonstop flights. 

So, Ms. Berrick——
Ms. BERRICK. Yes. 
Senator DORGAN.—your assessment of that? 
Ms.  BERRICK.  I  would  like  to  let  you  know,  Senator,  that  we 
think  it’s  worthwhile  to  do  an  assessment  of  these  fees.  And,  in 
fact,  GAO  has  an  ongoing  review  right  now  looking  at  the  cost  of 
providing security when the airlines had that responsibility, to help 
do  this  assessment.  And  we’re  going  to  be  publishing  a  report  in 
April  of  this  year  summarizing  the  results  of  that  review,  just  to 
let you know that that’s going to be coming forth. 

Senator  DORGAN.  All  right.  Well,  I  just  want  to  make  the  point 
on  fees,  that  there’s  a  basic,  inherent  unfairness  that  exists,  and 
the  last  thing  we  ought  to  do  is  exacerbate  that  with  these  pro-
posals. 

I  want  to  ask  another  question.  I  think  it  was  a  year  or  a  year 
and  a  half  ago,  we  had  a  Committee  meeting  that  was  closed,  and 
we  were  presented  secret  material  at  that  point.  And  perhaps  the 
Chairman  or  the  former  Chairman  can  help  me  with  this.  I  don’t 
know  whether  it  was  the  GAO  or  the  Inspector  General  that  pro-
vided us the results of an investigation of airport screening. It was 
done in secret. It has, to my knowledge, not been leaked, even after 
the  Committee  hearing.  But  it  was  an  investigation  at  certain  air-
ports  of  these  screening  capabilities  that  existed.  And  most  of  the 
Members  of  this  Committee  walked  out  of  that  briefing  just  shell-
shocked  by  what  we  had  learned.  It  was  unbelievable  to  me.  And 
I, of course, will not, and cannot, disclose the results. 

But you, undoubtedly, know those results. I assume you’ve stud-

ied that. 

port? 

Ms. BERRICK. Yes. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Was  that  an  Inspector  General  or  a  GAO  re-

Ms. BERRICK. It was both of us, actually. 
Senator DORGAN. OK. 
Ms. BERRICK. We were both involved in that. 
Senator  DORGAN.  So  you  will  recall  the  results.  And  I  want  to 
know,  has  anything  changed  since  then?  Because,  if  not,  we’ve  got 
real  serious  trouble  here.  That  investigation  provided  information 
that, as I said, was just shocking to me. 

So where are we, from that point until now, Ms. Berrick? 
Ms.  BERRICK.  In  terms  of  the  actual  undercover  testing,  we  also 
agree that that’s a very important area, in terms of measuring per-
formance on how well the screeners are doing. So we’re continuing 
to look at it. 

There  have  been  some  structural  changes,  in  that  TSA  is  con-
ducting  more  of  this  testing.  The  Internal  Affairs  Office,  who  does 
this testing, has been testing more airports than what they’ve done 
before.  And,  in  summary,  we’ve  seen  some  improvements,  but  it 
hasn’t been dramatic. In terms of the results——

Senator  DORGAN.  The  only  way  we  can  determine  the  capability 
of the screening procedures is to test it and attempt to foil it in the 
kind of investigations that have been done. And I’m just asking, is 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

47

there  a  qualitative  analysis  or  a  qualitative  assessment  about  the 
improvement from then until now? Because if there is not measur-
able  improvement—and  I  think  that’s  what  you’re  suggesting—I 
think we’ve got real serious trouble here. 

Ms.  BERRICK.  There  are  different  ways  to  measure  the  perform-
ance  of  screeners.  One  is  through  this  undercover  testing.  There’s 
also  a  re-certification  program  that  TSA  requires  each  screener  to 
go  through  every  year  to  retest  their  skills.  So  that  also  provides 
data. There’s also a system called the Threat Image Projection Sys-
tem,  where  it  flashes  images  of  threat  objects  on  a  screen  to  see 
if  the  screener  will  detect  it.  And  there’s  also  some  other  initia-
tives. 

So  I  think,  in  looking  at  performance  of  screeners,  you  have  to 
look at all of those, collectively. The undercover testing is one indi-
cator, and it’s important, but there is some others, as well. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Stone, do you want to comment? However, 
if  I  might  say  this,  that  the  testing  that  was  done  was  done  in  a 
way that is designed to try to foil the system, a passenger who, by 
design,  wants  to  bring  a  weapon  onboard.  That’s  the  purpose  of 
that  kind  of  testing.  And  the  fact  is,  the  results  were  quite  shock-
ing. And so, I understand about improving screeners, looking at the 
monitor,  and  all  that,  but  I’m  much  more  interested  in  the  under-
cover investigations in which they’re trying to test by trying to foil 
the  system  and  bring  a  weapon  onboard.  Obviously,  that’s  where 
aviation  security  really  counts,  is  making  sure  we  get  those  folks 
and understand who they are and screen them out. 

Mr. Stone? 
Admiral  STONE.  I  couldn’t  agree  more,  Senator.  The  issue  of 
those  tests  is  to  look  at  what  are  the  causal  factors.  It’s  not  just 
exhortation  in  the  workplace,  telling  screeners  to  do  better  and 
work harder. Much of it is the technology. If you’re going to be able 
to  detect  a  certain  type  of  explosive,  you  need  to  learn  from  what 
your  covert  testing  is  telling  you,  and  then  make  those  invest-
ments. And so, that translation between what is the covert testing 
saying  are  the  vulnerabilities,  and  what  are  you  investing,  is  the 
key  to  it.  And  then  the  other  piece,  on  those  things  that  you  can 
remedy,  through  training,  through  the  Threat  Image  Projection 
System,  with  which  we’ve  had  a  6  percent  increase,  and  we  meas-
ure  it  daily,  know  how  our  screeners  are  doing  on  those  X-ray  im-
ages  that  we  measure  every  day  the  number  of  airports  that  are 
inspecting  100  percent  of  bags  electronically,  so  we  don’t  have 
equipment  and  people  sitting  out  in  an  airport  that  aren’t  doing 
that,  that  are  mitigating  it  and  using  alternative  screening  proce-
dures. Every day, that report comes in now, it’s analyzed, what are 
the  causal  factors?  And  we’ve  got  a  dramatic  change  in  the  last 
year  over  our  ability  to  ensure  that  100  percent  of  all  passengers 
are  being  screened,  100  percent  of  all  bags  are  being  electrically 
checked, covert test scores are being translated into programs. 

And  we’d  like  to  provide  a  brief  to  the  Committee,  at  the  appro-
priate  time,  on  the  last  year,  where  we’ve  gone  on  both  security 
issues, as well as covert testing. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  wonder  if  I  might  make  a  re-
quest. It’s been, I think, a year and a half, or perhaps 2 years now, 
since  we  had  that  analysis.  I’m  wondering  whether  the  Committee 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

48

might  not  want  to  request  a  new  type  of  testing,  undercover  test-
ing,  and  see  if  we  can  compare  the  qualitative  change  in  2  years. 
Has there been a change, or hasn’t there been a change? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  And  if  I  could  add,  Senator,  also,  we  are  going  to 
be publishing something. GAO will be publishing something within 
the  next  month  that  details  the  results  of  TSA’s  covert  testing  ef-
forts.  That  would  provide  data  over  the  year  since  they  initiated 
the program til today on what the changes have been. 

Senator DORGAN. Will that be classified? 
Ms. BERRICK. It will be. 
Senator DORGAN. I would hope we’d have a hearing on that. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I  think  even  the  fact  that  we  may  hold  other 

types of tests ought to remain classified, Senator. 

Senator Boxer? 
Senator BOXER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  want  to  talk  about  port  security  for  a  minute.  We  know  that 
the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  has  told  us  that  the  ports  need  $5.4  billion 
over 10 years to pay for upgrades. And what we’ve got here in this 
budget  is  $600  million.  And  that  $600  million  is  not  only  for  port 
security, but for rail security and for energy facilities. 

I  am  stunned  that  this  purports  to  be  a  budget  that  takes  care 
of  homeland  security.  How  can  you  possibly  defend  that  type  of  a 
number here, when we just about have enough to do a year’s worth 
of  port  security,  and  then  we’re  throwing  in  rail  and  energy  facili-
ties? 

Admiral STONE. The state and local government coordination and 
organization  that’s  been  set  up  in  preparation  to  ensure  that  that 
$600 million is appropriately vetted through all the modes of trans-
portation, including maritime. TSA’s role in that is to be the intel-
lectual capital to go and review that, to see what are the risks and 
how  should  those  be  racked  and  stacked  within  that  organization. 
We  believe  that  that  approach  is  a  sound  one,  that  you  want  to 
make sure that the entity responsible for transportation security is 
providing  the  intellectual  capital  to  vet  where  that  600  million 
should go. We believe that’s a sound approach. 

Senator BOXER. Well, with all due respect, Mr. Stone—and I real-
ly  do  respect  you,  and  I  think  you’re  working  so  hard  to  do  the 
right thing—that was a really convoluted answer to a simple ques-
tion,  which  is,  is  this  enough  money  to  deal  with  it?  If  you  trust 
the  Coast  Guard—I  assume  you  trust  the  Coast  Guard—and  they 
say  they  need,  essentially  5.4  billion,  500  million  a  year,  just  to 
meet the needs, and you haven’t even thrown in there the rail secu-
rity  and  the  energy  facilities  security—and  we  know  our  nuclear 
power plants are sitting ducks at this stage. We worked so hard in 
this  Committee  to  get  some  bills  to  the  floor,  which  I  understand 
the  Chairman—our  new  Chairman  is  interested  in  trying  to  push 
them  through  the  Senate,  because  a  lot  of  the  bills  just  sat  at  the 
desk there—but I want to ask you, again—you gave an answer that 
said,  ‘‘Well,  we  have  a  committee,  and  they’re  going  to  stack  these 
projects in priority.’’

Admiral STONE. Right. 
Senator BOXER. Do you believe, in light of the fact that the Coast 
Guard said that they need 500 million for port security alone, that 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

49

600 million—that’s supposed to take care of port security, rail secu-
rity, and energy facilities security—is a large enough number? 

Admiral STONE. I thought your——
Senator BOXER. Yes or no? 
Admiral  STONE.  I  believe  that  that  number  is  appropriated, 
based  on  risk,  in  that  the  modal  plan  that  comes  out  on  April  1st 
from  the  Coast  Guard,  which  is  working  with  us  on  maritime 
modal  plans,  will  show  that,  based  on  risk  assessment,  the  money 
is  going  to  the  right  place  to  mitigate  risk.  There’s  not  enough 
money in the world, probably, to drive it down to zero, but I believe 
that that——

Senator BOXER. Well——
Admiral STONE.—approach is right. 
Senator  BOXER.  OK.  We’re  spending  a  billion  a  week  in  Iraq.  A 
billion  a  week  in  Iraq.  And  now  our  biggest  concern  is  a  terrorist 
attack, which we should be concerned about. We’ve got cells in this 
country.  And  we’re  spending  a  billion  a  week  in  Iraq,  and  we  are 
spending  600  million  on  rail,  port,  and  energy  facilities  security.  I 
mean, it just doesn’t make sense to me. 

I want to ask you about grade separations. I’m sure you read the 
terrible  thing  that  happened  when  a  mentally  ill  man  caused  a 
tragic  train  wreck  in  Glendale.  People  were  going  to  work.  They 
died.  Because  we  have  these  horrific  issues  with  grade  crossings. 
He  parked  his  car  right  on  the  track,  he  was  going  to  commit  sui-
cide,  then  he  ran  out  of  the  car,  and  a  disaster  ensued.  We  have 
so  many  of  these  unsafe  situations  across  America  in  every  single 
state  of  the  union,  plenty  of  them  in  California.  Where  can  we  go, 
what  program  can  we  tap,  for  solving  these  grade  crossing  prob-
lems, either by blocking them or funding them to make grade sepa-
rations? So if we can’t afford that, to at least block the right of way 
to cars. Where can I tell my people to go to look for Federal funds? 
Because,  you  know,  the  terrorists  are  always  going  to  look  to  the 
weak link. 

Admiral  STONE.  I’m  happy  to  look  at  that  and  have  your  people 
talk  to  TSA  and  our  railroad  node—we  work  very  closely  with  the 
FRA—and find out where that——

Senator BOXER. Is there a program for——
Admiral STONE. For grade separation——
Senator BOXER.—for grade——
Admiral STONE.—crossings? 
Senator BOXER. Yes. 
Admiral  STONE.  Not  that  I’m  aware  of.  But  if  there  is  a  way 
that’s linked to a terrorism nexus as a result of some sort of threat 
stream, we’ll be happy to sit down and——

Senator BOXER. Good. 
Admiral STONE.—talk through that. 
Senator  BOXER.  OK.  I’d  love  to  meet  with  you  a  little  bit 

more——

Admiral STONE. Sure. 
Senator BOXER.—on that. 
And  the  last  question  I  had,  Mr.  Chairman,  what  transit  grants 
now—because  you  did  a  lot  of  reshuffling—can  be  spent  on  canine 
teams? Because I think those are quite effective. Canine teams. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

50

Admiral STONE. Yes. The canine team transit grants, you’re ask-

ing for specificity——

Senator BOXER. Yes, where would they go—where would our peo-

ple go? Our airport people, our rail people—what particular——

Admiral STONE. We’ve got——
Senator BOXER.—grant program——
Admiral  STONE.—we  have  a  special  branch.  Canine  is  their  sole 
function in life. They work for our Chief Operating Officer. It would 
be an outstanding place to go to find out how we can help mitigate 
risk and partner with those that need canine resources. 

Senator  BOXER.  Is  there  a  special  grant  program  for  these—that 

funds these canine——

you are, on——

Admiral  STONE.  I’m  not  aware  of  any  specificity  on  that,  unless 

Ms. BERRICK. Right. I would add that it could come out of many 
different  grant  programs,  because  canines  are  used  for  many  dif-
ferent  sources.  They’re  used  on  rail  systems  to  sniff  for  explosives, 
they’re used with air cargo. So it could come out of many different 
sources. 

With  respect  to  your  question  on  safety  with  rail  crossings,  I 
would recommend that FRA, which is the Federal Railway Associa-
tion  within  the  Department  of  Transportation,  have  a  safety  re-
sponsibility related to rail. But there is a close intersection between 
what  the  Department  of  Transportation  does  and  FRA  does  and 
what  TSA  does,  because  safety  and  security  intersects  in  many 
areas, and sometimes they could implement a safety measure, and 
it could have a negative impact on security. So there has to be close 
coordination between both groups. 

Senator BOXER. Well, Mr. Chairman, if I could—oh, he’s gone. 
I would just say to my colleagues that this terrible situation that 
occurred  on  a  grade  crossing  should  be  a  wake-up  call  to  all  of  us, 
because  all  of  our  states  have  these  unsafe  situations,  where  the 
cars  can  just  park  right  on  these  rail  crossings.  And  the  fact  that 
this  case  was  a  mentally  disturbed  individual  is  one  issue,  but  it 
just shows a tremendous vulnerability here. 

I think it’s safety and it’s anti-terrorism. And so, we should pool 
our  resources.  And  hope  that,  as  we  go  along  with  legislation,  Mr. 
Chairman, we can take a look at these grade crossings, because all 
someone has to do, a terrorist, for example, is park a car there and 
leave,  and  we’ve  got  a  crisis  of  major  proportions  that  unfortu-
nately, wreaked havoc on us in California. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator INOUYE. [presiding]: Thank you very much. 
Senator Nelson? 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Admiral Stone, you mentioned risk assessment, and you said the 
greatest  risk  that  we  still  have,  as  it  relates  to  aircraft  is  a  flying 
bomb,  a  targeted  effort  to  fly  an  airplane  and  create  some  sort  of 
mass  destruction.  I  thought  that  securing  the  cockpit  door—we’re 
talking  about  commercial  airlines  now,  and  not  general  aviation—
I  think  might  apply  to  general  aviation—but  how  can  that  be  the 
concern  today,  with  the  locked  cockpit  door,  without  access  to  the 
controls?  How  can  that  be?  How  can  that  still  be  the  number-one 
security  risk  that  we’re  trying  to  plug,  through  airport  security, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

51

where  you’ve  got  to  take  off  your  coat,  take  off  your  shoes?  Maybe 
you can explain that to me. 

Admiral STONE. When you look at the threat streams and see the 
desired  intent  to  conduct  those  sorts  of  operations,  and  then  you 
look  at  the  criticality  of  it,  and  you  do  the  assessments,  and  say, 
well, how critical would that be if that were to happen? 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Oh,  no,  I  think  it  would  be  very  critical  if 
it  were  to  happen,  but  the  question  is,  haven’t  we  taken  steps  to 
prevent  that  from  being  a  logical  extension  of  a  plane  as  a  bomb? 
Admiral STONE. Yes, sir. So the vulnerability piece, we’ve greatly 
reduced through the layered security approach and hardened cock-
pit  doors,  federal  flight-deck  officers,  FAMs,  increase  security  re-
gimes in our nation’s airports. So we’ve greatly reduced the risk of 
that.  However,  when  asked,  well,  what  do  we  believe  is  still  the 
risk  that  we  face  that  we  need  to  be  mightily  prepared  for?  That 
elevates  it  to  the  very  top,  based  on  the  threat  and  the  criticality. 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  But  I  hope  we’re  not  putting  a  lot  of  our 
emphasis into security to deal with something that has been large-
ly thwarted by previous security measures. Because it seems to me 
checking  the  boarding  pass  twice—I  don’t  know  what  that  does  to 
deal with the major threat that you’re concerned about. 

Ms. BERRICK. If I could add, there’s two pieces to this, or several 
pieces,  but  two  major,  one  is  threat  and  one  is  vulnerability,  and 
somewhat  independent,  but  then  they  come  together.  You  can  do 
an assessment of threats, and the threat can still be there. I think 
where your question is going is actually how vulnerable is the air-
craft  if  we  have  hardened  cockpit  doors,  if  we  have  Federal  air 
marshals,  if  we  have  screening?  When  is  enough  enough?  And——
Senator  BEN NELSON.  Yes,  because  more  of  the  same  at  more 
cost  doesn’t  necessarily  make  me  feel  safer  flying  on  the  airplane. 
Ms.  BERRICK.  And  that’s,  I  think,  where  the  risk-management 
approach  comes  in,  that  you  have  to  assess  these  threats  and 
vulnerabilities and then decide, based on the threat and the meas-
ures that we have in place, should we be putting more money here 
or other places? 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  I  quite  agree  with  you.  I  come  from 
the  insurance  business,  so  I  do  understand  risk  assessment,  cost-
benefit  analysis.  And  I  don’t  see  the  relationship,  taking  off  the 
coat,  showing  the  boarding  pass  twice  to  an  airport  personnel  at 
the  beginning,  going  through  the  line,  showing  it  as  you  walk 
through  the  security.  Maybe  you  can  explain  to  me  how  that  isn’t 
just  a  cost,  how  that  relates  to  better  security—maybe  the 
vulnerabilities  have  been  addressed,  but  how  does  that  contribute 
to making me safer? 

Admiral STONE. I’d be happy to, Senator. The second threat that 
I  talked  about,  as  using  the  aircraft  as  a  target,  relates  to  what 
happened in Russia just a few months ago. And taking off the jack-
et was deemed as a risk mitigation——

Senator BEN NELSON. But I go through the magnetometer——
Admiral  STONE.—so  that  you  can  see  whether  or  not  a  person 
has  something  that  looks  bulky  around  them.  In  fact,  as  a  result 
of  having  folks  remove  their  jackets,  now  what  we’re  finding  is 
packets of cocaine strapped under the armpit. Every day, I get the 
report. In other words, there’s been a number of things we have not 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

52

observed  as  a  result  of  not  being  able  to  have  in  place  taking  off 
the  jackets  and  coats.  So  it’s  been  enlightening  to  us  about  this 
issue,  since  those  Russian  aircraft  were  downed,  what  we’ve  found 
through  torso  pat-downs,  having  jackets  taken  off.  And  so,  we  be-
lieve  those  are  appropriate  measures  for  us,  because  of  the  threat 
of the aircraft as a target, not only as a weapon. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Yes,  but  it  may  not  be  a  security  issue,  it 
may be a drug issue. I’m not saying we ought to turn our eye away 
from that, but it hardly seems a justification for a fare increase, in 
effect,  through  this  additional  money.  More  costs  should  result  in 
better security, and I’m not sure that that’s the case. 

Can  you  explain  to  me  why  we  have  to  show  the  boarding  pass 
to a person at the front of the line, and then have to show it walk-
ing through the security, or is that classified? 

Admiral  STONE.  No,  sir,  I  can  explain  that.  I  think  there’s  an 

area for major improvement on——

Senator BEN NELSON. I would hope so. 
Admiral  STONE.—because  the  airline  hires  those  employees,  the 
ticket-checkers in the lines, and then you’re showing that to a TSA 
employee at the checkpoint. We’re proposing right now, and looking 
at, how we might be able to relieve the airline of that responsibility 
so  that  we  can  have  a  trained  TSA  screener  look  at  that  ID  and 
then  train  that  screener  in  the  screener  passenger  observation 
technique  that’s  currently  being  used  up  in  Portland,  Maine,  as 
well  as  in  Providence,  Rhode  Island,  where  we  look  at  behavioral 
characteristics  while  they’re  checking  that,  and  do  a  better  job  of 
that. So there is an opportunity for us there to reduce some of the 
pressure  on  the  airlines  for  hiring  that  individual  and  raising  the 
bar  on  security.  And  we  know  that  the  verification-of–ID  piece  is 
a vulnerability for us; thus, Secure Flight and the desire to do com-
mercial data base testing to see if that adds value; thus, Registered 
Traveler,  to  see  if  we  can  get  more  people  to  volunteer  to  identify 
themselves——

Senator BEN NELSON. Well, I agree with you. It seems to me that 
every  time  we  do  something  that  doesn’t  add  to  security,  there’s  a 
cost associated with it, and now we want to raise the cost. I would 
feel a little bit better about your trying to raise the cost if you came 
in  and  said,  ‘‘Here’s  what  we’ve  done  to  bring  down  the  unneces-
sary procedures that add to the cost.’’ I think you’ll probably bring 
those  down,  but  I  can  almost  guarantee  you  won’t  come  back  in 
and ask for a cost decrease. 

Admiral  STONE.  Yes,  sir.  If  I  could  add,  there’s  no  cost  increase 
in this budget. The issue of the fees is just the reapportionment of 
what percentage did passenger/user pay, as opposed to the general 
taxpayer. The cost remains the same. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  But  the  broad  base  of  cost  isn’t  going  to 

go down unless you streamline the process. 

I see my time is almost out. 
One  final  thing.  As  you  say  about  preferred  travelers,  I  want  to 
make  sure  that  this  comes  across  right.  If  we’re  going  to  do  risk 
assessments,  is  there  a  way  to  assess  risk  so  that  the  people  who 
represent  less  risk  will  get  a  different  kind  of  treatment  without 
it  being  egalitarianism,  where  you’ve  got  to  treat  everybody  the 
same,  because,  if  you  don’t,  then  it’s  not  fair  to  other  people?  It’s 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

53

not  about  fairness  here,  it’s  about  risk  assessment.  Is  there  a  way 
that  you’re  truly  working  to  do  that?  Because  I’ve  been  hearing 
about  it  for  3  years,  I  see  nothing  about  it.  I’m  not  looking  to  get 
unfair  advantage.  I  just  don’t  want  us  to  spend  our  money  doing 
something that doesn’t make sense. 

Admiral  STONE.  I  believe  the  Registered  Traveler  Program  gets 

at that issue of——

Senator BEN NELSON. When’s it going to happen? 
Admiral  STONE.  Today  we  signed  the  MOU  in  Orlando,  Florida, 
which  is  the  sixth  airport,  which  is  the  MOU  that  heads  us  down 
the  road  of  how  we  can  capitalize  on  the  private  sector  to  be  able 
to  accelerate  that  program.  So  it’s  at  the  very  high  end  of  list  of 
things  we  need  to  get  on  with  and  get  done,  so  you’ll  be  hearing 
more about that from us. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Yes,  maybe  that  will  reduce  that  overall 

cost. I’m hoping that will happen. 

Ms. BERRICK. If I could add one thing. 
The CHAIRMAN. Ms. Berrick, we do have to move on. 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Pryor? 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I’d like to followup, if I may, Admiral Stone, on a question raised 
by  Senator  Inouye  a  few  moments  ago,  and  he  talked  about  TSA 
with  the  new  fee  structure.  Is  that  going  to  raise—what,  $1.5  bil-
lion? 

Admiral  STONE.  The  difference  between  the  $5.2  billion  is  the 
overall cost. And so, it reapportions what percentage the passenger 
pays, versus the general taxpayer. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  how  much  will  that  raise?  How  much  will 

the additional——

Admiral STONE. It shifts the burden for the user, from this year, 
$1.7  billion;  to  $3.7  billion  in  2006.  So  you’d  go  from  36  percent 
user to 73 percent. And then for the general taxpayer, this year it’s 
$2.6  billion;  it’ll  go  down  to  $1  billion.  And  so,  it’ll  go,  for  the  gen-
eral taxpayer, instead of paying 57 percent of that, it’ll go down to 
20  percent.  That’s  the  adjustment.  The  airline  percentages  stay 
roughly the same, at 7 percent. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Well,  there  are  a  number  of  groups  and  as-
sociations  here  in  Washington  that  have  sent  us  a  letter,  and  one 
of  the  things,  in  the  letter,  it  talks  about—it  raises  an  additional 
1.5 billion from passengers and airlines. But, if I can quote the let-
ter, it says, quote, ‘‘It will do nothing to improve security or the ef-
ficiency  of  the  agency,’’  end  quote.  I’d  like  to  hear  your  comment 
on that. 

Admiral STONE. I think that’s misleading, in my view, that that’s 
an  additional  generation  of  $1.5  billion.  The  amount  stays  the 
same.  It’s  just  a  question  of  who’s  going  to  pay  that,  the  general 
taxpayer or the passenger/user? And the amount that we’re looking 
at having appropriated to us for aviation security goes to programs 
that there’s tremendous value added, of mitigating the risk of what 
we  see  as  two  of  the  top  threats  that  this  nation  faces,  the  use  of 
aircraft as a delivery vehicle and the use of an aircraft as a target. 
And  so,  we  believe  that  the  statement  that  you’re  not  going  to  be 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

54

getting any more for that, you’ll be getting 5.2 billion worth of avia-
tion security at a very high end. 

Senator PRYOR. And what you’re committing to the Committee is 
that  every  dime  you  raise  to  the—those  fees  will  go  right  into  air-
port security. 

Admiral STONE. Yes. That $5.2 billion goes to aviation screening 

security. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Admiral STONE. Yes, sir. 
Senator  PRYOR.  I’d  like  to  change  gears  here  and  ask  you  about 
the explosive-detection system. We have a number of small airports 
in  Arkansas.  I  know  a  lot  of  Members  of  the  Committee  have  a 
number  of  small  airports.  We  have  a  couple  of,  you  know,  larger 
airports,  by  our  standards,  where  a  majority  of  the  passengers  go 
through theirs, but they are central air service, airports, et cetera, 
out around the state. And I know other Senators have similar situ-
ations.  But  when  I  look  at  your  budget,  and  I  see  that  most  of 
these smaller airports do not have an EDS system—is that correct? 

Admiral STONE. That’s correct. 
Senator  PRYOR.  And  I’m  not  sure  I  see  the  dollars  in  the  budget 
to  get  them  a  system  without  a  pretty  hefty  local  match.  Is  that 
correct? 

Admiral STONE. That’s correct, sir. 
Senator  PRYOR.  And  it  just  seems  to  me  that  a  terrorist  could 
enter  the  system  through  a  rural  airport  just  as  easily,  or  maybe 
more  easily,  than  he  could  through  one  of  the  larger  airports.  And 
I just question the wisdom of that, where we’re putting the burden 
on  the  smaller  airports  with  lower  volume  of  traffic.  They  can’t 
generate  the  amount  of  revenue  locally  in  order  to  provide  for  this 
system,  yet  they’re  not  getting  the  assistance  from  the  Federal 
Government. Could you comment on that? 

Admiral  STONE.  I  think  the  issues  for  smaller  airports  is  why 
this  Reveal-type  technology  is  critical,  because  we  can  then  reduce 
the  number  of  these  explosive  trace  devices,  which  are  personnel-
intensive,  and  have  a  higher  quality  of  security  at  much  less  cost 
than the more expensive inline systems. 

Senator PRYOR. And what’s the time frame on those? 
Admiral STONE. The pilots start next month, and go for 30 to 60 
days.  Upon  evaluation  of  those  pilots  at  three  sites,  then  we  look 
at that and determine the rollout for how that would be able to be 
sent out to smaller airports. 

Senator PRYOR. Looking at the budget, I’m afraid that we’re cre-
ating  a  system  of  haves  and  have-nots.  And,  like  I  said,  I  think  a 
threat  could  enter  the  system  just  as  easily  at  a  rural  or  smaller 
airport than one of the larger airports. So I would just caution you 
to try to keep your eye on that ball, if at all possible. 

And  I  know  that  there’s  been  some  discussion  about  the  cap 
placed  on  the  number  of  screeners.  I  would  like  to  ask,  first,  how 
in  your  view,  Admiral,  how  is  the  morale  among  the  screeners  at 
the airports? 

Admiral  STONE.  I  think  it  varies  from  airport  to  airport.  So  I 
think I would give it as a good, overall; but, in some airports, very 
poor. And we’ve got leadership issues where we’ve——

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

Senator  PRYOR.  Are  you  addressing  those?  Are  you  addressing 

55

those issues? 

Admiral STONE. Aggressively. 
Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  And  the  reason  I  ask  is  because  I’ve  had  a 
number  of  occasions  where  I  go  through  airport  screening,  and  I 
tell them what I do for a living, and, you know, they just pour out 
their  heart  and  soul  to  me.  And,  I’ll  tell  you,  I  just  sense  that,  at 
some airports in particular, there’s serious morale problems. 

Admiral STONE. I would agree, sir. And that focus on finding out, 
through  our  ombudsman  program,  through  screeners,  through  IG 
reports,  and  going  after  that  aggressively—because  if  you  do  not 
have  a  strong  leader  that  cares  about  people,  that  airport  will  not 
be operated properly. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Now,  you  put  a  cap  on  the  number  of  screeners. 

Is that right? 

Admiral STONE. We have a 45,000 full-time equivalent cap on the 

number of screeners that we hire. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. And has that been a good cap? Is that arbi-

trary? Does that make sense? 

Admiral  STONE.  Right  now,  we  have  a  new  model,  called  the 
Regal  model,  that  we’re  briefing  the  Department  of  Homeland  Se-
curity  on,  which  is  the  model  that  was  sent  to  each  Federal  Secu-
rity  Director  to  tailor  it  to  his  or  her  airport  and  provide  us  that. 
We’re  currently  in  the  process  of  giving  briefings  and  answering 
questions  about  that  model  to  make  sure  that  it  doesn’t  have  as-
sumptions  in  it  that  are  in  error.  But  we  believe  that  that  45,000 
FTE number is one that needs to be revisited because of growth of 
airports.  When  you  look  at  Boston  Logan  opening  up  a  new  ter-
minal,  Houston  Intercon,  as  we  go  across  the  nation,  we  need  to 
make  sure  that  we’re  planning  ahead  on  what  needs  to  be  done  to 
meet  those  needs,  while  at  the  same  time  reducing  our  personnel 
requirements through technology in the workplace. So getting that 
model right is a high priority for us. 

Senator PRYOR. And my last question might be considered a two-
part  question.  It’s  about  general  aviation.  And  Transportation  Se-
curity Administration Access Certificate—TSAC——

Admiral STONE. Yes. 
Senator  PRYOR.  I’ve  had  a  number  of  folks—companies  contact 
me  and  say  that  they  would  like  to  participate  in  that,  they’d  like 
to see you move forward on that. So I’d have a question there about 
what’s the timeframe on that. And, second, getting general aviation 
flights  back  into  Reagan  National  Airport.  We  seem  to  get  some 
calls  out  our  offices  about  that,  as  well.  So  could  you  comment  on 
both of those? 

Admiral  STONE.  Certainly.  The  approach  at  TSA  is  to  look  at 
three  components.  We’re  big  believers  in  opening  and  maintaining 
access,  maintaining  an  appropriate  level  of  security,  and  then  re-
specting  privacy  and  freedoms.  When  you  look  at  the  questions 
that you asked about general aviation airports, the Transportation 
Security  Access  Certificate,  we  believe,  provides  enhanced  access 
while maintaining appropriate security. And so, we’re working with 
the  MVAA  and  others  to  ensure  that  we  have  a  game  plan  with 
them  where  individuals  who  volunteer  then  to  become  TSAC  cer-
tified will then be able to have access. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

56

At general aviation at Reagan, we also have met with the Secret 
Service,  and  with  DHS.  We’re  planning  on  giving  briefings  to  the 
new  DHS  leadership  on  a  plan  for  a  phased  approach  at  Reagan, 
where  we  look  at  the  threats.  We  believe  this  is  a  good  time  for 
us to lay out that plan and seek approval from DHS for phased ap-
proach at Reagan. We pledge to keep this Committee fully advised 
on how that planning ensues. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Admiral. 
Senator Burns? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 

Senator BURNS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
You know, I want to associate myself with Senator Dorgan, when 
he  was  talking  about  those  fees  in  rural  areas.  We  pay  a  higher 
fare,  too.  You  can  fly  roundtrip  between  here  and  San  Francisco 
twice  what  it  costs  me  to  fly  one  way  from  Great  Falls,  Montana. 
And yet you want more fees. What are you going to spend this $1.5 
billion for? 

Admiral STONE. It’s the same amount that currently is being col-
lected  from  the  general  taxpayer,  Senator.  There’s  no  increase  in 
this amount. It’s $5.2 billion. It just changes the proportion of what 
the user pays, versus the general taxpayer. 

Senator BURNS. In other words, you get no more money——
Admiral STONE. We do not, sir. 
Senator BURNS. I want the Committee to remember when we put 
this  whole  thing  together.  We  offered  a  series  of  amendments  that 
wouldn’t  have  created  the  TSA  in  the  first  place.  We’d  have  put  it 
in  the  Justice  Department.  And  there  was  a  reason  for  that.  Be-
cause  they  had  screeners  and  they  had  security  people  that  they 
could  go  to,  and  we  could  immediately  get  it  into  place.  That’s  No. 
1.  No.  2,  they  also  had  a  computer  system  up.  Now  you’ve  got  a 
big old computer system that we’ve paid how much for? 

Admiral STONE. A computer system for——
Senator BURNS. Well, for your—don’t you have references to peo-

Admiral  STONE.  We  have  a  performance  management  informa-
tion  system,  yes,  sir,  to  make  sure  that  we’re  standard  space  and 
meet  Congress’  intent  to  being  held  accountable  for  meeting 
metrics, yes, sir. 

Senator  BURNS.  Well,  but,  basically,  the  system  was  set  up  in 
order  to  access—to  find  and  search  out  these  people  that  want  to 
do bad things to this society. 

Admiral STONE. The Terrorist Screening Center. 
Senator  BURNS.  And  we  set  up  a  completely  different  system, 
and we didn’t have to do that. We already had it in the Justice De-
partment.  And  so,  anytime  that  you  say  ‘‘increase  fees,’’  it,  sort  of, 
catches—it,  sort  of,  catches  my  attention  right  away.  And  I  don’t 
see—we ought to be looking for some efficiencies in screening these 
people. There has to be a better way than what they’re doing now. 

ple and passengers and all these things? 

Admiral STONE. We do. 
Senator  BURNS.  You  had  to  set  up  a  separate  computer  system 

for that, didn’t you? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

57

I don’t know why you’re jerking out all the tickets. It’s kind of like 
Senator  Nelson,  I  don’t  see  that  we’re  just—we’re  just  not  doing  a 
very good job at that. 

And how does—do you have any assessment on what this will do 

to smaller markets? 

Admiral STONE. Our assessment, on the surveys that we had, do 
not  indicate  a  dramatic  impact  on  that.  In  other  words,  I’ve  got-
ten—briefings  have  been  given  to  me  that  show  that  smaller  mar-
kets  are  not  negatively  impacted  disproportionately  to  larger  mar-
kets. But I’m happy to review those and make sure that we——

Senator  BURNS.  It’s  gotten—I  mean,  I  don’t  know  who’s  doing 
your  reports,  but  it’s  got  to  impact  rural  markets  a  lot  more  than 
it—than  the  larger  markets  or  the  hubs.  Because  if  you’re  at  the 
end  of  the  spoke,  you’re  the  one  that’s,  sort  of,  closest  to  the 
ground. And it looks like we’re picking up a disproportional part of 
that. And I’m also getting some disparity in figures on the percent-
ages of how much the airline passengers are paying with regard to 
the total cost of the system. 

Most of the questions have already been answered, but I’m just—
I just sit and assess, you know, and I’m going to have some—we’re 
going  to  look  at  the  airline  industry  and  have  some  listening  ses-
sions.  We’re  going  to  bring  stakeholders  together.  We’re  going  to 
find  out  what  these—how  it’s  working.  I  think  your  airline  em-
ployee  system  of  security—I’m  not  real  sure  that  that’s  been  fully 
explored or handled in this case, because I know we have some peo-
ple that are working on the tarmac and on the flight line that prob-
ably couldn’t pass a security screening. 

Admiral STONE. But you——
Senator BURNS. So——
Admiral STONE. Oh, I’m sorry, Senator. 
Senator BURNS. Go ahead. 
Admiral STONE. I was just——
Senator BURNS. Would you like to comment on that? 
Admiral  STONE.—because  I  know  how  important  that  is.  We 
have  1.3  million  airport  workers,  and  we’ve  worked  hand  in  glove 
with  Triple-AE,  and  other  stakeholders.  Those  are  vetted  through 
our  Office  of  National  Risk  Assessment,  those  names.  For  the  last 
year,  that’s  been  a  high  priority,  to  have  fidelity  to  that,  to  make 
sure that there’s linkages to terrorist data bases, to see if we’ve got 
a  vulnerability  in  an  airport.  I  just  wanted  to  reassure  you  that 
that continues to be a high priority. I see, every week, the numbers 
of  airport  workers  that  have  been  vetted  through  that  process  to 
make sure we keep our eye on the ball on that. 

Senator  BURNS.  Also,  on  this  percentage  of  what  the  general—
what money comes out of the general treasury or from the general 
taxpayer, they’ve got a stake in this too. Not only the airlines. You 
can’t  have  the  passengers  pay  the  total  fee  because  they  are  the 
ones at high risk, because they were a very small part of what hap-
pened on 9/11 in New York. So I think the general public also has 
an  obligation  of  some  financial  responsibility  of  security,  even  if  it 
is airlines. 

So,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  got  most  of  my  questions  an-

swered. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

58

Thank you very much for coming. I have a couple I might submit 

to you. I might write you a letter. 

Admiral STONE. OK, Senator. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Lautenberg? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  the—I  would 
ask  unanimous  consent  that  my  statement  be  included  in  the 
record as if read, my opening statement. 

The CHAIRMAN. Yes, sir, it will be. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  And  I  listened—I’m  glad  to  see  Admiral 
Stone here on the job. I don’t know whether you look back and re-
gret, but——

Admiral STONE. Not at all. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.—to  the  good  old  days  of  being  somewhere 
on  a  ship  or  down  in  the  sea  or  somewhere,  where  it  was  easier. 
Well,  you’ve  got  a  huge  task,  and  I  reviewed  something  the  9/11 
Commission  said.  I  listened  to  something  Senator  Inouye  earlier 
said and I compare the two. The Commission said, over 90 percent 
of  the  nation’s  $5.3  billion  annual  investment  in  the  TSA  goes  to 
aviation  to  fight  the  last  war.  Now,  that’s  not  a  very  encouraging 
statement  when  we  see  what  we’ve  got  ahead  of  us.  But  I  think 
they’re  largely  right,  and  we  need  to  be  ready  to  fight,  heaven  for-
bid,  a  war  in  the  future.  And  we’re  not  assured  yet  that  we  are 
doing so. 

Rather  than  strengthening  things  like  rail  security  or  port  secu-
rity  programs,  they’re  being  kind  of  chopped  away  at  and  spread 
all  over  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security.  Now,  at  Newark 
Liberty  Airport,  in  my  home  state,  very  busy  airport,  and  others, 
we’re  seeing  the  effects  of  not  having  enough  screeners.  Now,  I 
think  you  reduced  the  force  by  about  6,000  screeners  in  2003,  if 
I’m——

Admiral STONE. In 2003——
Senator LAUTENBERG.—correct. 
Admiral STONE.—yes, sir. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. What I’m going to show you here is a knife 
similar  to  the  one  that  was  discovered  after  a  woman  had  gone 
through screening at Newark. And she then discovered the knife in 
her bag and said to her sister, who was accompanying her, ‘‘Oh, my 
God,  I  forgot  to  leave  this  knife  home.’’  I  don’t  want  to  make  any 
jokes  here,  it’s  too  serious,  but  she  was  given  the  knife  by  her 
brother  because  she  was  going  out  on  a  blind  date  in  New  Jersey. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG. And it doesn’t tell you——
The CHAIRMAN. Is that all you need there now? 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  haven’t  tested  the  sharpness  of  this, 
but—anyway,  the  fact  that,  after  all  these  years  and  all  these  ex-
penditures  and  the  effort  that  goes  into  the  training—and  you 
know  that  Newark  is  a  place  where  we’ve  been  short  of  screeners 
and trying to push to get it built back up, and that something like 
this could go through. They ran it through a second time, and dis-
covered  the  knife  image  very  clearly  there.  The  first  time,  appar-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

59

ently,  the  bag  wasn’t  even  screened,  just  passed  through.  So  when 
we look at these things, you see the breaches. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  have  been  on  time  this  morning  if  I 
wasn’t  shut  down  at  New  York  Airport,  LaGuardia  Airport,  when 
the  fellow  ahead  of  me  was  the  last  one  that  they  would  take  on 
the  flight,  saying  that  I  had  arrived  at  the  gate  too  late.  And  I 
watched  this  guy  turn  in  his  ticket  and  go  in,  and  they  refused. 
Now,  Senator  Pryor  said  something  about  the  response  he  gets 
from  screeners  and  so  forth,  how  they  unburden  themselves,  and 
I get some of that, too. Most of the time, I get ignored. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG. So there I was this morning, trying to get 
here,  but  it  almost  made  up  for  the  35  minute  wait  I  had  to  go 
through  security  in  Washington—Reagan  National  Airport  last 
week.  We’re  just  not  able  to  keep  abreast  of  these  things.  And  we 
worry, in our area, about the target appeal for terrorism that goes 
from Newark Airport to the Port of New York, and they say it’s the 
most susceptible, most interesting target for terrorists in the entire 
country.  And  we  have  to  do  our  evaluations  more  carefully  on  the 
fact  that  these  grants  ought  to  be  given  according  to  risk.  This  is 
a little apart from the subject at hand today. 

And  so,  what  I  want  to  do,  Mr.  Chairman,  in  order  to  expedite 
things,  I  just  want  to  be  sure  what  we’re  talking  about  when  we 
look  at  the  funding.  We’re  going  to  increase  our  revenue  flow  by  a 
billion-and-a-half  dollars  a  year.  Where—exactly  how  is  that  going 
to be parceled out? What part of that’s going to go to screeners. Do 
we know? 

Admiral  STONE.  There’s  not  an  increase,  Senator.  Our  budget’s 
$5.2  billion.  And  so,  whether  we  change  the  proportions  from  the 
general taxpayer to the passenger, the budget is $5.2 billion. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Right. 
Admiral STONE. So all it does is change——
Senator LAUTENBERG. So I may have——
Admiral STONE. Yes, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.—misused  the  terminology.  But  the  fact  of 

the matter is that this is a fee——

Admiral STONE. Yes, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.—to  increase  the  revenue.  And  we  have  a 
fairly astute Chairman here, and he knows a fee when he sees one, 
he  knows  a  tax  when  he  sees  one.  And  a  fee  is  only  a  tax  when 
you  have  to  pay  it.  Otherwise,  it  can  be  some  abstract  thing.  But 
that  is  a  tax  increase  of  some  significant  proportion.  And  we 
thought  that  we  had  covered  so  much  of  this.  With  Senator 
McCain’s  view  on  technology,  we’ve  been  testing  things  at  Pomona 
Airport,  you  know,  the  FAA  laboratory  in  New  Jersey,  for  such  a 
long  time.  And  yet  we  get  to  a  situation  here  where  we’re  relying 
on  people  to  do  these  jobs,  we’re  relying  on  training  programs, 
we’re  relying  on  directives.  And  we  get  a  glitch  like  this.  And  I 
don’t know whether we’ll ever be able to deal fully with it, because 
we are, after all, human beings with frailties. But the effort has to 
be picked up. 

And  one  of  the  things,  Admiral  Stone  that  is—has  been  talked 
about, and that is, moving this to private hands. What’s the status 
of that? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

60

Admiral  STONE.  Right  now,  we  have  what’s  called  the  Screener 
Partnership  Program,  or  otherwise  known  as  ‘‘Opt-Out,’’  where 
we’ve  provided  protocols  for  an  airport  to  decide  whether  or  not 
they  would  like  to  submit  for  transition  from  federalized  screeners 
to  privatized  screeners.  November  19th,  we  met  the  deadline  to 
have that information out. We’ve only had one airport approach us 
on  that.  That’s  Elko,  Nevada,  12  screeners.  We’re  continuing  to 
work  with  airports  to  discuss  the  program.  And  so,  that  oppor-
tunity is there. I think it’s the right approach, to let airports choose 
for  themselves.  We’re  very  proud  of  both  our  five  privatized  air-
ports,  as  well  as  the  440  federalized  airports.  The  standard’s  the 
same,  and  we’re  ensuring  that  our  leadership  maintains  that.  And 
that’s the current state of the Screening Partnership Program. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  we  know  what  a  hard  job  it  was  to 
get  the  private  companies  to  do  their  work  effectively,  especially 
since  rates  were  negotiated,  then,  principally  by  the  airlines.  And 
I think, frankly, I’d rather keep it in government hands. It is work-
ing, most of the time. We have to button up the difference, but, on 
balance,  it’s  a  pretty  good  crew  out  there.  People  work  hard,  they 
try  their  best.  Whether  they’re  sufficiently  populated  is  our  prob-
lem, not their problem, that they have enough people to do it. 

Ms.  BERRICK.  Senator,  if  I  could—the  time  is  out.  I  don’t  know 
if  I  can  comment  on  the  45,000  screeners.  The  Intel  Reform  Act 
is—mandated  GAO  to  look  at  that  screening  cap,  so  we  will  be 
starting  that  within  the  next  month,  looking  at  that,  looking  at 
TSA’s allocation across the airports. 

A  couple  of  problems  that  we’ve  found  due  to  staffing  was  that, 
because  of  staffing,  screeners  couldn’t  receive  all  the  training  that 
they needed, because they were needed to man the checkpoints, or 
there  weren’t  enough  screeners  to  operate  the  explosive-detection 
equipment.  So  there  are  some  negative  impacts  of  not  having 
enough staff, and that’s one of the things we’ll be looking at. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Good. 
Admiral  STONE.  If  I  could  mention,  on  the  knife,  I  got—just  to 
reassure the Committee, the way this—these sorts of incidents take 
place—and they happen at many airports—the process is, that gets 
reported  to  TSA.  An  image  of  what  the  screener  saw  on  this  knife 
is  provided  to  the  leadership  group  to  look  at  what  the  screener 
saw, how did they miss that. The ability of our screeners, when you 
see these images, to detect every single knife certainly is not there. 
That’s for the layered approach. But we do, though, is look at every 
single incident, every morning, that takes place, look at the causal 
factors and what we’re doing to remedy it. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Lautenberg follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Mr. Chairman: 
The  Transportation  Security  Agency  (TSA)  is  most  identified  with  aviation.  But 
‘‘transportation’’ encompasses much more than simply aviation. And as we focus on 
aviation security, we must not overlook major problems with port and rail security. 
As  the  9/11  Commission  stated,  ‘‘over  90  percent  of  the  nation’s  $5.3  billion  an-

nual investment in the TSA goes to aviation—to fight the last war.’’

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

61

These are haunting words. But the 9/11 Commission is right—we need to be ready 

to fight the next war—and we are not. 

Rather  than  strengthening  and  coordinating  rail  security  and  port  security  pro-
grams, they are being chopped up and spread all over the Department of Homeland 
Security. 

And even after this Committee took the initiative to identify port security and rail 
security  as  priorities,  the  Administration  has  gutted  the  Office  of  Maritime  and 
Land Security. 

I certainly hope that the Department of Homeland Security and the TSA will rec-

ognize that we need to place more focus on non-aviation transportation security. 

But  as  we  work  to  increase  security  measures  on  these  other  modes  of  transpor-
tation,  our  aviation  security  system  still  needs  a  great  deal  of  improvement—of 
course—still must effectively secure our aviation system. 

We need to be sure that screeners have the tools they need to do their jobs effec-
tively.  And  we  must  make  sure  that  there  are  enough  security  and  screening  per-
sonnel in high-traffic areas. 

At  Newark-Liberty  Airport  in  my  home  state,  and  in  other  busy  areas  across  the 

nation, we are seeing the effects of not having enough screeners. 

Just  this  past  Saturday,  at  Newark,  a  woman  was  able  to  get  a  steak  knife 
through  security.  And  last  year,  there  were  reports  of  screeners  letting  baggage  go 
unchecked in order to keep the lines moving. 

So even with long delays for travelers, our security efforts are falling short. 
And equipment needs are not being met. Airports across the country need in-line 
explosives detection equipment to keep baggage moving. As long as people are forced 
to  manually  carry  their  checked  baggage  to  the  screening  equipment,  delays  will 
continue to plague the system. 

Mr.  Chairman,  given  these  needs,  I  understand  the  need  for  additional  funding 
for transportation security. But the budget burden needs to be shared. That is why 
I  am  concerned  that  the  President  is  seeking  a  significant  tax  increase  on  airline 
passengers.  The  President  wants  to  increase  sales  tax  on  families  who  travel  and 
small  business  people,  while  the  average  millionaire  is  getting  a  $100,000  tax  cut 
this year. It makes no sense. 

These  are  some  of  the  issues  we  need  to  address.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from 

the witnesses on TSA’s budget for Fiscal Year 2006. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Lott? 

STATEMENT OF HON. TRENT LOTT,
U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator  LOTT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  having  this  hear-
ing. And thank you, Admiral Stone, for the job you’re trying to do. 
I do think a lot of progress has been made over the years. We gave 
you  a  real  challenge  and  put  markers  on  it,  and  you’ve  tried  to 
meet all of those. 

Having  said  that—that’s  a  nice,  pretty  softball;  here  comes  the 
low, fast, inside fastball—you’re going to have to do more with less. 
You  know,  5.56  billion  is  too  much.  You’re  going  to  have  to  use 
more  common  sense.  I  think  you  can  do  what  you  need  to  do  with 
fewer  people.  You’re  going  to  have  to  go  with  innovation.  I  mean, 
simple—little,  simple  things,  like  the  frequent  flyer  type—I  don’t 
know what you call it—but, I mean, how long does it take to make 
a  decision?  We’ve  been  yapping  about  that  for  a  year.  Get  on  with 
it.  That’s  one  of  the  things  that—you  know,  I  mean,  it’s  amazing, 
this  stuff  at  the  Reagan  National  general  aviation,  that  has  been 
going  on,  to  my  own  personal  knowledge,  for  3  years.  I  was  told, 
by  the  head  of  Secret  Service,  in  2000  and—I  can’t  remember 
what—2002,  I  guess  it  was,  ‘‘By  May,  we’ll  have  that  resolved.’’ 
Now  we’ve  got  a  chicken-and-egg  deal,  ‘‘Oh,  well,  it’s  Secret  Serv-
ice.’’  ‘‘No,  it’s  TSA.’’  ‘‘No,  it’s  somebody  else.’’  Just  do  it.  Quit  fum-
bling around with it. That’s the kind of thing that costs money. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

62

Now, I certainly am opposed to the new fees. I don’t think you’ve 
made  a  case  for  them.  And  I’ll  do  everything  I  can  to  shoot  them 
down. I think I’ll have a lot of help in that. 

Now,  you  say,  ‘‘Well,  if  we  don’t  get  the  fees,  it  just  means  that 
the  taxpayers  pay  for  it.’’  Yeah,  well,  maybe.  Unless  we  can  find 
ways to spend less, overall. So it may add to the deficit, but maybe 
we  can  reduce  the  number.  But  I  don’t  think  you’ve  made  a  case 
for more money. I think you all are too fat, and I think you’re wast-
ing  money  all  over  the  place.  And  that’s  why  I  think  you  need  to 
do more with less. 

And, beside that, who’s supposed to pay these fees? Is it the pas-
sengers,  or  is  it  the  airlines?  The  answer  is,  well,  the  passengers. 
But the airlines say, well, they have to eat it. 

Now,  if  you’re  going  to  go  with  these  kinds  of  fees,  maybe  some-
day  we’re  going  to  have  to  come  up  with  a  way  where  the  pas-
sengers  pay  these  security  fees  separately,  I  think  they  do  that  in 
other  parts  of  the  world,  and  get  the  airlines  out  of  it.  Make  sure 
that the passengers know they’re paying a security fee, and that—
and they have to pay it. And don’t pass it on to the airlines. 

Now,  you  know,  I  have  airlines  that  have  said,  ‘‘Yeah,  that 
sounds  good,  but,  you  know,  technologically  how  would  you  do  it?’’ 
You’d  have  to  have  machines,  I  guess,  to  do  that.  But  you’ve  got 
to think about something, some way to deal with this. 

If  you’re  going  to  have  fees,  more  fees,  less  fees,  whatever,  I’d 
like  for  passengers  to  know  what  they’re  paying  for.  They  don’t 
think  they’re  paying  for  it  now.  They  think  the  airlines  are  just 
eating it. I don’t—but—so I think if you’re ever going to—even the 
fees  you  have,  assuming  you’re  not  going  to  get  the  new  fees,  we 
need  to  come  up  with  a  way  for—where  the  passengers  pay  these 
fees  separately.  Maybe  we  can’t  do  it.  And  if  we  don’t  do  it,  you’re 
not going to get more fees. 

You got any reaction to any of that? 
Admiral STONE. Well, the—I thought the wisdom of that, of hav-
ing a 2.5 fee and establishing that, yes, a fee is good, and that that 
money  then  can  be  used  directly  for  aviation  security,  was—my 
comment would be, very wise for Congress to have established that. 
And  now  all  we’re  doing  is  saying  that  the  general  taxpayer  today 
is  paying  57  percent  of  that,  and  the  user  is  only  paying  36  per-
cent,  the  airlines,  7.  Let’s  leave  the  airline  right  where  they’re  at, 
at  7  percent,  and  just  pass  the  burden  from  the  general  taxpayer 
to the user who’s actually benefiting from that, but keep it 20 per-
cent  for  the  general  taxpayer,  because  there  is  a  national  security 
piece to it. 

Senator LOTT. Is there some way, technologically, we can do that, 
get it out of the price of the airline tickets and get it onto the pas-
senger? 

Admiral  STONE.  I’m  not  aware  of  that,  no,  sir.  But  I’ll  be  happy 

to make sure that I find out. 

Senator LOTT. If we don’t do that, they don’t know they’re paying 

it. It just adds more burden on the airlines. 

Admiral STONE. We see that the airline is just a pass-through to 
the  passenger,  and  don’t  concur  with  the  airlines  saying  that  the 
fact  that  they  say  it’s  7  percent  between  2005  and  2006.  It  really 
is just taking it from the taxpayer and putting it on the user. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

63

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  if  we’re  going  to—if  the  user’s  going  to  pay 
more, there needs to be a way for them to do it. You know, the only 
person  in  aviation  that’s  really  got  a  good  deal  these  days  is  the 
passengers.  They’re  doing  great.  You  know?  They’ve  got  nice 
planes, good transportation, and a low, low, low price for their tick-
ets. They’re doing great. And the airlines are slowly losing altitude. 
Or  maybe  fast  losing  altitude.  So  I  think  you  need—ask  somebody 
to  take  a  look  at  how  could  we  make  sure  the  passengers  pay  this 
fee, if there’s going to be one, and that they know that that’s what 
they’re  doing.  I  want  them  to  know.  And  then  if  they  don’t  want 
to fly because they don’t want to pay the security fee, fine. But I’d 
like for them to have that option. 

Admiral STONE. Yes, sir. 
Senator  LOTT.  Mr.  Chairman,  since  I’d  like  to  hear  the  next 

panel, I’ll stop at that point. 

Thank you very much, both of you. 
Admiral STONE. Thank you, Senator. 
Ms. BERRICK. Thank you. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Senator,  that  raises  an  interesting  question 
about  the  next  panel.  And  I  did  have  a  discussion  with  the  next 
panel. We still have—I still have some questions for this panel, but 
we  can  submit  them  for  the  record,  if  that’s  what  you’d  like  to  do. 
But  we  have  had  a  request  now  from  the  Air  Transport  Associa-
tion,  Airline  Pilots  Association,  the  Travel  Industry  Association, 
and  Interactive  Travel  Services  Association,  and  Regional  Airlines 
Association,  Air  Travelers  Association,  and  the  National  Business 
Travelers  Association  to  listen  to  them  with  regard  to  these  fees. 
So  the  question  I  would  just,  if  you’ll  permit  me,  Admiral  and  Ms. 
Berrick,  but  let  me  ask  the  people  who  are  the  next  witnesses 
whether  they  would  prefer  to  appear  this  morning  or  appear  with 
a panel of those people I just mentioned, at a later date. 
Ms. Goodwin, Mr. Barclay, Mr. May, what do you say? 
Mr.  MAY.  I’m  happy  to  go  with  the  judgment  of  the  Committee. 

We’re perfectly prepared to show up at a later date, Senator. 

Senator LOTT. We know what their answer’s going to be. It won’t 

take long to say no. 

[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN. That’s true. 
Well,  I  believe  we’ll  proceed  with  the  other  hearing,  then.  But  I 
do  want  to  say  I  am  going  to  submit  some  questions.  I’m  not  sure 
but  what  we’re—our  screening  that’s  taking  place  now  is  really 
driven so much by the past and not really in tune with the future. 
Now, for instance, I saw a display of a fellow with 52 cards that 
sit about five feet away from a person holding a big carrot, and he 
sliced  off  a  piece  of  that  carrot  just  by  throwing  the  cards.  I  saw 
another  person  take  a  credit  card  and  cut  through  what  would  be 
the  thickness  of  a  person’s  neck  in  2  seconds,  much  faster  than  a 
knife could do it. 

We seem to be really zeroing in, How can we pick up knives? Has 

any knife been the cause of an attempted hijack since 9/11? 

Admiral STONE. Not that I’m aware of, no, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  But  we’re  spending  a  lot  of  money  to  get  them, 

aren’t we? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

64

Admiral  STONE.  We  sure  are,  sir.  In  the  wake  of  the  box  cut-

ters——

The  CHAIRMAN.  Are  they  the  threat  now?  Isn’t  the  threat  now 
chemicals and substances and the ability to deal with trying to use 
a  plane  as  a  weapon—notwithstanding  the  fact  that  there  are  air 
marshals  and  they  can’t  get  through  the  door  to  the  pilots,  hasn’t 
the  system  changed  now?  Do  we  really  need  to  spend  more  money 
trying to pick up knives and fingernail files? 

Admiral  STONE.  I  would  agree  with  you,  the  threat’s  changed, 
and  that  the  focus  on  box  cutters  and  knives  and  the  regulations 
pertaining to that should be revisited. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  I’m  going  to  end  this.  But  I’ve  got  to  tell 
you,  in  my  state,  you  know,  we  only  have  one  main  road,  and  we 
have  a  railroad.  No  one  on  the  road  and  no  one  on  the  railroad 
pays  any  fees,  but  every  time  you  get  on  an  airplane,  you  pay  a 
fee  now.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  in  most  instances,  to  get  in  from  the 
rural  areas,  you’d  have  to  get  on  two,  maybe  three,  planes  to  get 
to Anchorage. Now, there’s a maximum they have to pay in 1 day, 
as I understand it. You’re going to increase that maximum by three 
dollars. 

Admiral STONE. Yes, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  So  those  of  us  that  don’t  have  trains  and  roads 
and  buses  and  taxis,  who  commute  from  Kenai,  in  Alaska,  which 
is  about  50  miles  south  of  Anchorage,  they  commute  back  and 
forth.  They  pay  this  fee  twice  a  day.  If  you  commuted  across  the 
river  up  there  in  New  York  or  New  Jersey,  you  wouldn’t  pay  any 
security  fee,  yet  you’re  a  great  deal  more  of  a  risk  to  the  nation’s 
security  than  you  are  if  you’re  traveling  from  Kenai  to  Anchorage 
and back every day for work. 

I  think  this  fee  system  is  very  burdensome  on  people  in  rural 
areas.  And  for  that  reason,  I  hope  to  have  another  hearing  on  the 
whole  subject  of  fees.  But,  right  now,  I  want  to  thank  the  two  of 
you for what you’ve done, and coming today. 

I do think we have some other questions we have to ask you. For 
instance,  I  don’t  see  anything  in  this  proposal  to  fund  the  letters 
of  intent  that  were  issued  for  baggage  screening  devices.  And 
there’s a whole priority list, as I understand it. Our airport in An-
chorage,  the  tenth  busiest  airport,  we’re  15th  in  the  security  list. 
Little questions like that, I’d like to have some time to ask you. 

What  are  we  doing  with  regard  to  the  situation  where  a  woman 
gets on a—I saw this—a woman’s getting on a plane in Sitka, going 
25 minutes to Juneau, elderly lady, a grandmother, obviously, with 
three  kids.  Her  name  popped  up,  so  she  goes  through  all  of  this 
stuff  and  she’s  going  to  be  in  a  plane  less  time  than  it  took  to  go 
through  the  screening  process.  Now,  shouldn’t  there  be  some  dif-
ferences for intrastate travel in a state like mine? You don’t search 
people  that  are  getting  on  buses.  You  don’t  search  the  people  get-
ting  in  taxis.  Yet  we  use  airplanes  for  taxis,  and  we’re  searched 
every time we get on a plane. 

Now, I think that this whole system is not sensitive to the situa-
tion  of  the  passenger.  It’s  just  one  size-fits-all.  You  know,  you  can 
go  up  to  Nome,  two  planes  a  day,  you’ve  got  two  shifts  a  day,  and 
they’re  going  to  search  those  people  going  on  the  planes  and—as 
a matter of fact, the people getting off have been searched, too. And 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

65

they’re  just  going  within  their  own  state  and  couldn’t  be  a  threat 
to anybody’s economy or security. 

I  really  think  this  thing  needs  really  an  intensive  look.  And  we 
intend  to  continue  these  hearings.  We  intend  to  dig  into  this  and 
find  out  why—why  do  we  all  have  to  wear  the  same  pair  of  shoes 
to  get  on  an  airplane  in  different  parts  of  the  United  States?  And 
why don’t the people who are the greatest risk, the ones that don’t 
fly,  the  no-fly  people—they’re  in  our  communities—how  are  we 
going to ferret them out? 

This  is  why  we  insisted  on  keeping  the  jurisdiction  over  this 
TSA.  Our  jurisdiction  covers  all  means  of  transportation,  yet  it 
seems  that  your  main  focus  is  airline  transportation,  primarily  be-
cause  of  what  happened  on  9/11.  And  that  is  a  serious,  serious 
thing,  but  we’ve  done  everything  we  can  to  prevent  that  from  re-
happening.  But  I  don’t  see  what  we’re  doing  to  prevent  something 
even  worse  from  happening,  in  terms  of  chemical  substances,  bio-
logical  substances,  and,  really,  the  protection  of  massive  areas,  as 
opposed  to  imposing  fees  on  people  who  use  commuters  every  day 
just  to  go  back  and  forth  in  smaller  states,  to  make  their  living. 

Do you have any final statement, my friend? 
Senator  INOUYE.  One  short  question.  How  does  our  security  sys-
tem compare with the security systems in Europe and in Asia? Are 
we better? Worse? 

Admiral STONE. I have a view of that, which is that we have the 
best  security  system  in  the  world,  that  the  criteria  we  use,  for  in-
stance, on our——

Senator INOUYE. So, in other words——
Admiral STONE.—checked bags——
Senator  INOUYE.—in  other  words,  the  aircraft  coming  in  from 

Britain is not as secure as the one that goes to Britain. 

Admiral STONE. We don’t grant equivalency for passenger screen-
ing,  for  instance,  from  the  UK  to  the  U.S.  In  other  words,  they 
can’t  land  in  the  sterile  area  and  then  board  a  flight  from  New 
York  to  Denver  without  going  through  our  passenger  screening. 
Those bags are also re-screened, whether it’s from France, the UK, 
Japan.  We  believe  our  screening  systems  that  we  use,  as  well  as 
our  passenger  screening,  set  the  mark  on  where  they  should  be. 
And so, we’re committed to——

Senator  INOUYE.  But  the  plane  coming  in  from  Paris  could  be 

loaded with explosives. 

Ms.  BERRICK.  There  are  different  procedures  between  what  the 
U.S.  employs  and  what  other  foreign  countries  do,  and  I  think 
there  are  things  that  we  can  learn  from  what  other  countries  are 
doing, because they’ve been dealing with terrorism for many years, 
and  aviation  is  an  area—rail  security  is  also  an  area—and  there 
are  differences  in  how  passengers  are  pre-screened,  in  terms  of 
their names being matched against terrorist watch lists——

Senator  INOUYE.  Is  our  system  much  more  efficient  than  the 

other systems? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  I  don’t  think  the  assessment  has  been  done  to  an-
swer that question. There are differences between the two systems. 
Admiral  STONE.  I  would  agree.  But  from  an  efficiency  point  of 

view——

Senator INOUYE. Who spends——

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

66

Admiral STONE.—there is a lot to be learned. 
Senator INOUYE.—more money on it? 
Ms. BERRICK. I don’t know the answer to that question, in terms 

of funds spent. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. We appreciate your time. 
The Committee will be sending you some questions. I apologize for 
cutting you short. 

Admiral STONE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr. BERRICK. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.—pursuing  some  of  these  items  in  Subcommittee 

to surface transportation, their security problems. 

We now have—the next panel of witnesses, if we will—oh, they’re 
right there. If they say they want to testify. Do you want to testify 
today, Chip? 

I want to ask, again, the airline people, the Association of Execu-
tives and the Port Authorities—it was my intention to convene an-
other hearing. Do you want to be heard today? 

Mr.  BARCLAY.  Mr.  Chairman,  Jim  May  has  already  left,  so——
The CHAIRMAN. Good. 
Mr. BARCLAY.—I think we’d better go with another day. 
[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  We’ll  convene  another  day  of  hearings.  Thank 

you very much. 

[Whereupon, at 11:44 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JEAN GODWIN, EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT AND GENERAL 

COUNSEL, AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF PORT AUTHORITIES 

Good Morning. I am Jean Godwin, Executive Vice President and General Counsel 
for  the  American  Association  of  Port  Authorities  (AAPA).  I  thank  you  for  inviting 
us  to  testify  before  your  Committee  on  the  Port  Security  Grant  Program  and  the 
FY06 proposed budget. AAPA is an alliance of the leading public ports in the West-
ern  Hemisphere  and  our  testimony  today  reflects  the  views  of  our  U.S.  Members. 
AAPA  has  had  a  long  history  of  involvement  with  the  Commerce,  Science  and 
Transportation Committee, including passage of the Maritime Transportation Secu-
rity  Act  (MTSA)  and  the  Coast  Guard  reauthorization  legislation,  which  both  serve 
as authorizing legislation for the Port Security Grant program. 

The  Port  Security  Grant  program  was  established  after  9/11  to  provide  much-
needed help to port facilities to harden security to protect these vital ports of entry 
from  acts  of  terrorism.  Since  its  inception,  the  program  has  given  out  $565  million 
in  grants  for  1,200  projects,  with  Congress  providing  an  additional  $150  million  in 
FY05.  Overall  only  one-sixth  of  all  projects  have  been  funded,  showing  the  great 
need for this program. Through four rounds of grants, funds were provided to coast-
al  states,  including  the  port-dependent  states  of  Alaska  and  Hawaii.  But  its  value 
to  this  nation  is  not  just  to  coastal  states.  With  95  percent  of  our  overseas  trade 
flowing  through  our  ports,  all  states  and  all  citizens  would  be  impacted  by  a  shut-
down of our seaports. 

The  Port  Security  Grant  program  has  also  been  subject  to  numerous  reorganiza-
tions, some of which are expected to be highlighted in the Inspector General’s report 
to be issued today. Originally the program was housed in the Maritime Administra-
tion,  then  it  moved  to  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  and,  as 
part  of  last  year’s  budget,  the  Administration  moved  the  program  to  the  Office  of 
State  and  Local  Government  Coordination  and  Preparedness.  As  part  of  this  move 
last  year,  the  Department  agreed  to  keep  the  program  as  a  separate  entity  and  to 
keep TSA, Coast Guard, MarAd, and Customs involved in the management and se-
lection of these competitive grants. 

In FY06, the Administration proposes yet another change—elimination of the port 
security  grant  program,  and  creation  of  a  broad  grant  program  to  protect  facilities 
in the critical infrastructure plan. This runs counter to the intent of this Committee. 
Last  year,  this  Committee  included  a  provision  in  the  Coast  Guard  reauthorization 
bill  to  update  the  authorization  of  the  program.  The  Act  maintained  that  there 
would be a separate program specifically for port security to be based on the MTSA. 
The  new  Targeted  Infrastructure  Protection  program  would  lump  port  security 
into  a  program  with  trains,  trucks,  busses  and  other  public  transit  and  ties  these 
grants to the goal of protecting critical infrastructure based on relative risk, vulner-
ability  and  needs.  This  move  would  pit  an  underfunded  border  protection  program 
against  underfunded  domestic  transportation  protection  programs.  AAPA  has  great 
concerns  and  encourages  your  Committee  to  voice  opposition  to  this  new  structure. 
Our economy, our safety and our national defense depend largely on how well we 
can protect our seaports. According to the 9/11 Commission Report, opportunities to 
do harm are as great, or greater, in maritime as they are at airports. Ports are also 
the  only  industry  within  this  new  Targeted  Infrastructure  Protection  program  that 
has  a  statutory  mandate  to  comply  with—the  MTSA—and  the  only  one  for  which 
there is a congressionally authorized grant program, which was also created by this 
Committee.  A  separate  line  item  is  essential  to  ensure  that  ports  continue  to  be  a 
targeted  priority  in  our  country’s  war  again  terrorism.  Cargo  doesn’t  vote  and  it  is 
often  not  fully  recognized  for  the  value  it  provides  to  this  country  in  state  and  fed-
eral infrastructure plans. While critical infrastructure protection is important, using 
it as the sole criteria for making decisions on funding for port security is a bad idea. 
We  must  focus  on  protection  at  all  seaports  since  ports  serve  as  an  international 
border  and  an  incident  at  one  would  surely  impact  all  ports.  The  MTSA  has  a  sys-
tem  established  to  identify  risks  and  vulnerabilities,  and  while  some  may  question 

(67)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

68

some of the DHS decisions on certain grants, the overall criteria of tying the grants 
to the MTSA is one that AAPA supports. This was not done in the first few rounds 
because  the  MTSA  was  not  in  effect  yet.  We  urge  DHS  to  refocus  the  program  on 
the  MTSA,  while  including  a  cross-check  to  the  critical  infrastructure  plan  and  to 
keep this as a separate program, like the firefighter grants. 

We  also  urge  this  Committee  to  take  a  leadership  role  in  advocating  for  stronger 
funding  for  the  current  port  security  grant  program  in  the  FY06  Appropriations 
process. The Coast Guard has estimated that ports would have to spend $5.4 billion 
over  a  10-year  period  to  comply  with  the  new  MTSA.  AAPA  urges  a  funding  level 
of  $400  million  in  FY06.  There  is  still  much  to  be  done  to  continue  our  progress  in 
securing  America’s  ports.  Adequate  federal  funds  will  help  us  avoid  an  infrastruc-
ture crisis in the future. 

Ports  are  currently  planning  for  a  huge  increase  in  trade  in  the  future.  Industry 
analysts  predict  that  within  the  next  15  years,  that  the  approximately  two  billion 
tons  of  cargo  that  U.S.  ports  handle  will  double.  But  ports  are  also  challenged  by 
the new security mandates of the MTSA and the need to continue to make improve-
ments.  Therefore,  ports  are  using  current  dollars  to  pay  for  security,  rather  than 
capital  investments  needed  to  handle  the  future  growth  in  international  trade.  We 
need  the  Federal  Government  to  provide  its  share  of  these  improvements  now,  so 
that our ports are secure today and will be able to meet the challenges and opportu-
nities of accommodating the world trade needs of tomorrow. 

Finally, AAPA would like to voice its strong support for the Transportation Work-
er Identification Credentialing (TWIC) program. We urge increased funding for this 
program  and  encourage  DHS  to  make  the  necessary  policy  decisions  to  implement 
this  program  quickly.  The  MTSA  required  all  ports  to  control  access  to  their  facili-
ties, but our U.S. member ports are still waiting for the TWIC requirements before 
installing new technologies. 

Thank  you  for  inviting  us  to  testify  on  this  critical  transportation  security  issue. 
Ports  stand  ready  to  do  their  part  in  protecting  America.  We  urge  your  Committee 
to  voice  your  support  for  a  strong  appropriation  in  FY06  for  a  separate  line  item 
for the Port Security Grant Program. 

Thank you. I would be happy to answer any questions. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

HON. DAVID M. STONE 

Transportation Worker Identification Credential (TWIC) 

Question  1.  What  is  the  current  status  of  your  efforts  to  develop  and  implement 

a biometric maritime Transportation Worker Identification Credential program? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  continues  implemen-
tation  planning  for  the  Transportation  Worker  Identification  Credential  (TWIC)  by 
focusing  on:  (a)  lessons  learned  from  the  current  Phase  III-Prototype  to  refine  re-
quirements further; and (b) developing, in conjunction with the Coast Guard, a rule 
to  implement  the  TWIC  program  for  the  maritime  mode  in  accordance  with  Sec. 
70105 of the Maritime Transportation Security Act of 2002. 

The  National  Maritime  Security  Advisory  Committee  (NMSAC)  met  for  the  first 
time in March 2005. That committee agreed, as a matter of priority, to assist federal 
regulators in the development of the TWIC rulemaking. Since this Committee is reg-
ulated under the Federal Advisory Committee Act, they may advise TSA during the 
rulemaking  process.  A  task  statement  has  been  delivered  to  the  Committee  with  a 
30-day  deadline  for  comments.  NMSAC  comments  will  provide  consolidated  rec-
ommendations  and  concerns  from  a  board  group  of  maritime  industry  stakeholders 
including:  port  officials;  port  facilities;  shipping  operators;  shore  side  and  maritime 
labor;  offshore  maritime  industry;  small  passenger  vessel  operators.  The  NMSAC 
recommendations will be considered during the drafting of the NPRM.

Question 2. What steps have been taken to resolve issues with stakeholders, such 
as how to share costs of the program, eligibility requirements, and policies for adju-
dicating  card  applications  appeal  and  waiver  requests  from  workers  denied  a  card? 
If the program is moved out of TSA to a new organizational home within DHS, what 
assurances can you provide that the TWIC program will not be further delayed? 

Answer.  TSA  recognizes  the  need  to  develop  partnerships  across  the  transpor-
tation  industry  to  communicate  program  objectives  and  progress  and  to  establish  a 
forum  for  industry  feedback.  In  accordance  with  the  Department’s  policy  of  stake-
holder outreach, TSA is consulting with industry partners and affected stakeholders 
during the execution of various phases of the program. 

TSA  is  evaluating  opportunities  for  reciprocity  where  current  identification  and 
vetting programs exist and collaborating with a myriad of stakeholders and port se-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

69

curity officials facing investment decisions. TSA is developing standards-based tech-
nical specifications for smart card readers, as well as developing interfaces and tech-
nical  specifications  to  facilitate  integration  with  commercial  physical  access  control 
systems. Additionally, TSA is actively seeking cost-effective and efficient options for 
providing identity management services by identifying and leveraging existing capa-
bilities in both the Federal Government and private sector. 

Notably,  TSA  is  partnering  with  the  State  of  Florida  to  meet  the  requirements 
of the Florida Uniform Port Access Credential (FUPAC). The TWIC prototype serves 
as the identity management system for Florida’s 12 deepwater ports, allowing them 
to  comply  with  Florida  statute.  This  federal-state-industry  relationship  helps  dem-
onstrate TSA’s commitment to work with our stakeholders to deploy an effective so-
lution. 

TSA  has  developed  a  comprehensive  stakeholder  communications  plan  that  in-

cludes the following channels:

• Online Materials: External stakeholders can access the TWIC Stakeholder Brief, 
a  Frequently  Asked  Questions  document,  and  other  materials  via  the  Internet 
at http://www.tsa.gov/public/display?content=09000519800276d6.
• TWIC E-mail Address: The TWIC program receives email via the e-mail address 
posted  on  the  TWIC  website  (Credentialing@dhs.gov).  Messages  primarily  in-
quire about the TWIC program status, participation requirements and opportu-
nities,  and  timeline.  TSA’s  response  directs  the  requester  to  the  TWIC  website 
where  the  information  is  listed  or,  if  necessary,  a  specific  response  is  drafted 
and approved at the appropriate level before being transmitted to the requester.
• Integrated  Process  Teams  (IPTs):  IPTs  are  comprised  of  government  and  pro-
gram office support personnel with industry and business process expertise. The 
teams  maintain  a  local  facility  focus  and  presence  to  ensure  prototype  sites  re-
ceive the necessary support during the various phases of the program.
• Direct  Stakeholder  Outreach:  Since  early  2002,  TSA  has  conducted  selected  in-
dustry  and  government  events,  conferences,  and  symposiums  to  reach  a  broad 
cross  section  of  national-level  stakeholders,  with  interactive  presentations, 
panel discussions and listening sessions.
• National  Maritime  Security  Advisory  Committee  (NMSAC):  The  NMSAC  re-
sponded  to  its  first  task  statement  in  June  2005  by  providing  a  comprehensive 
set  of  recommendations  in  response  to  key  questions  on  TWIC  implementation 
in the maritime mode. The industry input is well aligned with the TWIC imple-
mentation currently being considered for the rulemaking.
• Public  Meetings:  During  the  TWIC  maritime  rulemaking  process,  TSA  and  the 
Coast  Guard  intend  to  hold  public  meetings  to  address  important  stakeholder 
concerns such as eligibility criteria as well as a waiver and appeal process. TSA 
recognizes  the  sensitivity  of  these  issues  and  potential  impact  to  the  current 
labor  force  and  will  continue  to  consider  stakeholder  input  as  proposed  rule-
making proceeds. Additionally, the rule will be subject to a public comment pe-
riod during which stakeholders can provide TSA additional feedback.

The  President’s  FY06  budget  proposes  that  TWIC  will  align  with  the  newly 
formed  Office  of  Screening  Coordination  and  Operations  (SCO).  Consolidating 
screening within the SCO is expected to bring improved rationalization and integra-
tion of screening assets as well as greater efficiency and effectiveness in the Depart-
ment’s ability to screen multiple populations. Implementation of SCO will not effect 
the  current  TWIC  schedule  Credentialing  and  biometrics  programs,  such  as  TWIC, 
have  been  recognized  as  critical  to  DHS’  mission  as  they  will  enable  identity 
verification  of  individuals  accessing  sensitive  areas  of  the  transportation  system. 
This  capability  is  crucial  in  enabling  our  critical  maritime  infrastructure  (facility 
and vessel owners and operators currently regulated under the MTSA) to make ad-
justments in screening processes in order to maintain maximum security.

Question  3.  What  are  the  Department’s  plans  for  expanding  the  TWIC  program 
beyond  our  ports  to  other  transportation  sectors  and  facilities?  How  will  the  TWIC 
program work for transportation sectors that already have specific ID or background 
check requirements? 

Answer.  The  initial  implementation  plan  for  the  TWIC  program  focuses  on  mari-
time  workers  as  the  primary  TWIC  population.  TSA  will  be  able  to  use  its  experi-
ence  with  the  prototype  and  with  implementing  TWIC  at  ports  to  develop  a  risk-
based  approach  to  determine  how  to  leverage  and  interact  with  identification  and 
background check processes and information in other transportation modes.

TSA announced the award of the TWIC Phase III Prototype on August 10, 2004, 
for  a  total  of  $12.3  Million.  The  prototype  is  scheduled  to  last  for  7  months,  or 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

70

until March 10, 2005. According to TSA’s August press release, TSA is supposed 
to  issue  between  150,000  and  200,000  cards  to  transportation  workers  at  over 
40 sites, including all 14 deepwater ports in the State of Florida.

Question  4.  The  March  10  conclusion  of  this  prototype  has  passed.  How  many 

TWIC cards has TSA issued, and at how many sites? 

Answer.  The  period  of  prototype  activities  was  extended  to  June  30,  2005  when 
the contract modification discussed in our response to Question 7 below was issued. 
As  of  June  3,  2005,  approximately  15,000  workers  were  enrolled  and  7,000  TWIC 
cards  were  produced  at  26  prototype  locations.  The  secure  credentials  for  Florida 
port  workers  will  be  produced  and  issued  once  the  necessary  identity  vetting  and 
threat assessments are complete and the new card production facility is up and run-
ning.

Question 5. How much has TSA actually expended on this project? 
Answer.  As  of  May  31,  2005  approximately  $16.2M  was  spent  to  conduct  the 

TWIC Phase III-Prototype.

Question 6. How much has TSA’s contractor received to date? 
Answer.  As  of  May  31,  2005,  the  Prototype  contractor,  BearingPoint,  received 

$11,002,231.

Question  7.  The  total  announced  value  of  the  contract  on  August  10,  2004  was 
$12  Million.  Have  additional  change  orders  been  added  to  this  original  task?  What 
were  they  and  how  much  were  they  for?  What  is  the  total  value  with  all  change 
orders of the contract? 

Answer. Change orders totaling approximately $12M were issued to satisfy unan-
ticipated  requirements.  These  requirements  included:  TSA  compliance  with  Home-
land Security Presidential Directive 12 (HSPD–12); procurement of standards-based 
biometric  readers;  obtaining  card  production  and  system  hosting  services;  and  ex-
tending  the  contract’s  period  of  performance  to  ensure  continuity  of  operations  for 
Florida  and  our  East  and  West  Coast  stakeholders.  The  total  cost  of  the  contract 
(base plus modifications) is $24,546,183.

Question  8.  It  is  my  understanding  that  many  of  the  TWIC  phase  III  Prototype 
sites  were  very  eager  to  get  the  cards  issued  to  their  employees.  What  has  become 
of security at all the sites that have not yet been stood up for the TWIC prototype? 
Answer.  With  or  without  TWIC,  facilities  are  required  to  implement  security 
measures, including the control of access to their facility in accordance with 33 CFR 
Subchapter  H  and  their  Coast  Guard  approved  Facility  Security  Plans.  The  TWIC 
is a high assurance identity credential that can be used in local facilities to enhance 
security  for  providing  physical  access  to  secure  areas.  As  the  TWIC  becomes  avail-
able  to  MTSA  regulated  facilities  and  vessels,  the  level  of  port  security  will  be  en-
hanced  as  a  result  of  enabling  biometric  identity  verification  for  the  port  worker 
population. 
Office of Maritime and Land 

Question  1.  In  the  most  recent  re-organization  of  TSA  two  weeks  ago,  I  see  you 
consolidated  the  functions  of  the  Office  of  Maritime  and  Land  and  Aviation  Oper-
ations to what is now known as the Office of Intermodalism. Exactly how many re-
organizations  has  the  agency  undertaken  since  it’s  inception  into  the  Department 
of Homeland Security? How will these changes improve non-aviation transportation 
security?

Question 2. Can you explain how this reorganization plan and the changes to TSA 
purposed  in  the  President’s  budget  proposal  will  result  in  stronger  non-aviation  se-
curity initiatives? Will funding and staff dedicated for non-aviation security increase 
or  decrease  under  the  new  reorganization?  How  will  the  Department  ensure  con-
tinuity  and  accountability  for  non-aviation  security  under  the  DHS’s  new  organiza-
tional structure? 

Answer. TSA recently realigned its organizational structure to provide better sup-
port  for  surface  transportation  security  activities.  This  structure  realigns  our  func-
tions  ensuring  our  success  in  meeting  the  strategic  goals  of  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security  and  is  consistent  with  the  Department’s  overall  efforts  to  con-
form  with  Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directive-7.  TSA’s  Maritime  and  Land 
Security program is included in the President’s FY 2006 Budget request. TSA’s secu-
rity  efforts  for  all  non-aviation  transportation  modes,  including  rail,  mass  transit, 
highway, postal and shipping, pipelines, and maritime (in close partnership with the 
Coast  Guard)  going  forward  will  be  covered  by  a  new  appropriation  category  titled 
‘‘Surface  Transportation  Security.’’  Operational  staffing  and  funding  that  were  pre-
viously  under  the  Maritime  and  Land  program  are  included  within  this  appropria-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

71

tion.  Staffing  levels  for  surface  transportation  security  staff  and  rail  inspectors 
would be maintained at FY 2005 levels under the FY 2006 request. 

An  Assistant  Administrator  for  Intermodal  Programs  has  been  designated  to  as-
sume  programmatic  responsibility  for  staffing,  training,  equipping,  and  managing 
programs  for  all  transportation  modes  (aviation,  rail,  mass  transit,  highway,  postal 
and shipping, pipeline, and maritime). 
Transportation Security Grants 

Question 1. How will the consolidation of transportation infrastructure grant pro-
grams  improve  compliance  with  the  statutory  requirements  of  Maritime  Transpor-
tation Security Act of 2002? 

Answer.  A  consolidated  Targeted  Infrastructure  Protection  Program  (TIPP)  will 
allow  greater  flexibility  to  the  Secretary  to  allocate  funds  according  to  the  greatest 
risk  so  that  we  may  best  enhance  the  ability  of  the  owners  and  operators  of  key 
transit systems and port assets to prevent and respond to large scale incidents. 

In  FY05,  the  Office  of  State  and  Local  Government  Coordination  and  Prepared-
ness (SLGCP) provided $315 million through several initiatives to enhance the secu-
rity of the Nation’s transit systems, railroads, ports, and highways. For FY06, TIPP 
will build on these enhancements by shifting to a discretionary approach for all pro-
gram elements. In coordination with other DHS components and other federal enti-
ties  (including  IAIP,  TSA,  Coast  Guard,  and  the  Maritime  Administration 
(MARAD),  the  $600  million  requested  in  the  President’s  FY06  budget  for  an  inte-
grated,  discretionary  grant  program  will  enable  SLGCP:  (1)  to  better  supplement 
State, local, and private sector infrastructure protection efforts based on threat, vul-
nerability, and criticality; (2) to further enhance the linkages between critical infra-
structure  protection  and  regional  planning  efforts;  and  (3)  to  ensure  that  the  pro-
gram  is  consistent  with  applicable  laws  and  regulations,  such  as  the  Maritime 
Transportation Security Act (MTSA). 
Airline Passenger Fee Hike 

Question  1.  I  have  many  concerns  about  the  TSA  plan  to  raise  security  fees  on 
airline passengers, but clearly the additional $1.5 billion it is intended to bring forth 
is  central  to  the  Administration’s  effort  to  increase  homeland  security  spending 
across all federal government agencies by $1.4 billion in FY06. If the Congress does 
not support this change, what steps will TSA and DHS take to address the funding 
shortfall? Will agency programs be cut? 

Answer.  The  sharing  of  aviation  screening  costs  between  industry,  passengers, 
and  government  is  essential  to  ensure  that  there  is  sufficient  funding  for  existing 
and  emerging  threats  to  the  integrity  of  the  aviation  security  infrastructure.  The 
proposed increase is intended to shift the burden of paying aviation screening serv-
ices  from  the  general  taxpayer  to  the  airline  passenger.  The  Department  will  work 
with Congress to ensure that security priorities are met. 
Explosive Detection System (EDS) Letters of Intent (LOIs) 

Question  1.  It  appears  the  $250  million  requested  for  EDS  is  still  only  enough  to 
pay off existing LOIs and do perhaps one or two small pilot tests. How do we clean 
up  the  operational  mess  in  airport  lobbies  plus  provide  more  cost  effective  and  se-
cure checked baggage security solutions if we continue to fund at only a maintaining 
level for airport construction? 

Answer. The President’s FY 2006 budget reflects the Department of Homeland Se-
curity’s  most  critical  needs  and  includes  funding  which  supports  the  eight  existing 
Letters of Intent (LOI) airports. TSA is currently developing a long-term plan to de-
termine  the  appropriate  level  of  in-line  system  integration  activities  for  LOI  and 
non-LOI airports. TSA has also engaged in intensive research and development ini-
tiatives  to  identify  and  certify  improved  explosives  screening  technologies  that 
should  increase  throughput  and  detection  capacity,  and  potentially  reduce  infra-
structure  and  space  requirements.  This  could  reduce  the  need  for  in-line  systems 
and/or the present high cost of those systems. TSA will continue to work with non-
LOI airports and air carrier officials to ensure that TSA can use equipment already 
in  place  to  maintain  100  percent  electronic  screening  during  ongoing  terminal  con-
struction projects. 

In  addition,  TSA  is  developing  a  schedule  to  replace  explosives  trace  detection 
(ETD)  systems  with  EDS  pursuant  to  Section  4019  of  the  Intelligence  Reform  and 
Terrorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004.  With  the  recent  certification  of  the  Reveal  GT–
80 system, TSA is developing a strategy for determining the cost effectiveness of de-
ploying these smaller, less expensive units to those airports that are currently using 
ETD equipment primarily. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV 

TO HON. DAVID M. STONE 

72

TSA’s  budget  request  includes  an  increase  of  $15  million  to  pay  for  passenger 
screening  activities  at  the  five  pilot  airports  that  use  private  security  firms.  Ever 
since  we  set  up  the  federal  screening  workforce,  I  have  heard  an  endless  stream  of 
statements from our House counterparts and OMB that said the private sector could 
do  it  better  and  cheaper.  Yet,  this  substantial  increase  for  FY06  would  appear  to 
invalidate these claims. 

Question 1. What is TSA getting for its extra $15 million? Will these airports get 
additional  screeners  or  services?  Or  is  this  funding  to  cover  exactly  the  same  serv-
ices you were getting last year? 

Question 2. If you are getting the same level of services for $15 million, what was 

the contractors’ explanation of why they needed the increase? 

Answer.  In  directing  TSA  to  establish  a  contract  screening  pilot  program  (PP5), 
the  Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  (ATSA)  required  that  the  level  of 
screening services and protection provided at the PP5 airports be equal to or greater 
than  the  level  provided  at  an  airport  with  federal  screeners.  Similarly,  contract 
screeners  must  receive  compensation  and  other  benefits  that  are  not  less  than  the 
compensation  and  other  benefits  provided  to  federal  personnel.  In  accordance  with 
these  requirements,  TSA  strives  for  a  level  playing  field  between  airports  with  pri-
vate contract screeners under PP5 and the Screener Partnership Program (SPP) and 
airports  with  federal  screeners.  Consequently,  as  each  airport  considers  whether  to 
continue  with  federal  screening  or  to  apply  for  the  SPP,  it  can  base  its  decision  on 
its own preferences and criteria rather than considerations of security, resources, or 
level or service. 

The additional $15 million requested is reflective of the increased cost of providing 
screening  services  at  the  levels  required  under  ATSA  for  the  PP5  airports.  In  par-
ticular,  the  request  was  necessary  to  meet  unanticipated  inflationary  increases  of 
screener  wages,  health  care,  uniforms,  state-mandated  workers  compensation  costs, 
and consumables. It is not funding services in addition to those provided in previous 
years  except  where  consistent  with  changes  in  the  Standard  Operating  Procedure 
made effective throughout the Nation’s commercial aviation system. 

In  FY  2005,  a  reprogramming  increase  of  $23M  was  made  to  support  the  cost  of 
providing  PP5  airports  with  the  level  of  screening  required  for  all  commercial  air-
ports  under  ATSA.  This  reprogramming  supported  increased  insurance  premium 
costs  for  worker’s  compensation;  terrorism  and  health  insurance  premiums;  ATSA-
guaranteed  screener  pay  parity;  and  operational  requirements  relating  to  flexibili-
ties granted to contractors in the areas of recruitment, hiring, and training. 

Since the authorized spending for FY 2005 is $152.65 million with the reprogram-
ming,  the  FY  2006  budget  request  of  $146.15  million  represents  a  $6.5  million  de-
crease.  The  reduction  is  due  in  part  to  the  normalization  of  workers’  compensation 
costs  now  that  the  PP5  airports  have  three  full  years  of  operating  history.  It  is  an-
ticipated  that  the  FY  2006  funds  requested  will  be  sufficient  to  cover  anticipated 
costs.

Question 3. If TSA is not getting anything more for its money, please tell me how 
private  screeners  are  less  costly  at  the  same  time  you  are  paying  more  for  their 
services. 

Answer.  TSA  believes  that  it  is  getting  value  added  from  conducting  the  private 
screening  pilot  program  at  the  five  airports.  The  private  screening  companies  were 
awarded  ‘‘cost  plus  award  fee’’  contracts  to  provide  them  maximum  operating  flexi-
bility  to  create  and  implement  innovations  and  operating  efficiencies.  This  contrac-
tual arrangement also meant that TSA reimbursed contractors for costs incurred in 
developing initiatives to improve or streamline operations. Some of these initiatives 
are  currently  being  studied  by  TSA  to  determine  their  applicability  to  federalized 
airports.  TSA  has  regarded  the  private  screening  pilot  program  as  a  unique  oppor-
tunity to continuously operate, evaluate, and innovate, whereby lessons learned are 
incorporated  into  operations  not  only  at  pilot  airports  that  utilize  private  screeners 
but  throughout  the  system.  Notably,  TSA  learned  in  part  from  the  PP5  program 
that  strong  FSD  management  is  a  key  factor  in  driving  good  screener  performance 
regardless  of  whether  the  screeners  at  a  particular  airport  are  federal  screeners  or 
private  contract  screeners.  As  a  result,  TSA  has  empowered  FSDs  all  across  the 
country  with  greater  tools  and  flexibility  to  manage  operations  at  the  local  level, 
and  FSDs  are  now  more  intimately  involved  in  the  recruiting,  hiring,  assessment, 
and training of screeners.

Question  4.  Finally,  if  Congress  does  not  appropriate  this  $15  million,  will  the 

funding be transferred from other TSA activities? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

73

Answer.  $15  million  is  necessary  to  maintain  existing  airport  operations  at  their 
current  level.  A  decrease  in  funding  would  have  a  severe  impact  on  operations  at 
each of the PP5 airports. TSA would be forced to either reduce screening operations 
or look for other flexibilities that may be available to fund these activities 
Aviation Security Fee 

Question 1. Do you believe that transportation security costs should be borne only 

by those who use the services? 

Answer.  TSA  has  implemented  a  passenger  and  an  airline  fee  as  mandated  by 
Congress  in  the  Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  (ATSA).  Prior  to  the  at-
tacks  of  September  11,  air  carriers  were  responsible  for  aviation  security,  and  air 
carriers and passengers shared these costs directly. In enacting ATSA, Congress in-
tended not only for the Federal Government to assume direct responsibility for avia-
tion security but also for the costs of providing such services to be shared by indus-
try,  users  (passengers),  and  the  Federal  Government.  The  proposed  increase  in  the 
passenger  security  fee,  TSA  proposes  will  better  allocate  the  fee  burden  among  in-
dustry, passengers, and the Federal Government to reflect the workload imposed on 
TSA  by  the  direct  users  of  the  aviation  security  system.  The  net  effect  of  the  in-
crease and decrease in fees would be to raise security fee collections from about $2.6 
billion  annually  to  about  $4.1  billion  annually.  This  amount  would  recover  almost 
all  of  the  funding  associated  with  TSA  aviation  screening  costs.  There  would  still 
be over $1.4 billion of TSA costs funded by general taxpayers.

Question  2.  Why  didn’t  the  Administration  propose  any  fees  on  any  other  mode 
of transportation? Should these modes—ports, shippers, rail, etc who are asking for 
more and more federal resources for security be asked to pay for some of their secu-
rity needs? 

Answer.  With  the  exception  of  certain  credentialing  and  vetting  programs,  TSA 
does  not  currently  collect  fees  for  surface  transportation  security  measures.  Unlike 
aviation where TSA has a Congressionally-established role in providing direct secu-
rity services and fees are collected, TSA’s role in security for surface modes is more 
indirect and largely accomplished through developing standards and regulations and 
providing  oversight.  The  regulated  parties  implement  the  actual  security  measures 
in  compliance  with  the  standards  established  by  TSA.  Therefore,  the  industry  and 
its  customers  will  most  likely  incur  the  cost  of  such  security  measures  through  di-
rect  expenditures  to  comply  with  standards,  as  opposed  to  incurring  them  through 
fees. 

There are currently several areas in which TSA has—or will have—a more hands-
on role that warrant—or will likely warrant—implementation of user-fees. Pursuant 
to a provision included in the Department of Homeland Security Appropriations Act, 
2004,  the  Department  may  charge  reasonable  fees  for  providing  credentialing  and 
background  investigations  in  the  area  of  transportation.  TSA  anticipates  collecting 
fees  to  administer  credentialing  and  background  check  programs  for  alien  flight 
school student pilots and HAZMAT truck drivers. TSA also anticipates that existing 
fee  authority  could  be  applied  to  transportation  workers  under  the  transportation 
worker  identification  credentialing  program  and  to  volunteer  passengers  under  the 
Registered Traveler program. 

As future specific security measures are implemented in non-aviation modes, TSA 
will consult with Congress regarding appropriate fees to recoup the Federal funding 
attributed to the effort. In general, fee authority is conferred only to the extent that 
fee  collections  are  necessary  to  fund  specifically  identified  services  provided  by  the 
Federal  Government.  An  agency  is  generally  not  permitted  to  collect  fees  in 
amounts that would exceed the cost of providing those services. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

HON. DAVID M. STONE 

Question  1.  What  aviation  security  screener  personnel  functions  are  being  per-
formed  by  Federal  Security  Directors  and  which  functions  are  being  performed  by 
offices at TSA headquarters, or by contractors to such offices? Does TSA have plans 
for empowering FSD’s with further personnel-related authority (staffing, hiring, fir-
ing, etc.)? 

Answer. TSA implemented Next Generation Hiring (also known as de-centralized 
or local hiring) to enable Federal Security Directors (FSDs) to directly influence the 
hiring  process  while  maintaining  systematic,  consistent,  regulatory-compliant  em-
ployment practices. Under this model, the FSD at each airport has the power to es-
tablish  individualized  strategic  hiring  plans,  recruit  and  interview  its  own  can-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

74

didates,  make  formal  job  offers,  swear  in  and  orient  new  employees  to  federal  em-
ployment, and provide them with initial and recurrent training. 

To  support  this  effort,  TSA  established  Local  Hiring  Centers  (LHCs)  in  20  cities 
across  the  country.  The  LHC  serves  as  a  key  resource  in  supporting  an  airport  in 
meeting its hiring needs in a timely and efficient manner by filling in where airport 
resources  are  not  available  to  conduct  the  steps  in  the  hiring  process.  Introduced 
at  the  end  of  calendar  year  2004,  TSA  is  already  realizing  the  benefits  of  this  ap-
proach  to  hiring.  Airports  are  reporting  that  candidates  who  accept  positions  are 
more  committed  to  their  employment  with  TSA  as  evidenced  by  an  increase  in 
Entry-on-Duty  (EOD)  Show  Rates  (i.e.,  the  percentage  of  new  hires  who  are  sched-
uled  to  report  for  duty  who  actually  do  report)  and  a  decrease  in  Quick  Separation 
Rates  (i.e.,  the  percentage  of  new  hires  who  resigned  within  one  month  of  EOD). 
Also,  in  2004,  TSA  gave  FSDs  the  authority  to  take  disciplinary  actions  without 
first  obtaining  approval  from  Employee  Relations  staff  at  Headquarters.  This  au-
thority  was  launched  with  training,  toolkits,  and  workbooks  providing  guidance  to 
ensure all disciplinary decisions are made with full adherence to TSA policy, includ-
ing merit principles and considerations of fundamental fairness (i.e., without regard 
to favoritism, nepotism, political affiliation, race, color, religion, national origin, sex, 
reprisal, marital status, age, disability or sexual orientation) and with proper regard 
for employees’ privacy and constitutional rights. 

TSA Headquarters continues to provide coordination and facilitation of the entire 
screener  on-boarding  process.  Activities  include  providing  technical  direction  to  re-
cruitment,  hiring,  and  training  contractors;  providing  and  maintaining  data  man-
agement systems and information; coordinating and overseeing the conduct of Phase 
I  Assessment  computerized  tests,  medical  evaluations;  background  investigations 
(including criminal history and financial credit checks); and certifying candidates as 
being  technically  qualified.  TSA  Headquarters  also  continues  to  oversee  contractor 
activities  of  those  phases  of  the  hiring  process  at  airports  that  have  chosen  not  to 
utilize Next Generation Hiring. 

At  this  time,  TSA  does  not  have  any  plans  for  additional  delegation  of  personnel 

authority to the local level.

Question 2. Is TSA still using the same contractor for hiring screeners that failed 
to  initially  conduct  criminal  background  checks  on  a  number  of  screeners,  leading 
to later discovery that 85 felons were employed by TSA? 

Answer.  TSA  no  longer  contracts  with  NCS  Pearson  for  hiring  screeners.  In  De-
cember  2002,  the  contract  for  recruiting  and  assessing  screeners  was  awarded  to 
CPS  Human  Resource  Services,  and  a  contract  for  hiring  and  conducting  personnel 
transactions  was  awarded  to  Accenture.  Since  neither  company  provides  the  back-
ground  investigation  services,  TSA  has  now  contracted  with  a  separate  company, 
Kroll, to conduct the background investigations. 

Kroll  provides  TSA  with  the  full  preliminary  background  checks,  consisting  of  a 
review  of  a  fingerprint  report  which  is  done  through  the  Office  of  Personnel  Man-
agement  (OPM),  a  credit  report,  and  a  National  Crime  Information  Center  check. 
When a case file is complete, the results from Kroll and OPM are posted on a secure 
website.  This  information  is  available  to  be  adjudicated  against  current  TSA  suit-
ability  standards  in  order  to  make  an  initial  decision  regarding  the  person’s  suit-
ability  to  be  a  TSA  employee.  This  determination  occurs  before  any  candidates  are 
certified as ‘‘qualified’’ by CPS and before a job offer is given by Accenture. This ini-
tial investigation prevents an individual with an objectionable record from attaining 
employment  with  TSA.  A  full  investigation  is  later  completed  with  OPM  following 
employment with TSA.

Question  3.  Has  TSA  committed  to  funding  an  in-line  explosive  detection  system 
at Newark Liberty International Airport? If so, when will it be functional and what 
will  the  federal  share  of  the  costs  be?  If  not,  does  TSA  have  any  plans  for  funding 
the project at Newark Liberty International Airport? 

Answer.  TSA  is  developing  prioritization  criteria  that  will  identify  the  airports 
that are the highest priority for receiving an in-line system. When the prioritization 
criteria  are  developed,  TSA  will  generate  a  list  of  candidate  airports.  Once  the  list 
is  generated,  TSA  will  be  able  to  estimate  total  costs.  Additionally,  TSA  has  ap-
proved  $10  million  in  Other  Transaction  Agreements  (OTA)  funds  for  Newark  Lib-
erty International Airport.

Question  4.  What  steps  has  TSA  taken  to  acquire  security  cameras  in  checked 
baggage  areas  and  address  instances  of  baggage  theft  and  damage  in  areas  out  of 
public view? 

Answer.  The  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2005  budget  included  an  estimated 
$14,000,000  for  Electronic  Surveillance  Systems  (ESS)  at  airport  checked  baggage 
screening  (CBS)  areas.  TSA,  in  partnership  with  selected  airports,  generally  pur-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

chases  and  installs  ESS  equipment  with  the  understanding  that  airports  maintain 
the ESS equipment after installation.

75

Question 5. What efforts is TSA making to improve security of airport access and 
control of secure areas? Is the Administration committed to funding projects like the 
‘‘secure  area  tracking  pilot  project,’’  a  demonstration  project  concerning  technology 
to  track  and  monitor  hazmat  vehicles  and  fuel  trucks  in  secure  areas,  at  Newark 
Airport? 

Answer. TSA is committed to improving airport access and control of secure areas 
and  has  generated  a  draft  guidance  package  to  comply  with  49  U.S.C.  44903(h)(5) 
(as amended by Section 4011(a)(2) of the Intelligence Reform and Terrorism Preven-
tion Act of 2004). This package is consistent with ongoing Administration and DHS 
direction  on  government-wide  biometric  standards  as  required  by  Homeland  Secu-
rity Presidential Directive-12 (HSPD–12). It is also consistent with all relevant bio-
metric  standards  agreed  to  by  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  &  Technology 
(NIST), the American National Standards Institute (ANSI), the International Stand-
ards  Organization  (ISO),  and  the  Radio  Technical  Commission  for  Aeronautics 
(RTCA) standards related to airport access control systems. 

Per  Congressional  direction,  TSA  has  developed  the  Biometrics  Guidance  docu-
ment, and it is currently undergoing DHS-wide review. The guidance document will 
provide vendors and airports performance expectations for technologies developed to 
support  airport  access  control  systems.  Vendors  will  be  able  to  submit  their  tech-
nology products to TSA for evaluation and TSA will then publish the results of these 
evaluations through the issuance of a qualified products list (QPL). In addition, air-
ports  will  be  able  to  use  the  QPL  to  determine  what  products  will  best  meet  their 
needs.  TSA  will  continue  to  support  an  evaluation  process  in  order  to  continually 
update the QPL with the latest technology solutions. 

In  addition,  per  Congressional  direction,  TSA  is  also  continuing  work  on  the  20-
airport  access  control  pilot  program.  TSA  has  completed  the  first  10  pilot  projects 
and has initiated 5 additional projects. Project design plans for the remaining 5 air-
ports  are  nearing  completion  and  will  be  announced  once  they  are  finalized.  TSA 
is  currently  preparing  a  report  that  will  capture  the  technology  performance  data 
gathered during the first 10 pilot projects. The completed report will be made avail-
able  to  industry  so  the  data  may  be  used  in  the  decision-making  process  when  se-
lecting potential access control solutions to meet their needs. The report will be up-
dated  with  the  information  gathered  during  the  remaining  10  projects  once  they 
have concluded. 

TSA  does  have  an  ongoing  R&D  project  in  partnership  with  the  Port  Authority 
of  New  York  and  New  Jersey,  which  includes  the  development  and  evaluation  of 
technology  that  tracks  fuel  trucks  operating  within  Newark  International  Airport’s 
(EWR) secure area. The project includes technology that tracks the vehicle, validates 
the  identity  of  authorized  operator,  and  ensures  that  the  vehicle  is  operated  only 
in authorized areas. An alarm is sent to the control center if a vehicle is taken into 
an  area  for  which  the  vehicle  is  not  authorized  even  if  it  is  operated  by  an  author-
ized driver. This alarm allows law enforcement to respond immediately. 

TSA  has  also  awarded  $1.67  million  for  EWR  to  purchase  and  deploy  a  state-of-
the-art  video  surveillance  system  for  detecting  and  tracking  persons  and  vehicles 
that  breach  the  airport  perimeter.  The  surveillance  system  will  string  together  im-
ages  taken  at  various  angles  by  different  cameras  to  create  a  single  picture  with 
an unrestricted view of the impacted area. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DAVID VITTER TO

HON. DAVID M. STONE 

The  nation  depends  on  Louisiana’s  port  system,  which  is  the  largest  combined 
port  system  in  the  United  States,  carrying  nearly  500  million  tons  of  waterborne 
commerce  annually.  That  is  over  20  percent  of  all  waterborne  commerce  in  the 
United States. So, with an important port system in my state, I am very concerned 
with  the  proposal  to  combine  all  the  different  infrastructure  protection  grants  into 
one  combined  Targeted  Infrastructure  Protection.  I  am  fearful  that  without  a  dedi-
cated funding source for port security, ports may be short-changed when competing 
with other different infrastructure systems. 

Question 1. Can you provide any assurances that our nation’s port system will not 

be under-funded if the Congress accepts this proposal?

Also,  ports  and  other  forms  of  transportation  infrastructure  have  vastly  different 
needs  and  each  have  a  very  different  set  type  of  security  threats.  For  example,  the 
security treats to rail transit are not that similar to the threats to waterborne com-
merce.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

76

Question  1a.  How  would  a  combined  program  be  able  to  be  efficiently  adminis-
tered  with  so  many  vastly  different  types  of  infrastructure  competing  for  the  same 
funding source? 

Answer.  DHS  is  committed  to  providing  the  resources  needed  to  secure  our  Na-
tion’s critical infrastructure, including seaports and port facilities. The Targeted In-
frastructure Protection Program (TIPP) at the Office of State and Local Government 
Coordination and Preparedness (SLGCP) proposed in the President’s FY 2006 budg-
et  would  consolidate  grants  to  protect  critical  national  infrastructures  such  as  sea-
ports, mass transit, railways, and energy facilities into a single, comprehensive pro-
gram  based  on  need,  risk,  and  consistency  with  national  priorities.  TSA  will  con-
tinue  to  provide  SLGCP  with  subject  matter  expertise  for  transportation  security. 
TSA  realizes  that  the  challenges  regarding  port  security  are  specific  to  that  mode 
just  as  other  modes  of  transportation  have  their  own  unique  needs.  Accordingly, 
TIPP  would  allow  DHS  to  allocate  funds  to  areas  where  intelligence  indicates  the 
greatest risks exist. 

The  President’s  FY  2006  budget  request  represents  an  increase  of  approximately 
$235  million  above  the  FY  2005  appropriated  level  for  all  infrastructure  protection, 
including  port  security,  mass  transit  security,  and  buffer  zone  protection  efforts 
among others. 

In addition, under the SLGCP’s Urban Areas Security Initiative (UASI), the Presi-
dent  proposes  to  provide  over  $1  billion  in  2006  funds  to  urban  areas  at  greatest 
risk  of  a  terrorist  incident.  The  UASI  Program  provides  financial  assistance  to  ad-
dress  the  unique  planning,  equipment,  training,  and  exercise  needs  of  high-threat, 
high-density  urban  areas,  and  to  assist  them  in  building  an  enhanced  and  sustain-
able  capacity  to  prevent,  respond  to,  and  recover  from  threats  or  acts  of  terrorism. 
Another $1 billion would be awarded to States under the State Homeland Security 
Grant Program (HSGP). These funds may be used to support homeland security and 
emergency  operations  planning,  equipment,  training,  and  exercises  as  determined 
on the basis of risk, need, and consistency with national priorities. 

Both UASI and HSGP funds could be used to supplement TIPP funds in the pro-

tection of critical infrastructure. 

Other DHS programs also target port security, including:
• The Container Security Initiative (CSI) screens cargo before it reaches the U.S. 
Currently there are U.S. Customs and Border Protection (GBP) inspectors in 36 
international  ports  of  trade  working  alongside  our  allies  to  target  and  screen 
high-risk  cargo  before  it  reaches  our  shores.  The  President  requested  $138.9 
million to continue to support CSI in FY 2006.
• Customs  and  Border  Protection  (CBP)  Targeting  Systems  aid  in  identifying 
high-risk  cargo  and  passengers.  The  2006  budget  includes  a  total  of  $28.3  mil-
lion for these system initiatives, a $5.4 million increase.
• The  Customs  Trade  Partnership  Against  Terrorism  (C–TPAT)  creates  partner-
ships  along  the  entire  supply  chain,  from  the  factory  floor,  to  foreign  vendors, 
to land borders and seaports. The 2006 budget includes an increase of $8.2 mil-
lion, for a total of $54.3 million for G–TPAT. The increase will enhance our abil-
ity to conduct additional supply chain validations.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:01 Nov 28, 2005 Jkt 022942 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\22942.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

